
Leon Trotsky



THE REVOLUTION BETRAYED


What is the Soviet Union and Where is it Going?

(1936)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written in 1936.
First published in 1937.
Translated by Max Eastman.
Transcribed for the Internet by Zodiac between August 1993 and March
1996.
Converted to eBook format by Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the on-line
version of _The Revolution Betrayed_ available at Trotsky Internet
Archive in October 2013.
Cover of eBook edition Vyshinsky's staff meeting: men and women who ran
the prosecutor’s office of the Supreme Soviet. Their task was to break
the ideological enemies of the regime, understood not, of course, as
enemies of communism, but those unlucky citizens who Stalin perceived as
enemies of his absolute power. Provided by Cm Nikas.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

  INTRODUCTION: The Purpose of the Present Work

  I. – WHAT HAS BEEN ACHIEVED

  The Principal Indices of Industrial Growth
  Comparative Estimates of These Achievements
  Production _per Capita_ of the Population

  II. – ECONOMIC GROWTH AND THE ZIGZAGS OF THE LEADERSHIP

  “Military Communism”, “The New Economic Policy” (NEP) and the Course
  Toward the Kulak
  A Sharp Turn: “The Five-Year Plan in Four Years” and “Complete
  Collectivization”

  III. – SOCIALISM AND THE STATE

  The Transitional Regime
  Program and Reality
  The Dual Character of the Workers’ State
  “Generalized Want” and the Gendarme
  The “Complete Triumph of Socialism” and the “Reinforcement of the
  Dictatorship”

  IV. – THE STRUGGLE FOR THE PRODUCTIVITY OF LABOR

  Money and Plan
  “Socialist” Inflation
  The Rehabilitation of the Ruble
  The Stakhanov Movement

  V. – THE SOVIET THERMIDOR

  Why Stalin Triumphed
  The Degeneration of the Bolshevik Party
  The Social Roots of Thermidor

  VI. – THE GROWTH OF INEQUALITY AND SOCIAL ANTAGONISMS

  Want, Luxury and Speculation
  The Differentiation of the Proletariat
  Social Contradictions in the Collective Village
  The Social Physiognomy of the Ruling Stratum

  VII. – FAMILY, YOUTH AND CULTURE

  Thermidor in the Family
  The Struggle against the Youth
  Nationality and Culture

  VIII. – FOREIGN POLICY AND THE ARMY

  From “World Revolution” to _Status Quo_
  The League of Nations and the Communist International
  The Red Army and Its Doctrines
  The Abolition of the Militia and the Restoration of Officers’ Ranks
  The Soviet Union in a War

  IX. – SOCIAL RELATIONS IN THE SOCIAL UNION

  State Capitalism?
  Is the Bureaucracy a Ruling Class?
  The Question of the Character of the Soviet Union Not Yet Decided by
  History

  X. – THE SOVIET UNION IN THE MIRROR OF THE NEW CONSTITUTION

  Work “According to Ability” and Personal Property
  The Soviets and Democracy
  Democracy and the Party

  XI. – WHITHER THE SOVIET UNION?

  Bonapartism as a Regime of Crisis
  The Struggle of the Bureaucracy with “the Class Enemy”
  The Inevitability of a New Revolution

  APPENDIX: “SOCIALISM IN ONE COUNTRY”

  The “Friends” of the Soviet Union

  POSTSCRIPT

The Revolution Betrayed



INTRODUCTION: THE PURPOSE OF THE PRESENT WORK


------------------------------------------------------------------------

The bourgeois world at first tried to pretend not to notice the economic
successes of the soviet regime – the experimental proof, that is, of the
practicability of socialist methods. The learned economists of capital
still often try to maintain a deeply cogitative silence about the
unprecedented tempo of Russia’s industrial development, or confine
themselves to remarks about an extreme “exploitation of the peasantry”.
They are missing a wonderful opportunity to explain why the brutal
exploitation of the peasants in China, for instance, or Japan, or India,
never produced an industrial tempo remotely approaching that of the
Soviet Union.

Facts win out, however, in the end. The bookstalls of all civilized
countries are now loaded with books about the Soviet Union. It is no
wonder; such prodigies are rare. The literature dictated by blind
reactionary hatred is fast dwindling. A noticeable proportion o the
newest works on the Soviet Union adopt a favourable, if not even a
rapturous, tone. As a sign of the improving international reputation of
the parvenu state, this abundance of pro-soviet literature can only be
welcomed. Moreover, it is incomparably better to idealize the Soviet
Union than fascist Italy. The reader, however, would seek in vain on the
pages of this literature for a scientific appraisal of what is actually
taking place in the land of the October revolution.

The writings of the “friends of the Soviet Union” fall into three
principal categories:

-   A dilettante journalism, reportage with a more or less “left” slant,
    makes up the principal mass of their articles and books.
-   Alongside it, although more pretentious, stand the productions of a
    humanitarian, lyric and pacifistical “communism”.
-   Third comes economic schematization, in the spirit of the old-German
    _Katheder-Sozializmus_.

Louis Fischer and Duranty are sufficiently well-known representatives of
the first type. The late Barbusse and Romain Rolland represent the
category of “humanitarian” friends. It is not accidental that before
ever coming over to Stalin the former wrote a life of Christ and the
latter a biography of Gandhi. And finally, the conservatively pedantic
socialism has found its most authoritative representation in the
indefatigable Fabian couple, Beatrice and Sidney Webb.

What unifies these three categories, despite their differences, is a
kowtowing before accomplished fact, and a partiality for sedative
generalizations. To revolt against their own capitalism was beyond these
writers. They are the more ready, therefore, to take their stand upon a
foreign revolution which has already ebbed back into its channels.
Before the October revolution, and for a number of years after, no one
of these people, nor any of their spiritual forebears, gave a thought to
the question how socialism would arrive in the world. That makes it easy
for them to recognize as socialism what we have in the Soviet Union.
This gives them not only the aspect of progressive men, in step with the
epoch, but even a certain moral stability. And at the same time it
commits them to absolutely nothing. This kind of contemplative,
optimistic, and anything but destructive, literature, which sees all
unpleasantness in the past, has a very quieting effect on the nerves of
the reader and therefore finds a ready market. Thus there is quietly
coming into being an international school which might be described as
_Bolshevism for the Cultured Bourgeoisie_, or more concisely, _Socialism
for the Radical Tourists_.

We shall not enter into a polemic with the productions of this school,
since they offer no serious grounds for polemic. Questions end for them
where they really only begin. The purpose of the present investigation
is to estimate correctly what is, in order the better to understand what
is coming to be. We shall dwell upon the past only so far as that helps
us to see the future. Our book will be critical. Whoever worships the
accomplished fact is incapable of preparing the future.

The process of economic and cultural development in the Soviet Union has
already passed through several stages, but has by no means arrived at an
inner equilibrium. If you remember that the task of socialism is to
create a classless society based upon solidarity and the harmonious
satisfaction of all needs, there is not yet, in this fundamental sense,
a hint of socialism in the Soviet Union. To be sure, the contradictions
of soviet society are deeply different from the contradictions of
capitalism. But they are nevertheless very tense. They find their
expression in material and cultural inequalities, governmental
repressions, political groupings, and the struggle of factions. Police
repression hushes up and distorts a political struggle, but does not
eliminate it. The thoughts which are forbidden exercise an influence on
the governmental policy at every step, fertilizing or blocking it. In
these circumstances, an analysis of the development of the Soviet Union
cannot for a minute neglect to consider those ideas and slogans under
which a stifled but passionate political struggle is being waged
throughout the country. History here merges directly with living
politics.

The safe-and-sane “left” philistines love to tell us that in criticising
the Soviet Union we must be extremely cautious lest we injure the
process of socialist construction. We, for our part, are far from
regarding the Soviet state as so shaky a structure. The enemies of The
Soviet Union are far better informed about it than its real friends, the
workers of all countries. In the general staffs of the imperialist
governments an accurate account is kept of the pluses and minuses of the
Soviet Union, and not only on the basis of public reports. The enemy
can, unfortunately, take advantage of the weak side of the workers’
state, but never of a criticism of those tendencies which they
themselves consider its favourable features. The hostility to criticism
of the majority of the official “friends” really conceals a fear not of
the fragility of the Soviet Union, but of the fragility of their own
sympathy with it. We shall tranquilly disregard all fears and warnings
of this kind. It is facts and not illusions that decide. We intend the
face and not the mask.

August 4, 1936

------------------------------------------------------------------------



POSTSCRIPT


_This book was completed and sent to the publishers before the
“terrorist” conspiracy trial of Moscow was announced. Naturally,
therefore, the proceedings at the trial could not be evaluated in its
pages. Its indication of the historic logic of this “terrorist” trial,
and its advance exposure of the fact that its mystery is deliberate
mystification, is so much the more significant._

September 1936

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 1 WHAT HAS BEEN ACHIEVED


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. The Principal Indices of Industrial Growth

Owing to the insignificance of the Russian bourgeoisie, the democratic
tasks of backward Russia – such as liquidation of the monarchy and the
semi-feudal slavery of the peasants – could be achieved only through a
dictatorship of the proletariat. The proletariat, however, having seized
the power at the head of the peasant masses, could not stop at the
achievement of these democratic tasks. The bourgeois revolution was
directly bound up with the first stages of a socialist revolution. That
fact was not accidental. The history of recent decades very clearly
shows that, in the conditions of capitalist decline, backward countries
are unable to attain that level which the old centers of capitalism have
attained. Having themselves arrived in a blind alley, the highly
civilized nations block the road of proletarian revolution, not because
her economy was the first to become ripe for a socialist change, but
because she could not develop further on a capitalist basis.
Socialization of the means of production had become a necessary
condition for bringing the country out of barbarism. That is the _law of
combined development_ for backward countries. Entering upon the
socialist revolution as “the weakest link in the capitalist chain”
(Lenin), the former empire of the tzars is even now, in the 19th year
after the revolution, still confronted with the task of “catching up
with and outstripping” – consequently in the first place catching up
with – Europe and America. She has, that is, to solve those problems of
technique and productivity which were long ago solved by capitalism in
the advanced countries.

Could it indeed be otherwise? The overthrow of the old ruling classes
did not achieve, but only completely revealed, the task: to rise from
barbarism to culture. At the same time, by concentrating the means of
production in the hands of the state, the revolution made it possible to
apply new and incomparably more effective industrial methods. Only
thanks to a planned directive was it possible in so brief a span to
restore what had been destroyed by the imperialist and civil wars, to
create gigantic new enterprises, to introduce new kinds of production
and establish new branches of industry.

The extraordinary tardiness in the development of the international
revolution, upon whose prompt aid the leaders of the Bolshevik party had
counted, created immense difficulties for the Soviet Union, but also
revealed its inner powers and resources. However, a correct appraisal of
the results achieved – their grandeur as well as their inadequacy – is
possible only with the help of an international scale of measurement.
This book will be a historic and sociological interpretation of the
process, not a piling up of statistical illustrations. Nevertheless, in
the interests of the further discussion, it is necessary to take as a
point of departure certain important mathematical data.

The vast scope of industrialization in the Soviet Union, as against a
background of stagnation and decline in almost the whole capitalist
world, appears unanswerably in the following gross indices. Industrial
production in Germany, thanks solely to feverish war preparations, is
now returning to the level of 1929. Production in Great Britain, holding
to the apron strings of protectionism, has raised itself 3 or 4 per cent
during these six years. Industrial production in the United States has
declined approximately 25 per cent; in France, more than 30 per cent.
First place among capitalist countries is occupied by Japan, who is
furiously arming herself and robbing her neighbors. Her production has
risen almost 40 per cent! But even this exceptional index fades before
the dynamic of development in the Soviet Union. Her industrial
production has increased during this same period approximately 3½ times,
or 250 per cent. The heavy industries have increased their production
during the last decade (1925 to 1935) more than 10 times. In the first
year of the five-year plan (1928 to 1929), capital investments amounted
to 5.4 billion rubles; for 1936, 32 billion are indicated.

If in view of the instability of the ruble as a unit of measurement, we
lay aside money estimates, we arrive at another unit which is absolutely
unquestionable. In December 1913, the Don basin produced 2,275,000 tons
of coal; in December 1935, 7,125,000 tons. During the last three years
the production of iron has doubled. The production of steel and of the
rolling mills has increased almost 2½ times. The output of oil, coal and
iron has increased from 3 to 3½ times the pre-war figure. In 1920, when
the first plan of electrification was drawn up, there were 10 district
power stations in the country with a total power production of 253,000
kilowatts. In 1935, there were already 95 of these stations with a total
power of 4,345,000 kilowatts. In 1925, the Soviet Union stood 11th in
the production of electro-energy; in 1935, it was second only to Germany
and the United States. In the production of coal, the Soviet Union has
moved forward from 10th to 4th place. In steel, from 6th to 3rd place.
In the production of tractors, to the 1st place in the world. This also
is true of the production of sugar.

Gigantic achievement in industry, enormously promising beginnings in
agriculture, an extraordinary growth of the old industrial cities and a
building of new ones, a rapid increase of the numbers of workers, a rise
in cultural level and cultural demands – such are the indubitable
results of the October revolution, in which the prophets of the old
world tried to see the grave of human civilization. With the bourgeois
economists we have no longer anything to quarrel over. Socialism has
demonstrated its right to victory, not on the pages of DAS KAPITAL, but
in an industrial arena comprising a sixth part of the earths surface –
not in the language of dialectics, but in the language of steel, cement
and electricity. Even if the Soviet Union, as a result of internal
difficulties, external blows and the mistakes of leadership, were to
collapse – which we firmly hope will not happen – there would remain an
earnest of the future this indestructible fact, that thanks solely to a
proletarian revolution a backward country has achieved in less than 10
years successes unexampled in history.

This also ends the quarrel with the reformists in the workers movement.
Can we compare for one moment their mouselike fussing with the titanic
work accomplished by this people aroused to a new life by revolution? If
in 1918 the Social-Democrats of Germany had employed the power imposed
upon them by the workers for a socialist revolution, and not for the
rescue of capitalism, it is easy to see on the basis of the Russian
experience what unconquerable economic power would be possessed today by
a socialist bloc of Central and Eastern Europe and a considerable part
of Asia. The peoples of the world will pay for the historic crime of
reformism with new wars and revolutions.

2. Comparative Estimates of These Achievements

The dynamic coefficients of Soviet industry are unexampled. But they are
still far from decisive. The Soviet Union is uplifting itself from a
terrible low level, while the capitalist countries are slipping down
from a very high one. The correlation of forces at the present moment is
determined not by the rate of growth, but by contrasting the entire
power of the two camps as expressed in material accumulations,
technique, culture and, above all, the productivity of human labour.
When we approach the matter from this statistical point of view, the
situation changes at once, and to the extreme disadvantage of the Soviet
Union.

The question formulated by Lenin – Who shall prevail? – is a question of
the correlation of forces between the Soviet Union and the world
revolutionary proletariat on the one hand, and on the other
international capital and the hostile forces within the Union. The
economic successes of the Soviet Union make it possible for her to
fortify herself, advance, arm herself, and, when necessary, retreat and
wait – in a word, hold out. But in its essence the question, Who shall
prevail – not only as a military, but still more as an economic question
– confronts the Soviet Union on a world scale. Military intervention is
a danger. The intervention of cheap goods in the baggage trains of a
capitalist army would be an incomparably greater one. The victory of the
proletariat in one of the Western countries would, of course,
immediately and radically alter the correlation of forces. But so long
as the Soviet Union remains isolated, and, worse than that, so long as
the European proletariat suffers reverses and continues to fall back,
the strength of the Soviet structure is measured in the last analysis by
the productivity of labour. And that, under a market economy, expresses
itself in production costs and prices. The difference between domestic
prices and prices in the world market is one of the chief means of
measuring this correlation of forces. The Soviet statisticians, however,
are forbidden even to approach that question. The reason is that,
notwithstanding its condition of stagnation and rot, capitalism is still
far ahead in the matter of technique, organisation and labour skill.

The traditional backwardness of agriculture in the Soviet Union is well
enough known. In no branch of it has progress been made that can in the
remotest degree bear comparison with the progress in industry.

“We are still way behind the capitalist countries in the beet crop,”
complains Molotov, for example, at the end of 1935. “In 1934 we reaped
from one hectare [approximately 2½ acres] 82 hundredweight; in 1935, in
the Ukraine with an extraordinary harvest 131 hundredweight. In
Czechoslovakia and Germany, they reap about 250 hundredweight, in
France, over 300 per hectare.”

Molotov’s complaint could be extended to every branch of agriculture –
textile as well as grain growing, and especially to stockbreeding. The
proper rotation of crops, selection of seeds, fertilization, the
tractors, combines, blooded stock farms – all these are preparing a
truly gigantic revolution in socialized agriculture. But it is just in
this most conservative realm that the revolution demands time.
Meanwhile, notwithstanding collectivization, the problem still is to
approach the higher models of the capitalist West, handicapped though it
is with the small-farm system.

The struggle to raise the productivity of labour in industry runs in two
channels: adoption of an advanced technique and better use of labour
power. What made it possible to establish gigantic factories of the most
modern type in the space of a few years was, on the one hand, the
existence in the West of a high capitalist technique, on the other, the
domestic regime of planned economy. In this sphere foreign achievements
are in process assimilation. The fact that Soviet industry, as also the
equipping of the Red Army, has developed at a forced tempo, contains
enormous potential advantages. The industries had not been compelled to
drag along an antiquated implementation as in England and France. The
army has not been condemned to carry an old-fashioned equipment. But
this same feverish growth has also had its negative side. There is no
correspondence between the different elements of industry; men lag
behind technique; the leadership is not equal to its tasks. Altogether
this expresses itself in extremely high production costs and poor
quality of product.

“Our works,” writes the head of the oil industry, “possess the same
equipment as the American. But the organisation of the drilling lags;
the men are not sufficiently skilled.” The numerous breakdown, he
explains are a result of “carelessness, lack of skill and lack of
technical supervision.”

Molotov complains: “We are extremely backward in organisation of the
building industry ... It is carried on for the most part in old ways
with an abominable use of tools and mechanisms.” Such confessions are
scattered throughout the Soviet press. The new technique is still far
from giving the results produced in its capitalist fatherlands.

The wholesale success of the heavy industries is a gigantic conquest. On
that foundation alone it is possible to build. However, the test of
modern industry is the production of delicate mechanisms which demand
both technical and general culture. In this sphere the backwardness of
the Soviet Union is still great.

Undoubtedly the most important successes, both quantitative and
qualitative, have been achieved in the war industries. The army and
fleet are the most influential clients, and the most fastidious
customers. Nevertheless in a series of their public speeches the heads
of the War Department, among them Voroshilov, complain unceasingly: “We
are not always fully satisfied with the quality of the products which
you give us for the Red Army.” It is not hard to sense the anxiety which
these cautious words conceal.

The products of machine manufacture, says the head of the heavy
industries in an official report, “must be good quality and
unfortunately are not.” And again: “machines with us are expensive.” As
always the speaker refrains from giving accurate comparative data in
relation to world production.

The tractor is the pride of Soviet industry. But the coefficient of
effective use of the tractors is very low. During the last industrial
year, it was necessary to subject 81 per cent of the tractors to capital
repairs. A considerable number of them, moreover, got out of order again
at the very height of the tilling season. According to certain
calculations, the machine and tractor stations will cover expenses only
with a harvest of 20 to 22 hundredweight of grain per hectare. At
present, when the average harvest is less than half of that, the state
is compelled to disburse billions to meet the deficit.

Things are still worse in the sphere of auto transport. In America a
truck travels 60,000 to 80,000 or even 100,000 kilometer a year; in the
Soviet Union only 20,000 – that is, a third or a fourth as much. Out of
every 100 machines, only 55 are working; the rest are undergoing repairs
or awaiting them. The cost of repairs is double the cost of all the new
machines put out. It is no wonder that the state accounting office
reports: “Auto transport is nothing but a heavy burden on the cost of
production.”

The increase of carrying power of the railroads is accompanied,
according to the president of the Council of People’s Commissars, “by
innumerable wrecks and breakdowns.” The fundamental cause is the same:
low skill of labour inherited from the past. The struggle to keep the
switches in neat condition is becoming in its way a heroic exploit,
about which prize switchgirls make reports in the Kremlin to the highest
circles of power. Water transport, notwithstanding the progress of
recent years, is far behind that of the railroads. Periodically the
newspapers are speckled with communications about “the abominable
operation of marine transport”, “extremely low quality of ship repairs”,
etc.

In the light industries, conditions are even less favourable than in the
heavy. A unique law of Soviet industry may be formulated thus:
commodities are as a general rule worse the nearer they stand to the
mass consumer. In the textile industry, according to Pravda, “there is a
shamefully large percentage of defective goods, poverty of selection,
predominance of low grades.” Complaints of the bad quality of articles
of wide consumption appear periodically in the press: “clumsy ironware”;
“ugly furniture, badly put together and carelessly finished”; “you cant
find decent buttons”; “the system of social food supply works absolutely
unsatisfactorily.” And so on endlessly.

To characterize industrial progress by quantitative indices alone,
without considering quality, is almost like describing a man’s physique
by his height and disregarding his chest measurements. Moreover, to
judge correctly the dynamic of Soviet industry, it is necessary, along
with qualitative corrections, to have always in mind the fact that swift
progress in some branches is accompanied by backwardness in others. The
creation of gigantic automobile factories is paid for in the scarcity
and bad maintenance of the highways. “The dilapidation of our roads is
extraordinary. On our most important highway – Moscow to Yaroslavl –
automobiles can make only 10 kilometers [1] an hour.” (IZVESTIA) The
president of the State Planning Commission asserts that the country
still maintains “the tradition of pristine roadlessness.”

Municipal economy is in a similar condition. New industrial towns arise
in a brief span; at the same time dozens of old towns are running to
seed. The capitals and industrial centers are growing and adorning
themselves; expensive theatres and clubs are springing up in various
parts of the country; but the dearth of living quarters is unbearable.
Dwelling houses remains as a rule uncared for. “We build badly and at
great expense. Our houses are being used up and not restored. We repair
little and badly.” (IZVESTIA)

The entire Soviet economy consists of such disproportions. Within
certain limits they are inevitable, since it had been and remains
necessary to begin the advance with the most important branches.
Nevertheless the backwardness of certain branches greatly decreases the
useful operation operation of others. From the standpoint of an ideal
planning directive, which would guarantee not the maximum tempo in
separate branches, but the optimum result in economy as a whole, the
statistical coefficient of growth would be lower in the first period,
but economy as a whole, and particularly the consumer, would be the
gainer. In the long run the general industrial dynamic would also gain.

In the official statistics, the production and repair of automobiles is
added in with the total of industrial production. From the standpoint of
economic efficiency, it would be proper to subtract, not add. This
observation applies to many other branches of industry. For that reason,
all total estimates in rubles have only a relative value. It is not
certain what a ruble is. It is not always certain what hides behind it –
the construction of a machine, or its premature breakdown. If, according
to an estimate in “stable” rubles, the total production of the big
industries has increased by comparison with the pre-war level 6 times,
the actual output of oil, coal and iron measured in tons will have
increased 3 to 3½ times. The fundamental cause of this divergence of
indices lies in the fact that Soviet industry has created a series of
new branches unknown to tzarist Russia, but a supplementary cause is to
be found in the tendentious manipulation of statistics. It is well known
that every bureaucracy has an organic need to doll-up the facts.

3. Production _per capita_ of the Population

The average individual productivity of labour in the Soviet Union is
still very low. In the _best_ metal foundry, according to the
acknowledgement of its director, the output of iron and steel per
individual worker is a third as much as the _average_ output of American
foundries. A comparison of average figures in both countries would
probably give a ratio of 1 to 5, or worse. In these circumstances the
announcement that blast furnaces are used “better” in the Soviet Union
than in capitalist countries remains meaningless. The function of
technique is to economize human labour and nothing else. In the timber
and building industries things are even less favourable than in the
metal industry. To each worker in the quarries in the United States
falls 5,000 tons a year, in the Soviet Union 500 tons – that is, ¹/10 as
much. Such crying differences are explained not only by a lack of
skilled workers, but still more by bad organisation of the work. The
bureaucracy spurs on the workers with all its might, but is unable to
make a proper use of labour power. In agriculture things are still less
favourable, of course, than in industry. To the low productivity of
labour corresponds a low national income, and consequently a low
standard of life for the masses of the people.

When they assert that in volume of industrial production the Soviet
Union in 1936 will occupy the 1st place in Europe – of itself this
progress is gigantic! – they leave out of consideration not only the
quality and production cost of the goods, but also the size of the
population. The general level of development of a country, however, and
especially the living standard of the masses can be defined, at least in
rough figures, only by dividing the products by the number of consumers.
Let us try to carry out this simple arithmetical operation.

The importance of railroad transport for economy culture and military
ends needs no demonstration. The Soviet Union has 83,000 kilometres of
railroads, as against 58,000 in Germany, 63,000 in France, 417,000 in
the United States. This means that for every 10,000 people in Germany
there are 8.9 kilometres of railroad, in France 15.2, in the United
States 33.1, and in the Soviet Union 5.0. Thus, according to railroad
indices, the Soviet Union continues to occupy one of the lowest places
in the civilized world. The merchant fleet, which has tripled in the
last five years, stands now approximately on a par with that of Denmark
and Spain. To these facts we must add the still extremely low figure for
paved highways. In the Soviet Union 0.6 automobiles were put out for
every 1,000 inhabitants. In Great Britain, about 8 (in 1934), in France
about 4.5, in the United States 23 (as against 36.5 in 1928). At the
same time in the relative number of horses (about 1 horse to each 10 or
11 citizens) the Soviet Union, despite the extreme backwardness of its
railroad, water and auto transport, does not surpass either France or
the United States, while remaining far behind them in the quality of the
stock.

In the sphere of heavy industry, which has attained the most outstanding
successes, the comparative indices still remain unfavorable. The coal
output in the Soviet Union for 1935 was about 0.7 tons per person; in
Great Britain, almost 5 tons; in the United States, almost 3 tons (as
against 5.4 tons in 1913); in Germany, about 2 tons. Steel: in the
Soviet Union, about 67 kilograms [2] per person, in the United States
about 250 kilograms, etc. About the same proportions in pig and rolled
iron. In the Soviet Union, 153 kilowatt hours of electric power was
produced per person in 1935, in Great Britain (1934) 443, in France 363,
in Germany 472.

In the light industries, the _per capita_ indices are as a general rule
still lower. Of woolen fabric in 1935, less than ½ metre per person, or
8 to 10 times less than in the United States or Great Britain. Woolen
cloth is accessible only to privileged Soviet citizens. For the masses
cotton print, of which about 16 metres per person was manufactured,
still has to do for winter clothes. The production of shoes in the
Soviet Union now amounts to about one-half pair per person, in Germany
more than a pair, in France a pair and a half, in the United States
about three pairs. And this leaves aside the quality index, which would
still further lower the comparison. We may take it for granted that in
bourgeois countries the percentage of people who have several pairs of
shoes is considerably higher than in the Soviet Union. But unfortunately
the Soviet Union also still stands among the first in percentage of
barefoot people.

Approximately the same correlation, in part still less favourable,
prevails in the production of foodstuffs. Notwithstanding Russia’s
indubitable progress in recent years, conserves, sausages, cheese, to
say nothing of pastry and confections, are still completely inaccessible
to the fundamental mass of the population. Even in the matter of dairy
products things are not favourable. In France and the United States,
there is approximately one cow for every five people, in Germany one for
every six, in the Soviet Union one for every eight. But when it comes to
giving milk, two Soviet cows must be counted approximately as one. Only
in the production of grainbearing grasses, especially rye, and also in
potatoes, does the Soviet Union, computing by population, considerably
surpass the majority of European countries and the United States. But
rye bread and potatoes as the predominant food of the population – that
is the classic symbol of poverty.

The consumption of paper is one of the chief indices of culture. In
1935, the Soviet Union produced less than 4 kg. per person, the United
States over 34 (as against 48 in 1928), and Germany 47 kg. Whereas the
United States consumes 12 pencils a year per inhabitant, the Soviet
Union consumers only 4, and those 4 are of such poor quality that their
useful work does not exceed that of one good pencil, or at the outside
two. The newspapers frequently complain that the lack of primers, paper,
and pencils paralyzes the work of the schools. It is no wonder that the
liquidation of illiteracy, indicated for the 10th anniversary of the
October Revolution, is still far from accomplished.

The problem can be similarly illumined by starting from more general
considerations. The national income per person in the Soviet Union is
considerably less than in the West. And since capital investment
consumes about 25 to 30 per cent – incomparably more than anywhere else
– the total amount consumed by the popular mass cannot but be
considerably lower than in the advanced capitalist countries.

To be sure, in the Soviet Union there are no possessing classes, whose
extravagance is balanced by an under-consumption of the popular mass.
However, the weight of this corrective is not so great as might appear
at first glance. The fundamental evil of the capitalist system is not
the extravagance of the possessing classes, however disgusting that may
be in itself, but the fact that in order to guarantee its right to
extravagance the bourgeoisie maintains its private ownership of the
means of production, thus condemning the economic system to anarchy and
decay. In the matter of luxuries, the bourgeoisie, of course, has a
monopoly of consumption. But in things of prime necessity, the toiling
masses constitute the overwhelming majority of consumers. We shall see
later, moreover, that although the Soviet Union has no possessing class
in the proper sense of the word, still she has very privileged
commanding strata of the population, who appropriate the lions share in
the sphere of consumption. And so if there is a lower _per capita_
production of things of prime necessity in the Soviet Union than in the
advanced capitalist countries, that does mean that the standard of
living of the Soviet masses still falls below the capitalist level.

The historic responsibility for this situation lies, of course, upon
Russia’s black and heavy past, her heritage of darkness and poverty.
There was no other way out upon the road of progress except through the
overthrow of capitalism. To convince yourself of this, it is only
necessary to cast a glance at the Baltic countries and Poland, once the
most advanced parts of the tzar’s empire, and now hardly emerging from
the morass. The undying service of the Soviet regime lies in its intense
and successful struggle with Russia’s thousand-year-old backwardness.
But a correct estimate of what has been attained is the first condition
for further progress.

The Soviet regime is passing through a _preparatory_ stage, importing,
borrowing and appropriating the technical and cultural conquests of the
West. The comparative coefficients of production and consumption testify
that this preparatory stage is far from finished. Even under the
improbable condition of a continuing complete capitalist standstill, it
must still occupy a whole historic period. That is a first extremely
important conclusion which we shall have need of in our further
investigation.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. 10 km = 6 miles.

2. 1 kg. = 2.2 lbs. approximately.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 2 ECONOMIC GROWTH AND THE ZIGZAGS OF THE LEADERSHIP


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. “Military Communism”, the “New Economic Policy” (NEP) and the Course Toward the Kulak

The line of development of the Soviet economy is far from an
uninterrupted and evenly rising curve. In the first 18 years of the new
regime you can clearly distinguish several stages marked by sharp
crises. A short outline of the economic history of the Soviet Union in
connection with the policy of the government is absolutely necessary
both for diagnosis and prognosis.

The first three years after the revolution were a period of overt and
cruel civil war. Economic life was wholly subjected to the needs of the
front. Cultural life lurked in corners and was characterized by a bold
range of creative thought, above all the personal thought of Lenin, with
an extraordinary scarcity of material means. That was the period of
so-called “military communism” (1918-21), which forms a heroic parallel
to the “military socialism” of the capitalist countries. The economic
problems of the Soviet government in those years came down chiefly to
supporting the war industries, and using the scanty resources left from
the past for military purposes and to keep the city population alive.
Military communism was, in essence, the systematic regimentation of
consumption in a besieged fortress.

It is necessary to acknowledge, however, that in its original conception
it pursued broader aims. The Soviet government hoped and strove to
develop these methods of regimentation directly into a system of planned
economy in distribution as well as production. In other words, from
“military communism” it hoped gradually, but without destroying the
system, to arrive at genuine communism. The program of the Bolshevik
party adopted in March 1919 said:

“In the sphere of distribution the present task of the Soviet Government
is unwaveringly to continue on a planned, organized and state-wide scale
to replace trade by the distribution of products.”

Reality, however, came into increasing conflict with the program of
“military communism.” Production continually declined, and not only
because of the quenching of the stimulus of personal interest among the
producers. The city demanded grain and raw materials from the rural
districts, giving nothing in exchange except varicolored pieces of
paper, named, according to ancient memory, money. And the _muzhik_
buried his stores in the ground. The government sent out armed workers’
detachments for grain. The _muzhik_ cut down his sowings. Industrial
production of steel fell from 4.2 million tons to 183,000 tons – that
is, to ¹/23 of what it had been. The total harvest of grain decreased
from 801 million hundredweight to 503 million in 1922. That was a year
of terrible hunger. Foreign trade at the same time plunged from 2.9
billion rubles to 30 million. The collapse of the productive forces
surpassed anything of the kind that history had ever seen. The country,
and the government with it, were at the very edge of the abyss.

The utopian hopes of the epoch of military communism came in later for a
cruel, and in many respects just, criticism. The theoretical mistake of
the ruling party remains inexplicable, however, only if you leave out of
account the fact that all calculations at that time were based on the
hope of an early victory of the revolution in the West. It was
considered self-evident that the victorious German proletariat would
supply Soviet Russia, on credit against future food and raw materials,
not only with machines and articles of manufacture, but also with tens
of thousands of highly skilled workers, engineers and organizers. And
there is no doubt that if the proletarian revolution had triumphed in
Germany – a thing that was prevented solely and exclusively by the
Social Democrats – the economic development of the Soviet Union as well
as of Germany would have advanced with such gigantic strides that the
fate of Europe and the world would today have been incomparably more
auspicious. It can be said with certainty, however, that even in that
happy event it would still have been necessary to renounce the direct
state distribution of products in favor of the methods of commerce.

Lenin explained the necessity of restoring the market by the existence
in the country of millions of isolated peasant enterprises, unaccustomed
to define their economic relations with the outside world except through
trade. Trade circulation would establish a “connection”, as it was
called, between the peasant and the nationalized industries. The
theoretical formula for this “connection” is very simple: industry
should supply the rural districts with necessary goods at such prices as
would enable the state to forego forcible collection of the products of
peasant labour.

To mend economic relations with the rural districts was undoubtedly the
most critical and urgent task of the NEP. A brief experiment showed,
however, that industry itself, in spite of its socialized character, had
need of the methods of money payment worked out by capitalism. A planned
economy cannot rest merely on intellectual data. The play of supply and
demand remains for a long period a necessary material basis and
indispensable corrective.

The market, legalized by the NEP, began, with the help of an organized
currency, to do its work. As early as 1923, thanks to an initial
stimulus from the rural districts, industry began to revive. And
moreover it immediately hit a high tempo. It is sufficient to say that
production doubled in 1922 and 1923, and by 1926 had already reached the
pre-war level – that is, had grown more than five times its size in
1921. At the same time, although at a much more modest tempo, the
harvests were increasing.

Beginning with the critical year 1923, the disagreements observed
earlier in the ruling party on the relation between industry and
agriculture began to grow sharp. In a country which had completely
exhausted its stores and reserves, industry could not develop except by
borrowing grain and raw material from the peasants. Too heavy “forced
loans” of products, however, would destroy the stimulus to labour. Not
believing in the future prosperity, the peasant would answer the grain
expeditions from the city by a sowing strike. Too light collections, on
the other hand, threatened a standstill. Not receiving industrial
products, the peasants would turn to industrial labour to satisfy their
own needs, and revive the old home crafts. The disagreements in the
party began about the question how much to take from the villages for
industry, in order to hasten the period of dynamic equilibrium between
them. The dispute was immediately complicated by the question of the
social structure of the village itself.

In the spring of 1923, at a congress of the party, a representative of
the “Left Opposition” – not yet, however, known by that name –
demonstrated the divergence of industrial and agricultural prices in the
form of an ominous diagram. This phenomenon was then first called “the
scissors”, a term which has since become almost international. If the
further lagging of industry – said the speaker – continues to open these
scissors, then a break between city and country is inevitable.

The peasants made a sharp distinction between the democratic and
agrarian revolution which the Bolshevik party had carried through, and
its policy directed toward laying the foundations of socialism. The
expropriation of the landlords and the state lands brought the peasants
upwards of half a billion gold rubles a year. In prices of state
products, however, the peasants were paying out a much larger sum. So
long as the net result of the two revolutions, democratic and
socialistic, bound together by the firm snow of October, reduced itself
for the peasantry to a loss of hundreds of millions, a union of the two
classes remained dubious.

The scattered character of the peasant economy, inherited from the past,
was aggravated by the results of the October Revolution. The number of
independent farms rose during the subsequent decade from 16 to 25
million, which naturally strengthened the purely consummatory character
of the majority of peasant enterprises. That was one of the causes of
the lack of agricultural products.

A small commodity economy inevitably produces exploiters. In proportion
as the villages recovered, the differentiation within the peasant mass
began to grow. This development fell into the old well-trodden ruts. The
growth of the _kulak_ [1] far outstripped the general growth of
agriculture. The policy of the government under the slogan “face to the
country” was actually a turning of its face to the _kulak_. Agricultural
taxes fell upon the poor far more heavily than upon the well-to-do, who
moreover skimmed the cream of the state credits. The surplus grain,
chiefly in possession of the upper strata of the village, was used to
enslave the poor and for speculative selling to the bourgeois elements
of the cities. Bukharin, the theoretician of the ruling faction at that
time, tossed to the peasantry his famous slogan, “Get rich!” In the
language of theory that was supposed to mean a gradual growing of the
_kulaks_ into socialism. In practice it meant the enrichment of the
minority at the expense of the overwhelming majority.

Captive to its own policy, the government was compelled to retreat step
by step before the demands of a rural petty bourgeoisie. In 1925 the
hiring of labour power and the renting of land were legalized for
agriculture. The peasantry was becoming polarized between the small
capitalist on one side and the hired hand on the other. At the same
time, lacking industrial commodities, the state was crowded out of the
rural market. Between the _kulak_ and the petty home craftsman there
appeared, as though from under the earth, the middleman. The state
enterprises themselves, in search of raw material, were more and more
compelled to deal with the private trader. The rising tide of capitalism
was visible everywhere. Thinking people saw plainly that a revolution in
the forms of property does not solve the problem of socialism, but only
raises it.

In 1925, when the course toward the _kulak_ was in full swing, Stalin
began to prepare for the denationalization of the land. To a question
asked at his suggestion by a Soviet journalist: “Would it not be
expedient in the interest of agriculture to deed over to each peasant
for 10 years the parcel of land tilled by him?”, Stalin answered: “Yes,
and even for 40 years.” The People’s Commissar of Agriculture of
Georgia, upon Stalin’s own initiative, introduced the draft of a law
denationalizing the land. The aim was to give the farmer confidence in
his own future. While this was going on, in the spring of 1926, almost
60 per cent of the grain destined for sale was in the hands of 6 per
cent of the peasant proprietors! The state lacked grain not only for
foreign trade, but even for domestic needs. The insignificance of
exports made it necessary to forego bringing in articles of manufacture,
and cut down to the limit the import of machinery and raw materials.

Retarding industrialization and striking a blow at the general mass of
the peasants, this policy of banking on the well-to-do farmer revealed
unequivocally inside of two years, 1924-26, its political consequences.
It brought about an extraordinary increase of self-consciousness in the
petty bourgeoisie of both city and village, a capture by them of many of
the lower Soviets, an increase of the power and self-confidence of the
bureaucracy, a growing pressure upon the workers, and the complete
suppression of party and Soviet democracy. The growth of the _kulaks_
alarmed two eminent members of the ruling group, Zinoviev and Kamenev,
who were, significantly, presidents of the Soviets of the two chief
proletarian centers, Leningrad and Moscow. But the provinces, and still
more the bureaucracy, stood firm for Stalin. The course toward the
well-to-do farmer won out. In 1926, Zinoviev and Kamenev with their
adherents joined the Opposition of 1923 (the “Trotskyists”).

Of course “in principle” the ruling group did not even then renounce the
collectivization of agriculture. They merely put it off a few decades in
their perspective. The future People’s Commissar of Agriculture,
Yakovlev, wrote in 1927 that, although the socialist reconstruction of
the village can be accomplished only through collectivization, still
“this obviously cannot be done in one, two or three years, and maybe not
in one decade.” “The collective farms and communes,” he continued, ”...
are now, and will for a long time undoubtedly remain, only small islands
in a sea of individual peasant holdings.”

And in truth at that period only 8 per cent of the peasant families
belonged to the collectives.

The struggle in the party about the so-called “general line”, which had
come to the surface in 1923, became especially intense and passionate in
1926. In its extended platform, which took up all the problems of
industry and economy, the Left Opposition wrote:

“The party ought to resist and crush all tendencies directed to the
annulment or undermining of the nationalization of land, one of the
pillars of the proletarian dictatorship.”

On that question, the Opposition gained the day; direct attempts against
nationalization were abandoned. But the problem, of course, involved
more than forms of property in land.

“To the growth of individual farming [_fermerstvo_] in the country we
must oppose a swifter growth of the collective farms. It is necessary
systematically year by year to set aside a considerable sum to aid the
poor peasants organized in collectives. The whole work of the
co-operatives ought to be imbued with the purpose of converting small
production into a vast collectivised production.”

But this broad program of collectivization was stubbornly regarded as
utopian for the coming years. During the preparations for the 15th Party
Congress, whose task was to expel the Left Opposition, Molotov, the
future president of the Soviet of People’s Commissars, said repeatedly:

“We not slip down (!) into poor peasants illusions about the
collectivization of the broad peasant masses. In the present
circumstances it is no longer possible.”

It was then, according to the calendar, the end of 1927. So far was the
ruling group at that time from its own future policy toward the
peasants!

Those same years (1923-28) were passed in a struggle of the ruling
coalition, Stalin, Molotov, Rykov, Tomsky, Bukharin (Zinoviev and
Kamenev went over to the Opposition in the beginning of 1926), against
the advocates of “super-industrialization” and planned leadership. The
future historian will re-establish with no small surprise the moods of
spiteful disbelief in bold economic initiative with which the government
of the socialist state was wholly imbued. An acceleration of the tempo
of industrialization took place empirically, under impulses from
without, with a crude smashing of all calculations and an extraordinary
increase of overhead expenses. The demand for a five-year plan, when
advanced by the Opposition in 1923, was met with mockery in the spirit
of the petty bourgeois who fears “a leap into the unknown.” As late as
April 1927, Stalin asserted at a plenary meeting of the Central
Committee that to attempt to build the Dnieperstroy hydro-electric
station would be the same thing for us as for a _muzhik_ to buy a
gramophone instead of a cow. This winged aphorism summed up the whole
program. It is worth nothing that during those years the bourgeois press
of the whole world, and the social-democratic press after it, repeated
with sympathy the official attribution to the “Left Opposition” of
industrial romanticism.

Amid the noise of party discussions the peasants were replying to the
lack of industrial goods with a more and more stubborn strike. They
would not take their grain to market, nor increase their sowings. The
right wing (Rykov, Tomsky, Bukharin), who were setting the tone at that
period, demanded a broader scope for capitalist tendencies in the
village through a raising of the price of grain, even at the cost of a
lowered tempo in industry. The sole possible way out under such a policy
would have been to import articles of manufacture in exchange for
exported agricultural raw materials. But this would have meant to form a
“connection” not between peasant economy and the socialist industries,
but between the _kulak_ and world capitalism. It was not worthwhile to
make the October Revolution for that.

“To accelerate industrialization,” answered the representatives of the
Opposition at the party conference of 1926, “in particular by way of
increased taxation on the _kulak_, will produce a large mass of goods
and lower market prices, and this will be to the advantage both of the
worker and of the majority of the peasants ... _Face to the village_
does not mean turn your back to industry; it means industry to the
village. For the ‘face’ of the state, if it does not include industry,
is of no use to the village.”

In answer Stalin thundered against the “fantastic plans” of the
Opposition. Industry must not “rush ahead, breaking away from
agriculture and abandoning the tempo of accumulation in our country.”
The party decisions continued to repeat these maxims of passive
accommodation to the well-off upper circles of the peasantry. The 15th
Party Congress, meeting in December 1927 for the final smashing of the
“super-industrializers”, gave warning of the “danger of a too great
involvement of state capital in big construction.” The ruling faction at
that time still refused to see any other dangers.

In the economic year 1927-28, the so-called restoration period in which
industry worked chiefly with pre-revolutionary machinery, and
agriculture with the old tools, was coming to an end. For any further
advance independent industrial construction on a large scale was
necessary. It was impossible to lead any further gropingly and without
plan.

The hypothetic possibilities of socialist industrialization had been
analyzed by the Opposition as early as 1923-25. their general conclusion
was that, after exhausting the equipment inherited from the bourgeoisie,
the Soviet industries might, on the basis of socialist accumulation,
achieve a rhythm of growth wholly impossible under capitalism. The
leaders of the ruling faction openly ridiculed our cautious coefficients
in the vicinity of 15 to 18 per cent as the fantastic music of an
unknown future. This constituted at that time the essence of the
struggle against “Trotskyism.”

The first official draft of the five-year plan, prepared at last in
1927, was completely saturated with the spirit of stingy tinkering. The
growth of industrial production was projected with a tempo declining
yearly from 9 to 4 per cent. Consumption per person was to increase
during the whole five years 12 per cent! The incredible timidity of
thought in this first plan comes out clearly in the fact that the state
budget at the end of the five years was to constitute in all 16 per cent
of the national income, whereas the budget of tzarist Russia, which had
no intention of creating a socialist society, swallowed 18 per cent! It
is perhaps worth adding that the engineers and economists who drew up
this plan were some years later severely judged and punished by law as
conscious sabotagers acting under the direction of foreign powers. The
accused might have answered, had they dared, that their planning work
corresponded perfectly to the “general line” of the Politburo at that
time and was carried out under its orders.

The struggle of the tendencies was now translated into arithmetical
language. “To present on the 10th anniversary of the October Revolution
such a piddling and completely pessimistic plan,” said the platform of
the Opposition, “means in reality to work against socialism.” A year
later, the Politburo adopted a new five-year plan with an average yearly
increase of production amounting to 9 per cent. The actual course of the
development, however, revealed a stubborn tendency to approach the
coefficients of the “super-industrializers.” After another year, when
the governmental policy had radically changed, the State Planning
Commission drew up a third five-year plan, whose rate of growth came far
nearer than could have been expected to the hypothetical prognosis made
by the Opposition in 1923.

The real history of the economic policy of the Soviet Union, as we thus
see, is very different from the official legend. Unfortunately, such
pious investigators as the Webbs pay not the slightest attention to
this.
 

2. A Sharp Turn: “Five-year Plan in Four Years” and “Complete Collectivization”

Irresoluteness before the individual peasant enterprises, distrust of
large plans, defence of a minimum tempo, neglect of international
problems – all this taken together formed the essence of the theory of
“socialism in one country”, first put forward by Stalin in the autumn of
1924 after the defeat of the proletariat in Germany. Not to hurry with
industrialization, not to quarrel with the _muzhik_, not to count on
world revolution, and above all to protect the power of the party
bureaucracy from criticism! The differentiation of the peasantry was
denounced as an intervention of the Opposition. The above-mentioned
Yakovlev dismissed the Central Statistical Bureau whose records gave the
_kulak_ a greater place than was satisfactory to the authorities, while
the leaders tranquilly asserted that the goods famine was out-living
itself, that “a peaceful tempo in economic development was at hand”,
that the grain collections would in the future be carried on more
“evenly”, etc. The strengthened _kulak_ carried with him the middle
peasant and subjected the cities to a grain blockade. In January 1928
the working class stood face-to-face with the shadow of an advancing
famine. History knows how to play spiteful jokes. In that very month,
when the _kulaks_ were taking the revolution by the throat, the
representatives of the Left Opposition were thrown into prison or
banished to different parts of Siberia in punishment for their “panic”
before the spectre of the _kulak_.

The government tried to pretend that the grain strike was caused by the
naked hostility of the _kulak_ (where did he come from?) to the
socialist state – that is, by ordinary political motives. But the
_kulak_ is little inclined to that kind of “idealism.” If he hid his
grain, it was because the bargain offered him was unprofitable. For the
very same reason he managed to bring under his influence wide sections
of the peasantry. Mere repressions against _kulak_ sabotage were
obviously inadequate. It was necessary to change the policy. Even yet,
however, no little time was spent in vacillation.

Rykov, then still head of the government, announced in July 1928:

“To develop individual farms is ... the chief task of the party.”

And Stalin seconded him:

“There are people who think that individual farms have exhausted their
usefulness, that we should not support them ... These people have
nothing in common with the line of our party.”

Less than a year later, the line of the party had nothing in common with
these words. The dawn of “complete collectivization” was on the horizon.

The new orientation was arrived at just as empirically as the preceding,
and by way of a hidden struggle within the governmental bloc.

“The groups of the right and center are united by a general hostility to
the Opposition” – thus the platform of the Left gave warning a year
before – “and the cutting off of the latter will inevitably accelerate
the coming struggle between these two.”

And so it happened. The leaders of the disintegrating bloc would not for
anything, of course, admit that this prognosis of the left wing, like
many others, had come true. As late as the 19th of October, 1928, Stalin
announced publicly:

“It is time to stop gossiping about the existence of a Right deviation
and a conciliatory attitude towards it in the Politburo of our Central
Committee.”

Both groups at that time were feeling out the party machine. The
repressed party was living on dark rumors and guesses. But in just a few
months the official press, with its usual freedom from embarrassment,
announced that the head of the government, Rykov, “had speculated on the
economic difficulties of the Soviet power”; that the head of the
Communist International, Bukharin, was “a conducting wire of
bourgeois-liberal influences”; that Tomsky, president of the all-Russian
Central Council of Trade Unions, was nothing but a miserable
trade-unionist. All three, Rykov, Bukharin and Tomsky, were members of
the Politburo. Whereas the whole preceding struggle against the Left
Opposition had taken its weapons from the right groups, Bukharin was now
able, without sinning against the truth, to accuse Stalin of using in
his struggle with the Right a part of the condemned Left Opposition
platform.

In one way or another the change was made. The slogan “Get rich!”,
together with the theory of the _kulak_’s growing painlessly into
socialism, was belatedly, but all the more decisively, condemned.
Industrialization was put upon the order of the day. Self-satisfied
quietism was replaced by a panic of haste. The half-forgotten slogan of
Lenin, “catch up with and outstrip”, was filled out with the words, “in
the shortest possible time.” The minimalist five-year plan, already
confirmed in principle by a congress of the party, gave place to a new
plan, the fundamental elements of which were borrowed in toto from the
platform of the shattered Left Opposition. Dnieperstroy, only yesterday
likened to a gramophone, today occupied the center of attention.

After the first new successes the slogan was advanced: “Achieve the
five-year plan in four years.” The startled empires now decided that
everything was possible. Opportunism, as has often happened in history,
turned into its opposite, adventurism. Whereas from 1923 to 1928 the
Politburo had been ready to accept Bukharin’s philosophy of a “tortoise
tempo”, it now lightly jumped from a 20 to a 30 per cent yearly growth,
trying to convert every partial and temporary achievement into a norm,
and losing sight of the conditioning interrelation of the different
branches of industry. The financial holes in the plan were stopped up
with printed paper. During the years of the first plan the number of
bank notes in circulation rose from 1.7 billion to 5.5, and by the
beginning of the second five-year plan had reached 8.4 billion rubles.
The bureaucracy not only freed itself from the political control of the
masses, upon whom this forced industrialization was laying an unbearable
burden, but also from the automatic control exercised by the
_chervonetz_. [2] The currency system, put on a solid basis at the
beginning of the NEP, was now again shaken to its roots.

The chief danger, however, and that not only for the fulfillment of the
plan but for the regime itself, appeared from the side of the peasants.

On the 15th of February 1928, the population of the country learned with
surprise from an editorial in PRAVDA that the villages looked not at all
the way they had been portrayed up to that moment by the authorities,
but on the contrary very much as the expelled Left Opposition had
presented them. The press which only yesterday had been denying the
existence of the _kulaks_, today, on a signal from above, discovered
them not only in the villages, but in the party itself. It was revealed
that the communist nuclei were frequently dominated by rich peasants
possessing complicated machinery, employing hired labour, concealing
from the government hundreds and thousands of _poods_ [3] of grain, and
implacably denouncing the “Trotskyist” policy. The newspapers vied with
each other in printing sensational exposures of how _kulaks_ in the
position of local were denying admission to the party to poor peasants
and hired hands. All the old criteria were turned upside down; minuses
and pluses changed places.

In order to feed the cities, it was necessary immediately to take from
the _kulak_ the daily bread. This could be achieved only by force. The
expropriation of the grain reserve, and that not only of the _kulak_ but
of the middle peasant, was called, in the official language,
“extraordinary measures.” This phrase is supposed to mean that tomorrow
everything will fall back into the old rut. But the peasants did not
believe fine words, and they were right. The violent seizures of grain
deprived the well-off peasants of their motive to increased sowings. The
hired hands and the poor peasant found themselves without work.
Agriculture again arrived in a blind alley, and with it the state. It
was necessary at any cost to reform the “general line.”

Stalin and Molotov, still giving individual farming the chief place,
began to emphasize the necessity of a swifter development of the soviet
and collective farms. But since the bitter need of food did not permit a
cessation of military expenditures into the country, the program of
promoting individual farms was left hanging in the air. It was necessary
to “slip down” to collectivization. The temporary “extraordinary
measures” for the collection of grain developed unexpectedly into a
program of “liquidation of the _kulaks_ as a class.” From the shower of
contradictory commands, more copious than food rations, it became
evident that on the peasant question the government had not only no
five-year plan, but not even a five months’ program.

According to the new plan, drawn up under the spur of a food crisis,
collective farms were at the end of five years to comprise about 20 per
cent of the peasant holdings. This program – whose immensity will be
clear when you consider that during the preceding 10 years
collectivization had affected less than 1 per cent of the country – was
nevertheless by the middle of the five years left far behind. In
November 1929, Stalin, abandoning his own vacillations, announced the
end of individual farming. The peasants, he said, are entering the
collective farms “in whole villages, counties and even provinces.”
Yakovlev, who two years before had insisted that the collectives would
for many years remain only “islands in a sea of peasant holdings”, now
received an order as People’s Commissar of Agriculture to “liquidate the
_kulaks_ as a class”, and establish complete collectivization at the
“earliest possible date.” In the year 1929, the proportion of collective
farms rose from 1.7 per cent to 3.9 per cent. In 1930 it rose to 23.6,
in 1931 to 52.7, in 1932 to 61.5 per cent.

At the present time hardly anybody would be foolish enough to repeat the
twaddle of liberals to the effect that collectivization as a whole was
accomplished by naked force. In former historic epochs the peasants in
their struggle for land have at one time raised an insurrection against
the landlords, at another sent a stream of colonizers into untilled
regions, at still another rushed into all kinds of sects which promised
to reward the _muzhik_ with heaven’s vacancies for his narrow quarters
on earth. Now, after the expropriation of the great estates and the
extreme parcellation of land, the union of these small parcels into big
tracts had become a question of life and death for the peasants, for
agriculture, and for society as a whole.

The problem, however, is far from settled by these general historic
considerations. The real possibilities of collectivization are
determined, not by the depth of the impasse in the villages and not by
the administrative energy of the government, but primarily by the
existing productive resources – that is, the ability of the industries
to furnish large-scale agriculture with the requisite machinery. These
material conditions were lacking. The collective farms were set up with
an equipment suitable in the main only for small-scale farming. In these
conditions an exaggeratedly swift collectivization took the character of
an economic adventure.

Caught unawares by the radicalism of its own shift of policy, the
government did not and could not make even an elementary political
preparation for the new course. Not only the peasant masses, but even
the local organs of power, were ignorant of what was being demanded of
them. The peasants were heated white hot by rumors that their cattle and
property were to be seized by the state. This rumor, too, was not so far
from the truth. Actually realizing their own former caricature of the
Left Opposition, the bureaucracy “robbed the villages.” Collectivization
appeared to the peasant primarily in the form of an expropriation of all
his belongings. They collectivised not only horses, cows, sheep, pigs,
but even new-born chickens. They “dekulakized”, as one foreign observer
wrote, “down to the felt shoes, which they dragged from the feet of
little children.” As a result there was an epidemic selling of cattle
for a song by the peasants, or a slaughter of cattle for meat and hides.

In January 1930, at a Moscow congress, a member of the Central
Committee, Andreyev, drew a two-sided picture of collectivization: On
the one side he asserted that a collective movement powerfully
developing throughout the whole country “will now destroy upon its road
each and every obstacle”; on the other, a predatory sale by the peasants
of their own implements, stock and even seeds before entering the
collectives “is assuming positively menacing proportions.”

However contradictory those two generalizations may be, they show
correctly from opposite sides the epidemic character of collectivization
as a measure of despair. “Complete collectivization”, wrote the same
foreign critic, “plunged the national economy into a condition of ruin
almost without precedent, as though a three years’ war had passed over.”

Twenty-five million isolated peasant egoisms, which yesterday had been
the sole motive force of agriculture – weak like an old farmer’s nag,
but nevertheless forces – the bureaucracy tried to replace at one
gesture by the commands of 2,000 collective farm administrative offices,
lacking technical equipment, agronomic knowledge and the support of the
peasants themselves. The dire consequences of this adventurism soon
followed, and they lasted for a number of years. The total harvest of
grain, which had risen in 1930 to 835 million hundredweight, fell in the
next two years below 700 million. The difference does not seem
catastrophic in itself, but it meant a loss of just that quantity of
grain needed to keep the towns even at their customary hunger norm. In
technical culture, the results were still worse. On the eve of
collectivization the production of sugar had reached almost 100 million
_poods_, and at the height of complete collectivization it had fallen,
owing to a lack of beets, to 48 million _poods_ – that is, to half what
it had been. But the most devastating hurricane hit the animal kingdom.
The number of horses fell 55 per cent – from 34.6 million in 1929 to
15.6 million in 1934. The number of horned cattle fell from 30.7 million
to 19.5 million – that is, 40 per cent. The number of pigs, 55 per cent;
sheep, 66 per cent. The destruction of people – by hunger, cold,
epidemics and measures of repression – is unfortunately less accurately
tabulated than the slaughter of stock, but it also mounts up to
millions. The blame for these sacrifices lies not upon collectivization,
but upon the blind, violent, gambling methods with which it was carried
through. The bureaucracy foresaw nothing. Even the constitutions of the
collectives, which made an attempt to bind up the personal interests of
the peasants with the welfare of the farm, were not published until
after the unhappy villages had been thus cruelly laid waste.

The forced character of this new course arose from the necessity of
finding some salvation from the consequences of the policy of 1923-28.
But even so, collectivization could and should have assumed a more
reasonable tempo and more deliberated forms. Having in its hands both
the power and the industries, the bureaucracy could have regulated the
process without carrying the nation to the edge of disaster. They could
have, and should have, adopted tempos better corresponding to the
material and moral resources of the country.

“Under favourable circumstances, internal and external,” wrote the
émigré organ of the “Left Opposition” in 1930, “the material-technical
conditions of agriculture can in the course of some 10 of 15 years be
transformed to the bottom, and provide the productive basis for
collectivization. However, during the intervening years there would be
time to overthrow the Soviet power more than once.”

This warning was not exaggerated. Never before had the breath of
destruction hung so directly above the territory of the October
Revolution, as in the years of complete collectivization. Discontent,
distrust, bitterness, were corroding the country. The disturbance of the
currency, the mounting up of stable, “conventional”, and free market
prices, the transition from a simulacrum of _trade_ between the state
and the peasants to a grain, meat and milk _levy_, the life-and-death
struggle with mass plunderings of the collective property and mass
concealment of these plunderings, the purely military mobilization of
the party for the struggle against _kulak_ sabotage (after the
“liquidation” of the _kulaks_ as a class) together with this a return to
food cards and hunger rations, and finally a restoration of the passport
system – all these measures revived throughout the country the
atmosphere of the seemingly so long ended civil war.

The supply to the factories of food and raw materials grew worse from
season to season. Unbearable working conditions caused a migration of
labour power, malingering, careless work, breakdown of machines, a high
percentage of trashy products and general low quality. The average
productivity of labour declined 11.7 per cent in 1931. According to an
incidental acknowledgement of Molotov, printed in the whole Soviet
press, industrial production in 1932 rose only 8.5 per cent, instead of
the 36 per cent indicated by the year’s plan. To be sure, the world was
informed soon after this that the five-year plan had been fulfilled in
four years and three months. But that means only that the cynicism of
the bureaucracy in its manipulations of statistics and public opinion is
without limit. That, however, is not the chief thing. Not the fate of
the five-year plan, but the fate of the regime was at stake.

The regime survived.

But that is the merit of the regime itself, which had put down deep
roots in the popular soil. It is in no less degree due to favourable
external circumstances. In those years of economic chaos and civil war
in the villages, the Soviet Union was essentially paralyzed in the face
of a foreign enemy. The discontent of the peasantry swept through the
army. Mistrust and vacillation demoralized the bureaucratic machine, and
the commanding cadres. A blow either from the East or West at that
period might have had fatal consequences.

Fortunately, the first years of a crisis in trade and industry had
created throughout the capitalist world moods of bewildered watchful
waiting. Nobody was ready for war; nobody dared attempt it. Moreover, in
not one of the hostile countries was there an adequate realization of
the acuteness of these social convulsions which where shaking the land
of soviets under the roar of the official music in honor of the “general
line.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In spite of its brevity, our historic outline shows, we hope, how far
removed the actual development of the workers’ state has been from an
idyllic picture of the gradual and steady piling up of successes. From
the crises of the past we shall later on derive important indications
for the future. But, besides that, a historic glance at the economic
policy of the Soviet government and its zigzags has seemed to us
necessary in order to destroy that artificially inculcated
individualistic fetishism which finds the sources of success, both real
and pretended, in the extraordinary quality of the leadership, and not
in the conditions of socialized property created by the revolution.

The objective superiority of the new social regime reveals itself, too,
of course, in the methods of the leaders. But these methods reflect
equally the economic and cultural backwardness of the country, and the
petty-bourgeois provincial conditions in which the ruling cadres were
formed.

It would be the crudest mistake to infer from this that the policy of
the Soviet leaders is of third-rate importance. There is no other
government in the world in whose hands the fate of the whole country is
concentrated to such a degree. The successes and failures of an
individual capitalist depend, not wholly of course, but to a very
considerable and sometimes decisive degree, upon his personal qualities.
Mutatis mutandis, the Soviet government occupies in relation to the
whole economic system the position which a capitalist occupies in
relation to a single enterprise. The centralized character of the
national economy converts the state power into a factor of enormous
significance. But for that very reason the policy of the government must
be judged, not by summarized results, not by naked statistical data, but
by the specific role which conscious foresight and planned leadership
have played in achieving these results.

The zigzags of the governmental course have reflected not only the
objective contradictions of the situation, but also the inadequate
ability of the leaders to understand these contradictions in season and
react prophylactically against them. It is not easy to express mistakes
of the leadership in bookkeeper’s magnitudes, but our schematic
exposition of the history of these zigzags permits the conclusion that
they have imposed upon the Soviet economy an immense burden of overhead
expenses.

It remains of course incomprehensible – at least with a rational
approach to history – how and why a faction the least rich of all in
ideas, and the most burdened with mistakes, should have gained the upper
hand over all other groups, and concentrated an unlimited power in its
hands. Our further analysis will give us a key to this problem too. We
shall see, at the same time, how the bureaucratic methods of autocratic
leadership are coming into sharper and sharper conflict with the demands
of economy and culture, and with what inevitable necessity new crises
and disturbances arise in the development of the Soviet Union.

However, before taking up the dual role of the “socialist” bureaucracy,
we must answer the question: What is the net result of the preceding
successes? Is socialism really achieved in the Soviet Union? Or, more
cautiously: Do the present economic and cultural achievements constitute
a guarantee against the danger of capitalist restoration – just as
bourgeois society at a certain stage of its development became insured
by its own successes against a restoration of serfdom and feudalism?

------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Well-off peasant, employing labour.

2. Theoretical par = $5.

3. 1 _pood_ = approximately 36 lbs.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 3 SOCIALISM AND THE STATE


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. The Transitional Regime

Is it true, as the official authorities assert, that socialism is
already realised in the Soviet Union? And if not, have the achieved
successes at least made sure of its realization within the national
boundaries, regardless of the course of events in the rest of the world?
The preceding critical appraisal of the chief indices of the Soviet
economy ought to give us the point of departure for a correct answer to
this question, but we shall require also certain preliminary theoretical
points of reference.

Marxism sets out from the development of technique as the fundamental
spring of progress, and constructs the communist program upon the
dynamic of the productive forces. If you conceive that some cosmic
catastrophe is going to destroy our planet in the fairly near future,
then you must, of course, reject the communist perspective along with
much else. Except for this as yet problematic danger, however, there is
not the slightest scientific ground for setting any limit in advance to
our technical productive and cultural possibilities. Marxism is
saturated with the optimism of progress, and that alone, by the way,
makes it irreconcilably opposed to religion.

The material premise of communism should be so high a development of the
economic powers of man that productive labour, having ceased to be a
burden, will not require any goad, and the distribution of life’s goods,
existing in continual abundance, will not demand – as it does not now in
any well-off family or “decent” boarding-house – any control except that
of education, habit and social opinion. Speaking frankly, I think it
would be pretty dull-witted to consider such a really modest perspective
“utopian.”

Capitalism prepared the conditions and forces for a social revolution:
technique, science and the proletariat. The communist structure cannot,
however, immediately replace the bourgeois society. The material and
cultural inheritance from the past is wholly inadequate for that. In its
first steps the workers’ state cannot yet permit everyone to work
“according to his abilities” – that is, as much as he can and wishes to
– nor can it reward everyone “according to his needs”, regardless of the
work he does. In order to increase the productive forces, it is
necessary to resort to the customary norms of wage payment – that is, to
the distribution of life’s goods in proportion to the quantity and
quality of individual labour.

Marx named this first stage of the new society “the lowest stage of
communism”, in distinction from the highest, where together with the
last phantoms of want material inequality will disappear. In this sense
socialism and communism are frequently contrasted as the lower and
higher stages of the new society. “We have not yet, of course,
_complete_ communism,” reads the present official Soviet doctrine, “but
we have already achieved socialism – that is, the _lowest_ stage of
communism.” In proof of this, they adduce the dominance of the state
trusts in industry, the collective farms in agriculture, the state and
co-operative enterprises in commerce. At first glance this gives a
complete correspondence with the _a priori_ – and therefore hypothetical
– scheme of Marx. But it is exactly for the Marxist that this question
is not exhausted by a consideration of forms of property regardless of
the achieved productivity of labour. By the lowest stage of communism
Marx meant, at any rate, a society which from the very beginning stands
higher in its economic development than the most advanced capitalism.
Theoretically such a conception is flawless, for taken on a world scale
communism, even in its first incipient stage, means a higher level of
development that that of bourgeois society. Moreover, Marx expected that
the Frenchman would begin the social revolution, the German continue it,
the Englishman finish it; and as to the Russian, Marx left him far in
the rear. But this conceptual order was upset by the facts. Whoever
tries now mechanically to apply the universal historic conception of
Marx to the particular case of the Soviet Union at the given stage of
its development, will be entangled at once in hopeless contradictions.

Russia was not the strongest, but the weakest link in the chain of
capitalism. The present Soviet Union does not stand above the world
level of economy, but is only trying to catch up to the capitalist
countries. If Marx called that society which was to be formed upon the
basis of a socialization of the productive forces of the most advanced
capitalism of its epoch, the lowest stage of communism, then this
designation obviously does not apply to the Soviet Union, which is still
today considerably poorer in technique, culture and the good things of
life than the capitalist countries. It would be truer, therefore, to
name the present Soviet regime in all its contradictoriness, not a
socialist regime, but a preparatory regime transitional from capitalism
to socialism.

There is not an ounce of pedantry in this concern for terminological
accuracy. The strength and stability of regimes are determined in the
long run by the relative productivity of their labour. A socialist
economy possessing a technique superior to that of capitalism would
really be guaranteed in its socialist development for sure – so to
speak, automatically – a thing which unfortunately it is still quite
impossible to say about the Soviet economy.

A majority of the vulgar defenders of the Soviet Union as it is are
inclined to reason approximately thus: Even though you concede that the
present Soviet regime is not yet socialistic, a further development of
the productive forces on the present foundations must sooner or later
lead to the complete triumph of socialism. Hence only the factor of time
is uncertain. And it is worth while making a fuss about that? However
triumphant such an argument seems at first glance, it is in fact
extremely superficial. Time is by no means a secondary factor when
historic processes are in question. It is far more dangerous to confuse
the present and the future tenses in politics than in grammar. Evolution
is far from consisting, as vulgar evolutionists of the Webb type
imagine, in a steady accumulation and continual “improvement” of that
which exists. It has its transitions of quantity into quality, its
crises, leaps and backward lapses. It is exactly because the Soviet
Union is as yet far from having attained the first stage of socialism,
as a balanced system of production and distribution, that is development
does not proceed harmoniously, but in contradictions. Economic
contradictions produce social antagonisms, which in turn develop their
own logic, not awaiting the further growth of the productive forces. We
have just seen how true this was in the case of the _kulak_ who did not
wish to “grow” evolutionarily into socialism, and who, to the surprise
of the bureaucracy and its ideologues, demanded a new and supplementary
revolution. Will the bureaucracy itself, in whose hands the power and
wealth are concentrated, wish to grow more peacefully into socialism? As
to this, doubts are certainly permissible. In any case, it would be
imprudent to take the word of the bureaucracy for it. It is impossible
at present to answer finally and irrevocably the question in what
direction the economic contradictions and social antagonisms of Soviet
society will develop in the course of the next three, five or 10 years.
The outcome depends upon a struggle of living social forces – not on a
national scale, either, but on an international scale. At every new
stage, therefore, a concrete analysis is necessary of actual relations
and tendencies in their connection and continual interaction. We shall
now see the importance of such an analysis in the case of the state.
 

2. Program and Reality

Lenin, following Marx and Engels, saw the first distinguishing features
of the proletarian revolution in the fact that, having expropriated the
exploiters, it would abolish the necessity of a bureaucratic apparatus
raised above society – and above all, a police and standing army.

“The proletariat needs a state – this all the opportunists can tell
you,” wrote Lenin in 1917, two months before the seizure of power, “but
they, the opportunists, forget to add that the proletariat needs only a
dying state – that is, a state constructed in such a way that it
immediately begins to die away and cannot help dying away.” (STATE AND
REVOLUTION)

This criticism was directed at the time against reformist socialists of
the type of the Russian mensheviks, British Fabians, etc. It now attacks
with redoubled force the Soviet idolators with their cult of a
bureaucratic state which has not the slightest intention of “dying
away.”

The social demand for a bureaucracy arise in all those situations where
sharp antagonisms need to be “softened”, “adjusted”, “regulated” (always
in the interests of the privileged, the possessors, and always to the
advantage of the bureaucracy itself). Throughout all bourgeois
revolutions, therefore, no matter how democratic, there has occurred a
reinforcement and perfecting of the bureaucratic apparatus.

“Officialdom and the standing army –“ writes Lenin, “that is a
‘parasite’ on the body of bourgeois society, a parasite created by the
inner contradictions which tear this society, yet nothing but a parasite
stopping up the living pores.”

Beginning with 1917 – that is, from the moment when the conquest of
power confronted the party as a practical problem – Lenin was
continually occupied with the thought of liquidating this “parasite.”
After the overthrow of the exploiting classes – he repeats and explains
in every chapter of STATE AND REVOLUTION – the proletariat will shatter
the old bureaucratic machine and create its own apparatus out of
employees and workers. And it will take measures against their turning
into bureaucrats –

“measures analyzed in detail by Marx and Engels: (1) not only election
but recall at any time; (2) payment no higher than the wages of a
worker; (3) immediate transition to a regime in which all will fulfill
the functions of control and supervision so that all may for a time
become ‘bureaucrats’, and therefore nobody can become a bureaucrat.”

You must not think that Lenin was talking about the problems of a
decade. No, this was the first step with which “we should and must begin
upon achieving a proletarian revolution.”

This same bold view of the state in a proletarian dictatorship found
finished expression a year and a half after the conquest of power in the
program of the Bolshevik party, including its section on the army. A
strong state, but without mandarins; armed power, but without the
Samurai! It is not the tasks of defence which create a military and
state bureaucracy, but the class structure of society carried over into
the organisation of defence. The army is only a copy of the social
relations. The struggle against foreign danger necessitates, of course,
in the workers’ state as in others, a specialized military technical
organisation, but in no case a privileged officer caste. The party
program demands a replacement of the standing army by an armed people.

The regime of proletarian dictatorship from its very beginning thus
ceases to be a “state” in the old sense of the word – a special
apparatus, that is, for holding in subjection the majority of the
people. The material power, together with the weapons, goes over
directly and immediately into the hands of the workers’ organisations
such as the soviets. The state as a bureaucratic apparatus begins to die
away the first day of the proletarian dictatorship. Such is the voice of
the party program – not voided to this day. Strange: it sounds like a
spectral voice from the mausoleum.

However you may interpret the nature of the present Soviet state, on
thing is indubitable: at the end of its second decade of existence, it
has not only not died away, but not begun to “die away.” Worse than
that, it has grown into a hitherto unheard of apparatus of compulsion.
The bureaucracy not only has not disappeared, yielding its place to the
masses, but has turned into an uncontrolled force dominating the masses.
The army not only has not been replaced by an armed people, but has
given birth to a privileged officers’ caste, crowned with marshals,
while the people, “the armed bearers of the dictatorship”, are now
forbidden in the Soviet Union to carry even nonexplosive weapons. With
the utmost stretch of fancy it would be difficult to imagine a contrast
more striking than that which exists between the scheme of the workers’
state according to Marx, Engels and Lenin, and the actual state now
headed by Stalin. While continuing to publish the works of Lenin (to be
sure, with excerpts and distortions by the censor), the present leaders
of the Soviet Union and their ideological representatives do not even
raise the question of the causes of such a crying divergence between
program and reality. We will try to do this for them.
 

3. The Dual Character of the Workers’ State

The proletarian dictatorship is just a bridge between the bourgeois and
the socialist society. In its very essence, therefore, it bears a
temporary character. An incidental but very essential task of the state
which realizes the dictatorship consists in preparing for its own
dissolution. The degree of the realization of this “incidental” task is,
to some extent, a measure of its success in the fulfillment of its
fundamental mission: the construction of a society without classes and
without material contradictions. Bureaucracy and social harmony are
inversely proportional to each other.

In his famous polemic against Dühring, Engels wrote:

“When, together with class domination and the struggle for individual
existence created by the present anarchy in production, those conflicts
and excesses which result from this struggle disappear, from that time
on there will be nothing to suppress, and there will be no need for a
special instrument of suppression, the state.”

The philistine considers the gendarme an eternal institution. In
reality, the gendarme will bridle mankind only until man shall
thoroughly bridle nature. In order that the state shall disappear,
“class domination and the struggle for individual existence” must
disappear. Engels joins these two conditions together, for in the
perspective of changing social regimes a few decades amount to nothing.
But the thing looks different to those generations who bear the weight
of a revolution. It is true that capitalist anarchy creates the struggle
of each against all, but the trouble is that a socialization of the
means of production does not yet automatically remove the “struggle for
individual existence.” That is the nub of the question!

A socialist state even in America, on the basis of the most advanced
capitalism, could not immediately provide everyone with as much as he
needs, and would therefore be compelled to spur everyone to produce as
much as possible. The duty of the stimulator in these circumstances
naturally falls to the state, which in its turn cannot but resort, with
various changes and mitigations, to the method of labour payment worked
out by capitalism. It was in this sense that Marx wrote in 1875:

“Bourgeois law ... is inevitable in the first phase of the communist
society, in that form in which it issues after long labour pains from
capitalist society. Law can never be higher than the economic structure
and the cultural development of society conditioned by that structure.”

In explaining these remarkable lines, Lenin adds:

“Bourgeois law in relation to the distribution of the objects of
consumption assumes, of course, inevitably a bourgeois state, for law is
nothing without an apparatus capable of compelling observance of its
norms. It follows (we are still quoting Lenin) that under Communism not
only will bourgeois law survive for a certain time, but also even a
bourgeois state without the bourgeoisie!”

This highly significant conclusion, completely ignored by the present
official theoreticians, has a decisive significance for the
understanding of the nature of the Soviet state – or more accurately,
for a first approach to such understanding. Insofar as the state which
assumes the task of socialist transformation is compelled to defend
inequality – that is, the material privileges of a minority – by methods
of compulsion, insofar does it also remain a “bourgeois” state, even
though without a bourgeoisie. These words contain neither praise nor
blame; they name things with their real name.

The bourgeois norms of distribution, by hastening the growth of material
power, ought to serve socialist aims – but only in the last analysis.
The state assumes directly and from the very beginning a dual character:
socialistic, insofar as it defends social property in the means of
production; bourgeois, insofar as the distribution of life’s goods is
carried out with a capitalistic measure of value and all the
consequences ensuing therefrom. Such a contradictory characterization
may horrify the dogmatists and scholastics; we can only offer them our
condolences.

The final physiognomy of the workers’ state ought to be determined by
the changing relations between its bourgeois and socialist tendencies.
The triumph of the latter ought _ipso facto_ to signify the final
liquidation of the gendarme – that is, the dissolving of the state in a
self-governing society. From this alone it is sufficiently clear how
immeasurably significant is the problem of Soviet bureaucratism, both in
itself and as a system!

It is because Lenin, in accord with his whole intellectual temper, gave
an extremely sharpened expression to the conception of Marx, that he
revealed the source of the future difficulties, his own among them,
although he did not himself succeed in carrying his analysis through to
the end. “A bourgeois state without a bourgeoisie” proved inconsistent
with genuine Soviet democracy. The dual function of the state could not
but affect its structure. Experience revealed what theory was unable
clearly to foresee. If for the defence of socialized property against
bourgeois counterrevolution a “state of armed workers” was fully
adequate, it was a very different matter to regulate inequalities in the
sphere of consumption. Those deprived of property are not inclined to
create and defend it. The majority cannot concern itself with the
privileges of the minority. For the defence of “bourgeois law” the
workers’ state was compelled to create a “bourgeois” type of instrument
– that is, the same old gendarme, although in a new uniform.

We have thus taken the first step toward understanding the fundamental
contradictions between Bolshevik program and Soviet reality. If the
state does not die away, but grows more and more despotic, if the
plenipotentiaries of the working class become bureaucratized, and the
bureaucracy rises above the new society, this is not for some secondary
reasons like the psychological relics of the past, etc., but is a result
of the iron necessity to give birth to and support a privileged minority
so long as it is impossible to guarantee genuine equality.

The tendencies of bureaucratism, which strangles the workers’ movement
in capitalist countries, would everywhere show themselves even after a
proletarian revolution. But it is perfectly obvious that the poorer the
society which issues from a revolution, the sterner and more naked would
be the expression of this “law”, the more crude would be the forms
assumed by bureaucratism, and the more dangerous would it become for
socialist development. The Soviet state is prevented not only from dying
away, but even from freeing itself of the bureaucratic parasite, not by
the “relics” of former ruling classes, as declares the naked police
doctrine of Stalin, for those relics are powerless in themselves. It is
prevented by immeasurably mightier factors, such as material want,
cultural backwardness and the resulting dominance of “bourgeois law” in
what most immediately and sharply touches every human being, the
business of insuring his personal existence.
 

4. “Generalized Want” and the Gendarme

Two years before the COMMUNIST MANIFESTO, young Marx wrote:

“A development of the productive forces is the absolutely necessary
practical premise [of Communism], because without it want is
generalized, and with want the struggle for necessities begins again,
and that means that all the old crap must revive.”

This thought Marx never directly developed, and for no accidental
reason: he never foresaw a proletarian revolution in a backward country.
Lenin also never dwelt upon it, and this too was not accidental. He did
not foresee so prolonged an isolation of the Soviet state. Nevertheless,
the citation, merely an abstract construction with Marx, an inference
from the opposite, provides an indispensable theoretical key to the
wholly concrete difficulties and sicknesses of the Soviet regime. On the
historic basis of destitution, aggravated by the destructions of the
imperialist and civil wars, the “struggle for individual existence” not
only did not disappear the day after the overthrow of the bourgeoisie,
and not only did not abate in the succeeding years, but, on the
contrary, assumed at times an unheard-of ferocity. Need we recall that
certain regions of the country have twice gone to the point of
cannibalism?

The distance separating tzarist Russia from the West can really be
appreciated only now. In the most favourable conditions – that is, in
the absence of inner disturbances and external catastrophes – it would
require several more five-year periods before the Soviet Union could
fully assimilate those economic and educative achievements upon which
the first-born nations of capitalist civilization have expended
centuries. The application of socialist methods for the solution of
pre-socialist problems – that is the very essence of the present
economic and cultural work in the Soviet Union.

The Soviet Union, to be sure, even now excels in productive forces the
most advanced countries of the epoch of Marx. But in the first place, in
the historic rivalry of two regimes, it is not so much a question of
absolutely as of relative levels: the Soviet economy opposes the
capitalism of Hitler, Baldwin, and Roosevelt, not Bismarck, Palmerston,
or Abraham Lincoln. And in the second place, the very scope of human
demands changes fundamentally with the growth of world technique. The
contemporaries of Marx knew nothing of automobiles, radios, moving
pictures, aeroplanes. A socialist society, however, is unthinkable
without the free enjoyment of these goods.

“The lowest stage of Communism”, to employ the term of Marx, begins at
that level to which the most advanced capitalism has drawn near. The
real program of the coming Soviet five-year plan, however, is to “catch
up with Europe and America.” The construction of a network of autoroads
and asphalt highways in the measureless spaces of the Soviet Union will
require much more time and material than to transplant automobile
factories from America, or even to acquire their technique. How many
years are needed in order to make it possible for every Soviet citizen
to use an automobile in any direction he chooses, refilling his gas tank
without difficulty en route? In barbarian society the rider and the
pedestrian constituted two classes. The automobile differentiates
society no less than the saddle horse. So long as even a modest “Ford”
remains the privilege of a minority, there survive all the relations and
customs proper to a bourgeois society. And together with them there
remains the guardian of inequality, the state.

Basing himself wholly upon the Marxian theory of the dictatorship of the
proletariat, Lenin did not succeed, as we have said, either in his chief
work dedicated to this question (STATE AND REVOLUTION), or in the
program of the party, in drawing all the necessary conclusions as to the
character of the state from the economic backwardness and isolatedness
of the country. Explaining the revival of bureaucratism by the
unfamiliarity of the masses with administration and by the special
difficulties resulting from the war, the program prescribes merely
political measures for the overcoming of “bureaucratic distortions”:
elections and recall at any time of all plenipotentiaries, abolition of
material privileges, active control by the masses, etc. It was assumed
that along this road the bureaucrat, from being a boss, would turn into
a simple and moreover temporary technical agent, and the state would
gradually and imperceptibly disappear from the scene.

This obvious underestimation of impending difficulties is explained by
the fact that the program was based wholly upon an international
perspective. “The October revolution in Russia has realised the
dictatorship of the proletariat ... The era of world proletarian
communist revolution has begun.” These were the introductory lines of
the program. Their authors not only did not set themselves the aim of
constructing “socialism in a single country” – this idea had not entered
anybody’s head then, and least of all Stalin’s – but they also did not
touch the question as to what character the Soviet state would assume,
if compelled for as long as two decades to solve in isolation those
economic and cultural problems which advanced capitalism had solved so
long ago.

The post-war revolutionary crisis did not lead to the victory of
socialism in Europe. The social democrats rescued the bourgeoisie. That
period, which to Lenin and his colleagues looked like a short “breathing
spell”, has stretched out to a whole historical epoch. The contradictory
social structure of the Soviet Union, and the ultra-bureaucratic
character of its state, are the direct consequences of this unique and
“unforeseen” historical pause, which has at the same time led in the
capitalist countries to fascism or the pre-fascist reaction.

While the first attempt to create a state cleansed of bureaucratism fell
foul, in the first place, of the unfamiliarity of the masses with
self-government, the lack of qualified workers devoted to socialism,
etc., it very soon after these immediate difficulties encountered others
more profound. That reduction of the state to functions of “accounting
and control”, with a continual narrowing of the functions of compulsion,
demanded by the party program, assumed at least a relative condition of
general contentment. Just this necessary condition was lacking. No help
came from the West. The power of the democratic Soviets proved cramping,
even unendurable, when the task of the day was to accommodate those
privileged groups whose existence was necessary for defence, for
industry, for technique, and science. In this decidedly not
“socialistic” operation, taking from 10 and giving to one, these
crystallized out and developed a powerful caste of specialists in
distribution.

How and why is it, however, that the enormous economic successes of the
recent period have led not to a mitigation, but on the contrary to a
sharpening, of inequalities, and at the same time to a further growth of
bureaucratism, such that from being a “distortion”, it has now become a
system of administration? Before attempting to answer this question, let
us hear how the authoritative leaders of the Soviet bureaucracy look
upon their own regime.
 

5. The “Complete Triumph of Socialism” and the “Reinforcement of the Dictatorship”

There have been several announcements during recent years of the
“complete triumph” of socialism in the Soviet Union – taking especially
categorical forms in connection with the “liquidation of the _kulaks_ as
a class.” On January 30, 1931, Pravda, interpreting a speech of Stalin,
said: “During the second five-year period, the _last relics_ of
capitalist elements in our economy will be liquidated” (italics ours).
From the point of view of this perspective, the state ought conclusively
to die away during the same period, for where the “last relics” of
capitalism are liquidated the state has nothing to do.

“The Soviet power,” says the program of the Bolshevik party on this
subject, “openly recognizes the inevitability of the class character of
every state, so long as the division of society into classes, and
therewith all state power, has not completely disappeared.”

However, when certain incautious Moscow theoreticians attempted, from
the liquidation of the “last relics” of capitalism taken on faith, to
infer they dying away of the state, the bureaucracy immediately declared
such theories “counterrevolutionary.”

Where lies the theoretical mistake of the bureaucracy – in the basic
premise or the conclusion? In the one and the other. To the first
announcement of “complete triumph”, the Left Opposition answered: You
must not limit yourself to the socio-juridical form of relations which
are unripe, contradictory, in agriculture still very unstable,
abstracting from the fundamental criterion: level of the productive
forces. Juridical forms themselves have an essentially different social
content in dependence upon the height of the technical level. “Law can
never be higher than the economic structure and the cultural level
conditioned by it.” (Marx) Soviet forms of property on a basis of the
most modern achievement of American technique transplanted into all
branches of economic life – that would indeed be the first stage of
socialism. Soviet forms with a low productivity of labour mean only a
transitional regime whose destiny history has not yet finally weighed.

“Is it not monstrous?” – we wrote in March 1932. “The country can not
get out of a famine of goods. There is a stoppage of supplies at every
step. Children lack milk. But the official oracles announce: ’The
country has entered into the period of socialism!’ Would it be possible
more viciously to compromise the name of socialism?” Karl Radek, now a
prominent publicist [1] of the ruling Soviet circles, parried these
remarks in the German liberal paper, BERLINER TAGEBLATT, in a special
issue devoted to the Soviet Union (May 1932), in the following words
which deserve to be immortal:

“Milk is a product of cows and not of socialism, and you would have
actually to confuse socialism with the image of a country where rivers
flow milk, in order not to understand that a country can rise for a time
to a higher level of development without any considerable rise in the
material situation of the popular masses.”

These lines were written when a horrible famine was raging in the
country.

Socialism is a structure of planned to the end of the best satisfaction
of human needs; otherwise it does not deserve the name of socialism. If
cows are socialized, but there are too few of them, or they have too
meagre udders, then conflicts arise out of the inadequate supply of milk
– conflicts between city and country, between collectives and individual
peasants, between different state of the proletariat, between the whole
toiling mass and bureaucracy. It was in fact the socialization of the
cows which led to their mass extermination by the peasants. Social
conflicts created by want can in their turn lead to a resurrection of
“all the old crap.” Such was, in essence, our answer.

The 7th Congress of the Communist International, in a resolution of
August 29, 1935, solemnly affirmed that in the sum total of the
successes of the nationalized industries, the achievement of
collectivization, the crowding out of capitalist elements and the
liquidation of the _kulaks_ as a class, “the final and irrevocable
triumph of socialism and the all-sided reinforcement of the state of the
proletarian dictatorship, is achieved in the Soviet Union.” With all its
categorical tone, this testimony of the Communist International is
wholly self-contradictory. If socialism has “finally and irrevocably”
triumphed, not as a principle but as a living social regime, then a
renewed “reinforcement” of the dictatorship is obvious nonsense. And on
the contrary, if the reinforcement of the dictatorship is evoked by the
real demands of the regime, that means that the triumph of socialism is
still remote. Not only a Marxist, but any realistic political thinker,
ought to understand that the very necessity of “reinforcing” the
dictatorship – that is, governmental repression – testifies not to the
triumph of a classless harmony, but to the growth of new social
antagonisms. What lies at the bottom of all this? Lack of the means of
subsistence from the low productivity of labour.

Lenin once characterized socialism as “the Soviet power plus
electrification.” That epigram, whose one-sidedness was due to the
propaganda aims of the moment, assumed at least as a minimum starting
point the capitalist level of electrification. At present in the Soviet
Union there is ¹/3 as much electrical energy per head of the population
as in the advanced countries. If you take into consideration that the
soviets have given place in the meantime to a political machine that is
independent of the masses, the Communist International has nothing left
but to declare that socialism is bureaucratic power plus ¹/3 of the
capitalist electrification. Such a definition would be photographically
accurate, but for socialism it is not quite enough! In a speech to the
Stakhanovists in November 1935, Stalin, obedient to the empirical aims
of the conference, unexpectedly announced:

“Why can and should and necessarily will socialism conquer the
capitalist system of economy? Because it can give ... a higher
productivity of labour.”

Incidentally rejecting the resolution of the Communist International
adopted three months before upon the same question, and also his own
oft-repeated announcements, Stalin here speaks of the “triumph” of
socialism in the future tense. Socialism will conquer the capitalist
system, he says, when it surpasses it in the productivity of labour. Not
only the tenses of the verbs but the social criteria change, as we see,
from moment to moment. It is certainly not easy for the Soviet citizen
to keep up with the “general line.”

Finally, on March 1, 1936, in a conversation with Roy Howard, Stalin
offered a new definition of the Soviet regime:

“That social organisation which we have created may be called a Soviet
socialist organisation, still not wholly completed, but at root a
socialist organisation of society.”

In this purposely vague definition there are almost as many
contradictions as there are words. The social organisation is called
“Soviet socialist”, but the Soviets are a form of state, and socialism
is a social regime. These designations are not only not identical but,
from the point of view of our interest, antagonistic. Insofar as the
social organisation has become socialistic, the soviets ought to drop
away like the scaffolding after a building is finished. Stalin
introduces a correction: Socialism is “still not wholly completed.” What
does “not wholly” mean? By 5 per cent, or by 75 per cent? This they do
not tell us, just as they do not tell us what they mean by an
organisation of society that is “socialistic at root.” Do they mean
forms of property or technique? The very mistiness of the definition,
however, implies a retreat from the immeasurably more categorical
formula of 1931-35. A further step along the same road would be to
acknowledge that the “root” of every social organisation is the
productive forces, and that the Soviet root is just what is not mighty
enough for the socialist trunk and for its leafage: human welfare.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _TRANSLATOR’S NOTE_ – written before the arrest of Karl Radek in
August 1936 on charges of a terroristic conspiracy against the Soviet
leaders.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 4 THE STRUGGLE FOR PRODUCTIVITY OF LABOR


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Money and Plan

We have attempted to examine the Soviet regime in the cross-section of
currency. These two problems, state and money, have a number of traits
in common, for they both reduce themselves in the last analysis to the
problem of problems: productivity of labour. State compulsion like money
compulsion is an inheritance from the class society, which is incapable
of defining the relations of man by man except in the form of fetishes,
churchly or secular, after appointing to defend them the most alarming
of all fetishes, the state, with a great knife between its teeth. In a
communist society, the state and money will disappear. Their gradual
dying away ought consequently to begin under socialism. We shall be able
to speak of the actual triumph of socialism only at that historical
moment when the state turns into a semi-state, and money begins to lose
its magic power. This will mean that socialism, having freed itself from
capitalist fetishes, is beginning to create a more lucid, free and
worthy relation among men. Such characteristically anarchist demands as
the “abolition” of money, “abolition” of wages, or “liquidation” of the
state and family, possess interest merely as models of mechanical
thinking. Money cannot be arbitrarily “abolished”, nor the state and the
old family “liquidated.” They have to exhaust their historic mission,
evaporate, and fall away. The deathblow to money fetishism will be
struck only upon that stage when the steady growth of social wealth has
made us bipeds forget our miserly attitude toward every excess minute of
labour, and our humiliating fear about the size of our ration. Having
lost its ability to bring happiness or trample men in the dust, money
will turn into mere bookkeeping receipts for the convenience of
statisticians and for planning purposes. In the still more distant
future, probably these receipts will not be needed. But we can leave
this question entirely to posterity, who will be more intelligent than
we are.

The nationalization of the means of production and credit, the
co-operative or state-izing of internal trade, the monopoly of foreign
trade, the collectivization of agriculture, the law on inheritance – set
strict limits upon the personal accumulation of money and hinder its
conversion into private capital (usurious, commercial and industrial).
These functions of money, however, bound up as they are with
exploitation, are not liquidated at the beginning of a proletarian
revolution, but in a modified form are transferred to the state, the
universal merchant, creditor and industrialist. At the same time the
more elementary functions of money, as measures of value, means of
exchange and medium of payment, are not only preserved, but acquire a
broader field of action than they had under capitalism.

Administrative planning has sufficiently revealed its power – but
therewith also the limits of its power. An _a priori_ economic plan –
above all in a backward country with 170 million population, and a
profound contradiction between city and country – is not a fixed gospel,
but a rough working hypothesis which must be verified and reconstructed
in the process of its fulfillment. We might indeed lay down a rule: the
more “accurately” an administrative task is fulfilled, the worse is the
economic leadership. For the regulation and application of plans two
levers are needed: the political lever, in the form of a real
participation in leadership of the interested masses themselves, a thing
which is unthinkable without Soviet democracy; and a financial lever, in
the form of a real testing out of a priori calculations with the help of
a universal equivalent, a thing that is unthinkable without a stable
money system.

The role of money in the Soviet economy is not only unfinished but, as
we have said, still has a long growth ahead. The transitional epoch
between capitalism and socialism taken as a whole does not mean a
cutting down of trade, but, on the contrary, its extraordinary
extension. All branches of industry transform themselves and grow. New
ones continually arise, and all are compelled to define their relations
to one another both quantitatively and qualitatively. The liquidation of
the consummatory peasant economy, and at the same time of the shut-in
family life, means a transfer to the sphere of social interchange, and
_ipso facto_ money circulation, of all the labour energy which was
formerly expended within the limits of the peasant’s yard, or within the
walls of his private dwelling. All products and services begin for the
first time in history to be exchanged for one another.

On the other hand, a successful socialist construction is unthinkable
without including in the planned system the direct personal interests of
the producer and consumer, their egoism, – which in its turn may reveal
itself fruitfully only if it has in its service the customary reliable
and flexible instrument, money. The raising of the productivity of
labour and bettering of the quality of its products is quite
unattainable without an accurate measure freely penetrating into all the
cells of industry – that is, without a stable unit of currency. Hence it
is clear that in the transitional economy, as also under capitalism, the
sole authentic money is that based upon gold. All other money is only a
substitute. To be sure, the Soviet state has in its hand at the same
time the mass of commodities and the machinery for printing money.
However, this does not change the situation. Administrative
manipulations in the sphere of commodity prices do not in the slightest
degree create, or replace, a stable money unit either for domestic or
foreign trade. Deprived of an independent basis – that is, a gold basis
– the money system of the Soviet Union, like that of a number of
capitalist countries, has necessarily a shut-in character. For the world
market the ruble does not exist. If the Soviet Union can endure the
adverse aspects of this money system more easily than Germany and Italy,
it is only in part due to the natural wealth of the country. Only this
makes it possible not to struggle in the clutches of autarchy. The
historic task, however, is not merely not avoid strangling, but to
create face to face with the highest achievements of the world market a
powerful economy, rational through and through, which will guarantee the
greatest saving of time and consequently the highest flowering of
culture.

The dynamic Soviet economy, passing as it does through continual
technical revolutions and large-scale experiments, needs more than any
other continual testing by means of a stable measure of value.
Theoretically there cannot be the slightest doubt that if the Soviet
economy had possessed a gold ruble, the result of the five-year plan
would be incomparably more favourable than they are now. Of course you
cannot “poss the impossible” [_Ha nyet cuda nyet_]. But you must not
make a virtue of necessity, for that leads in turn to additional
economic mistakes and losses.
 

2. “Socialist” Inflation

The history of the Soviet currency is not only a history of economic
difficulties, successes and failures, but also a history of the zigzags
of bureaucratic thought.

The restoration of the ruble in 1922-24, in connection with the transfer
to the NEP, was directly bound up with the restoration of the “norms of
bourgeois right” in the distribution of objects of consumption. So long
as the course toward the well-to-do farmer continued, the _chervonetz_
was an object of governmental concern. During the first period of the
five-year plan, on the contrary, all the sluices of inflation were
opened. From 0.7 billion rubles at the beginning of 1925, the total
issue of currency had arisen by the beginning of 1928 to the
comparatively modest sum of 1.7 billions, which is approximately
comparable to the paper money circulation of tzarist Russia on the eve
of the war – but this, of course, without its former metallic basis. The
subsequent curve of inflation from year to year is depicted in the
following feverish series: 2.0 – 2.8 – 4.3 – 5.5 – 8.4! The final figure
8.4 billion rubles was reached at the beginning of 1933. After that came
the years of reconsideration and retreat: 6.9 – 7.7 – 7.9 billion
(1935). The ruble of 1924, equal in the official exchange to 13 francs,
had been reduced in November 1935 to 3 francs – that is, to less than a
fourth of its value, or almost as much as the French franc was reduced
as a result of the war. Both parties, the old and the new, are very
conditional in character; the purchasing power of the ruble in world
prices now hardly equal 1.5 francs. Nevertheless the scale of
devaluation shows with what dizzy speed the Soviet valuta was sliding
downhill until 1934.

In the full flight of his economic adventurism, Stalin promised to send
the NEP – that is, market relations – “to the devil.” The entire press
wrote, as in 1918, about the final replacement of merchant sale by
“direct socialist distribution”, the external sigh of which was the food
card. At the same time, inflation was categorically rejected as a
phenomenon inconsistent with the Soviet system.

“The stability of the Soviet valuta,” said Stalin in 1933, “is
guaranteed primarily by the immense quantity of commodities in the hands
of the state put in circulation at stable prices.”

Notwithstanding the fact that this enigmatical aphorism received neither
development nor elucidation (partly indeed because of this), it became a
fundamental law of the Soviet theory of money – or, more accurately, of
that very inflation which it rejected. The _chervonetz_ proved
thereafter to be not a universal equivalent, but only the universal
shadow of an “immense” quantity of commodities. And like all shadows, it
possessed the right to shorten and lengthen itself. If this consoling
doctrine made any sense at all, it was only this: the Soviet money has
ceased to be money; it serves no longer as a measure of value; “stable
prices” are designated by the state power; the _chervonetz_ is only a
conventional label of the planned economy – that is, a universal
distribution card. In a word, socialism has triumphed “finally and
irrevocably.”

The most utopian views of the period of military communism were thus
restored on a new economic basis – a little higher, to be sure, but alas
still inadequate for the liquidation of money circulation. The ruling
circles were completely possessed by the opinion that with a planned
economy inflation is not to be feared. This means approximately that if
you possess a compass there is no danger in a leaking ship. In reality,
currency inflation, inevitably producing a credit inflation, entails a
substitution of fictitious for real magnitudes, and corrodes the planned
economy from within.

It is needless to say that inflation meant a dreadful tax upon the
toiling masses. As for the advantages to socialism achieved with its
help, they are more than dubious. Industry, to be sure, continued its
rapid growth, but the economic efficiency of the grandiose construction
was estimated statistically and not economically. Taking command of the
ruble – giving it, that is, various arbitrary purchasing powers in
different strata of the population and sectors of the economy – the
bureaucracy deprived itself of the necessary instrument for objectively
measuring its own successes and failures. The absence of correct
accounting, disguised on paper by means of combinations with the
“conventional ruble”, led in reality to a decline of personal interest,
to a low productivity, and to a still lower quality of goods.

In the course of the first five-year plan, this evil assumed threatening
proportions. In July 1931, Stalin came out with his famous “six
conditions”, whose chief aim was to lower the production cost of
industrial goods. These “conditions” (payment according to individual
productivity of labour, production-cost accounting, etc.) contained
nothing new. The “norms of bourgeois right” had been advanced at the
dawn of the NEP, and developed at the 12th Congress of the party at the
beginning of 1923. Stalin happened upon them only in 1931, under the
influence of the declining efficiency of capital investments. During the
following two years hardly an article appeared in the Soviet press
without references to the salvation power of these “conditions.”
Meanwhile, with inflation continuing, the diseases caused by it were
naturally not getting cured. Severe measures of repression against
wreckers and sabotagers did as little to help things forward.

The fact seems almost unbelievable now that in opening a struggle
against “impersonality” and “equalization” – which means anonymous
“average” labour and similar “average” pay for all – the bureaucracy was
at the same time sending “to the devil” the NEP, which means the money
evaluation of all goods, including labour power. Restoring “bourgeois
norms” with one hand, they were destroying with the other the sole
implement of any use under them. With the substitution of “closed
distributors” for commerce, and with complete chaos in prices, all
correspondence between individual labour and individual wages
necessarily disappeared, and therewith disappeared the personal
interestedness of the worker.

The strictest instructions in regard to economic accounting, quality,
cost of production and productivity, were left hanging in the air. This
did not prevent the leaders from declaring the cause of all economic
difficulties to be the malicious unfulfillment of the six prescriptions
of Stalin. The most cautious references to inflation they likened to a
state crime. With similar conscientiousness the authorities on occassion
have accused teachers of breaking the rules of school hygiene while at
the same time forbidding them to mention the absence of soap.

The question of the fate of the _chervonetz_ has occupied a prominent
place in the struggle of factions in the Communist party. The platform
of factions in the Communist party. The platform of the Opposition
(1927) demanded “a guarantee of the unconditional stability of the money
unit.” This demand became a _leitmotif_ during the subsequent years.
“Stop the process of inflation with an iron hand,” wrote the émigré
organ of the Opposition in 1932, “and restore a stable unit of
currency,” even at the price of “a bold cutting down of capital
investments.” The defenders of the “tortoise tempo” and the
superindustrializers had, it seemed, temporarily changed places. In
answer to the boast that they would send the market “to the devil”, the
Opposition recommended that the State Planning Commission hang up the
motto: “Inflation is the syphilis of a planned economy.”

* * *

In the sphere of agriculture, inflation brought no less heavy
consequences.

During the period when the peasant policy was still oriented upon the
well-to-do farmer, it was assumed that the socialist transformation in
agriculture, setting out upon the basis of the NEP, would be
accomplished in the course of decades by means of the co-operatives.
Assuming one after another purchasing, selling, and credit functions,
the co-operatives should in the long run also socialize production
itself. All this taken together was called “the co-operative plan of
Lenin.” The actual development, as we know, followed a completely
different and almost an opposite course – dekulakization by violence and
integral collectivization. Of the gradual socialization of separate
economic functions, in step with the preparation of the material and
cultural conditions for it, nothing more was said. Collectivization was
introduced as though it were the instantaneous realization of the
communist regime in agriculture.

The immediate consequence was not only an extermination of more than
half of the livestock, but, more important, a complete indifference of
the members of the collective farms to the socialized property and the
results of their own labour. The government was compelled to make a
disorderly retreat. They again supplied the peasants with chickens,
pigs, sheep, and cows as personal property. They gave them private lots
adjoining the farmsteads. The film of collectivization began to be run
off backwards.

In thus restoring small personal farm holdings, the state adopted a
compromise, trying to buy off, as it were, the individualistic
tendencies of the peasant. The collective farms were retained, and at
first glance, therefore, the retreat might seem of secondary importance.
In reality, its significance could hardly be overestimated. If you leave
aside the collective farm aristocracy, the daily needs of the average
peasant are still met to a greater degree by his work “on his own”, than
by his participation in the collective. A peasant’s income from
individual enterprises, especially when he takes up technical culture,
fruit, or stock farming, amounts frequently to three times as much as
the earnings of the same peasant in the collective economy. This fact,
testified to in the Soviet press itself, very clearly reveals on the one
hand a completely barbarous squandering of tens of million of human
forces, especially those of women, in midget enterprises, and, on the
other, the still extremely low productivity of labour in the collective
farms.

In order to raise the standard of large-scale collective agriculture, it
was necessary again to talk to the peasant in the language he
understands – that is, to resurrect the markets and return from taxes in
kind to trade – in a word, to ask back from Satan the NEP which had been
prematurely sent to him. The transition to a more or less stable money
accounting thus became a necessary condition for the further development
of agriculture.
 

3. The Rehabilitation of the Ruble

The owl of wisdom flies, as is well known, after sunset. Thus the theory
of a “socialist” system of money and prices was developed only after the
twilight of inflationist illusions. In developing the above enigmatical
words of Stalin, the obedient professors managed to create an entire
theory according to which the Soviet price, in contrast to the market
price, has an exclusively planning or directive character. That is, it
is not an economic, but an administrative category, and thus serves the
better for the redistribution of the people’s income in the interests of
socialism. The professors forgot to explain how you can estimate real
costs if all prices express the will of a bureaucracy and not the amount
of socially necessary labour expended. In reality, for the
redistribution of the people’s income the government has in its hands
such mighty levers as taxes, the state budget of expenditures for 1936,
over 37.6 billion rubles are allotted directly, and many billions
indirectly, to financing the various branches of economy. The budget and
credit mechanism is wholly adequate for a planned distribution of the
national income. And as to prices, they will serve the cause of
socialism better, the more honestly they being to express the real
economic relations of the present day.

Experience has managed to say its decisive word on this subject.
“Directive” prices were less impressive in real life than in the books
of scholars. On one and the same commodity, prices of different
categories were established. In the broad cracks between these
categories, all kinds of speculation, favoritism, parasitism, and other
vices found room, and this rather as the rule than the exception. At the
same time, the _chervonetz_, which ought to have been the steady shadow
of stable prices, became in reality nothing but its own shadow.

It was again necessary to make a sharp change of course – this time as a
result of difficulties which grew out of the economic successes.
Nineteen-thirty-five opened with the abolition of bread cards. By
October, cards for other food products were liquidated. By January 1936,
cards for industrial products of general consumption were abolished. The
economic relations of the city and the country to the state, and to each
other, were translated into the language of money. The ruble is an
instrument for the influence of the population upon economic plans,
beginning with the quantity and quality of the objects of consumption.
In no other manner is it possible to rationalize the Soviet economy.

The president of the State Planning Commission announced in December
1935:

“The present system of mutual relations between the banks and industry
must be revised, and the banks must seriously realize control by the
ruble.”

Thus the superstition of administrative plan and the illusion of
administrative prices were shipwrecked. If the approach to socialism
means in the fiscal sphere the approach of the ruble to a distribution
card, then the reforms of 1935 would have to be regarded as a departure
from socialism. In reality, however, such an appraisal would be a crude
mistake. The replacement of the card by the ruble is merely a rejection
of fictions, and an open acknowledgment of the necessity of creating the
premises for socialism by means of a return to bourgeois methods of
distribution.

At a session of the Central Executive Committee in January 1936, the
People’s Commissar of Finance announced: “The Soviet ruble is stable as
is not other valuta in the world.” It would be wrong to read this
announcement as sheer boasting. The state budget of the Soviet Union is
balanced with a yearly increase of income over expenses. Foreign trade,
to be sure, although insignificant in itself, gives an active balance.
The gold reserve of the State Bank, which amount in 1926 to 164 million
rubles, in now more than a billion. The output of gold in the country is
rising rapidly. In 1936, this branch of industry is calculated to take
first place in the world. The growth of commodity circulation under the
restored market has become very rapid. Paper-money inflation was
actually stopped in 1934. The elements of a certain stabilization of the
ruble exist. Nevertheless, the announcement of the People’s Commissar of
Finance must be explained to a considerable extent by an inflation of
optimism. If the Soviet ruble possesses a mighty support in the general
rise of industry, still its Achilles heel is the intolerably high cost
of production. The ruble will become the most stable valuta only from
that moment when the Soviet productivity of labour exceeds that of the
rest of the world, and when, consequently, the ruble itself will be
mediating on its final hour.

From a technically fiscal point of view, the ruble can still less lay
claim to superiority. With a gold reserve of over a billion, about 8
billions of of bank notes are in circulation in the country. The
coverage, therefore, amounts to only 12.5 per cent. The gold in the
State Bank is still considerably more in the nature of an inviolate
reserve for the purposes of war, than the basis of a currency.
Theoretically, to be sure, it is not impossible that at a higher stage
of development the Soviets will resort to a gold currency, in order to
make domestic economic plans precise and simplify economic relations
with foreign countries. Thus, before giving up the ghost, the currency
might once more flare up with the gleam of pure gold. But this in any
case is not a problem of the immediate future.

In the period to come, there can be no talk of going over to the gold
standard. Insofar, however, as the government, by increasing the gold
reserve, is trying to raise the percentage even of a purely theoretical
coverage; insofar as the limits of banknote emission are objectively
determined and not dependent upon the will of the bureaucracy, to that
extent the Soviet ruble may achieve at least a relative stability. That
alone would be of enormous benefit. With a firm rejection of inflation
in the future, the currency, although deprived of the advantage of the
gold standard, could indubitably help to cure the many deep wounds
inflicted upon the economy by the bureaucratic subjectivism of the
preceding years.
 

4.The Stakhanov Movement

“All economy,” said Marx, – and that means all human struggle with
nature at all stages of civilization – “comes down in the last analysis
to an economy of time.” Reduced to its primary basis, history is nothing
but a struggle for an economy of working time. Socialism could not be
justified by the abolition of exploitation alone; it must guarantee to
society a higher economy of time than is guaranteed by capitalism.
Without the realization of this condition, the mere removal of
exploitation would be but a dramatic episode without a future. The first
historical experiment in the application of socialist methods has
revealed the great possibilities contained in them. But the Soviet
economy is still far from learning to make use of time, that most
precious raw material of culture. The imported technique, the chief
implement for the economy of time, still fails to produce on the Soviet
soil those results which are normal in its capitalist fatherlands. In
that sense, decisive for all civilization, socialism has not yet
triumphed. It has shown that it can and should triumph. But it has not
yet triumphed. All assertions to the contrary are the fruit of ignorance
and charlatanism.

Molotov, who sometimes – to do him justice – reveals a little more
freedom from the ritual phrase than other Soviet leaders, declared in
January 1936 at a session of the Central Executive Committee:

“Our average level of productivity of labour ... is still considerably
below that of America and Europe.”

It would be well to make these words precise approximately thus: three,
five, and sometimes even 10 times as low as that of Europe and America,
and our cost of production is correspondingly considerably higher. In
the same speech, Molotov made a more general confession:

“The average level of culture of our workers still stands below the
corresponding level of the workers of a number of capitalist countries.”

To this should be added: also the average standard of living. There is
no need of explaining how mercilessly these sober words, spoken in
passing, refute the boastful announcements of the innumerable official
authorities, and the honeyed outpourings of the foreign “friends”!

The struggle to raise the productivity of labour, together with concern
about defence, is the fundamental content of the activity of the Soviet
government. At various stages in the evolution of the Union this
struggle has assumed various characters. The methods applied during the
years of the first five-year plan and the beginning of the second, the
methods of “shock brigade-ism” were based upon agricultural, personal
example, administrative pressure and all kinds of group encouragements
and privileges. The attempt to introduce a kind of piecework payment, on
the basis of the “six conditions” of 1931, came to grief against the
spectral character of the valuta and the heterogeneity of prices. The
system of state distribution of products had replaced the flexible
differential valuation of labour with a so-called “premium system” which
meant, in essence, bureaucratic caprice. In the strife for copious
privileges, there appeared in the ranks of shock brigades an increasing
number of chiselers with special pull. In the long run, the whole system
came into complete opposition with its own aims.

Only the abolition of the card system, the beginning of stabilization
and the unification of prices, created the condition for the application
of piecework payment. Upon this basis, shock brigade-ism was replaced
with the so-called Stakhanov movement. In the chase after the ruble,
which had now acquired a very real meaning, the workers began to concern
themselves more about their machines, and make a more careful use of
their working time. The Stakhanov movement to a degree comes down to an
intensification of labour, and even to a lengthening of the working day.
During the so-called “non-working” time, the Stakhanovists put their
benches and tools in order and sort their raw material, the brigadiers
instruct their brigades, etc. Of the seven-hour working day there thus
remains nothing but the name.

It was not the Soviet administrators who invented the secret of
piecework payment. That system, which strains the nerves without visible
external compulsion, Marx considered “the most suitable to capitalistic
methods of production.” The workers greeted this innovation not only
without sympathy, but with hostility. It would have been unnatural to
expect anything else of them. The participation in the Stakhanov
movement of the genuine enthusiasts of socialism is indubitable. To what
extent they exceed the number of mere careerists and cheaters,
especially in the sphere of administration, it would be hard to say. But
the main mass of the workers approaches the new mode of payment from the
point of view of the ruble, and is often compelled to perceive that it
is getting shorter.

Although at first glance the return of the Soviet government, after “the
final and irrevocable triumph of socialism”, to piecework payment might
seem a retreat to capitalist relations, in reality it is necessary to
repeat here what was said about the rehabilitation of the ruble: It is
not a question of renouncing socialism, but merely of abandoning crude
illusions. The form of wage payment is simply brought into better
correspondence with the real resources of the country. “Law can never be
higher than the economic structure.”

However, the ruling stratum of the Soviet Union cannot yet get along
without a social disguise. In a report to the Central Executive
Committee in January 1936, the president of the State Planning
Commission, Mezhlauk, said:

“The ruble is becoming the sole real means for the realization of a
socialist (!) principle of payment for labour.”

Although in the old monarchy everything, even down to the public
pissiors, was called royal, this does not mean that in a workers’ state
everything automatically becomes socialist. The ruble is the “sole real
means” for the realization of a _capitalist_ principle of payment for
labour, even though on a basis of socialist forms of property. This
contradiction is already familiar to us. In instituting the new myth of
a “socialist” piecework payment, Mezhlauk added:

“The fundamental principle of socialism is that each one works according
to his abilities and receives payment according to the labour performed
by him.”

Those gentlemen are certainly not diffident in manipulating theories!
When the rhythm of labour is determined by the chase after the ruble,
then people do not expend themselves “according to ability” – that is,
according to the condition of their nerves and muscles – but in
violation of themselves. This method can only be justified conditionally
and by reference to stern necessity. To declare it “the fundamental
principle of socialism” means cynically to trample the idea of a new and
higher culture in the familiar filth of capitalism.

Stalin has taken one more step upon this road, presenting the Stakhanov
movement as a “preparation of the conditions for the transition from
socialism to communism.” The reader will see now how important it may be
to give a scientific definition to those notions which are employed in
the Soviet Union according to administrative convenience. Socialism, or
the lowest stage of communism, demands, to be sure, a strict control of
the amount of labour and the amount of consumption, but it assumes in
any case more humane forms of control than those invented by the
exploitive genius of capital. In the Soviet Union, however, there is now
taking place a ruthlessly sever fitting in of backward human material to
the technique borrowed from capitalism. In the struggle to achieve
European and American standards, the classic methods of exploitation,
such as piecework payment, are applied in such naked and crude forms as
would not be permitted even by reformist trade unions in bourgeois
countries. The consideration that in the Soviet Union the workers work
“for themselves” is true only in historical perspective, and only on
condition – we will anticipate ourselves to say – that the workers do
not submit to the saddle of an autocratic bureaucracy. In any case,
state ownership of the means of production does not turn manure into
gold, and does not surround with a halo of sanctity the sweatshop
system, which wears out the greatest of all productive forces: man. As
to the preparation of a “transition from socialism to communism” that
will begin at the exactly opposite end – not with the introduction of
piecework payment, but with its abolition as a relic of barbarism.

* * *

It is still early to cast the balance of the Stakhanov movement, but it
is already possible to distinguish certain traits characteristic not
only of the movement, but of the regime as a whole. Certain achievements
of individual workers are undoubtedly extremely interesting as evidence
of the possibilities open only to socialism. However, from these
possibilities to their realization on the scale of the whole economy, is
a long road. With the close dependence of one productive process upon
another, a continual high output cannot be the result of mere personal
efforts. The elevation of the average productivity cannot be achieved
without a reorganization of production both in the separate factory and
in the relations between enterprises. Moreover, to raise millions to a
small degree of technical skill is immeasurably harder than to spur on a
few thousand champions.

The leaders themselves, as we have heard, complain at times that the
Soviet workers lack skill. However, that is only half of the truth, and
the smaller half. The Russian worker is enterprising, ingenious, and
gifted. Any hundred Soviet workers transferred into the conditions, let
us say, of American industry, after a few months, and even weeks, would
probably not fall behind the American workers of a corresponding
category. The difficulty lies in the general organisation of labour. The
Soviet administrative personnel is, as a general rule, far less equal to
the new productive tasks than the worker.

With a new technique, piecework payment should inevitably lead to a
systematic raising of the now very low productivity of labour. But the
creation of the necessary elementary conditions for this demands a
raising of the level of administration itself, from the shop foreman to
the leaders in the Kremlin. The Stakhanov movement only in a very small
degree meets this demand. The bureaucracy tries fatally to leap over
difficulties which it cannot surmount. Since piecework payment of itself
does not give the immediate miracles expected of it, a furious
administrative pressure rushes to its help, with premiums and ballyhoos
on the one side, and penalties on the other.

The first steps of the movement were signalized with mass repressions
against the technical engineering personnel and the workers accused of
resistance, sabotage and, in some cases, even of the murder of
Stakhanovists. The severity of repressions testifies to the strength of
the resistance. The bosses explained this so-called “sabotage” as a
political opposition. In reality, it was most often rooted in technical,
economic, and cultural difficulties, a considerable portion of which
found their source in the bureaucracy itself. The “sabotage” was soon
apparently broken. The discontented were frightened; the perspicuous
were silenced. Telegrams flew around about unheard-of achievements. And
in reality so long as it was a question of individual pioneers, the
local administrations, obedient to orders, arranged their work with
extraordinary forethought, although at the expense of the other workers
in the mine or guild. But when hundreds and thousands of workers are
suddenly numbered among “Stakhanovists”, the administration gets into
utter confusion. Not knowing how, and not being objectively able, to put
the regime of production in order in a short space of time, it tries to
violate both labour power and technique. When the clockworks slow down,
it pokes the little wheels with a nail. As a result of the
“Stakhanovist” days and ten-day periods, complete chaos was introduced
into many enterprises. This explains the fact, at first glance
astonishing, that a growth in the number of Stakhanovists is frequently
accompanied, not with an increase, but a decrease of the general
productivity of the enterprise.

At present, the “heroic” period of the movement is apparently past. The
everyday grind begins. It is necessary to learn. Those especially have
much to learn who teach others. But they are just the ones who least of
all wish to learn. The name of that social guild which holds back and
paralyzes all the guilds of the Soviet economy is – the bureaucracy.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 5 THE SOVIET THERMIDOR


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Why Stalin Triumphed

The historians of the Soviet Union cannot fail to conclude that the
policy of the ruling bureaucracy upon great questions has been a series
of contradictory zigzags. The attempt to explain or justify them “by
changing circumstances” obviously won’t hold water. To guide means at
least in some degree to exercise foresight. The Stalin faction have not
in the slightest degree foreseen the inevitable results of the
development; they have been caught napping every time. They have reacted
with mere administrative reflexes. The theory of each successive turn
has been created after the fact, and with small regard for what they
were teaching yesterday. On the basis of the same irrefutable facts and
documents, the historian will be compelled to conclude that the
so-called “Left Opposition” offered an immeasurably more correct
analysis of the processes taking place in the country, and far more
truly foresaw their further development.

This assertion is contradicted at first glance by the simple fact that
the fiction which could not see ahead was steadily victorious, while the
more penetrating group suffered defeat after defeat. That kind of
objection, which comes automatically to mind, is convincing, however,
only for those who think rationalistically, and see in politics a
logical argument or a chess match. A political struggle is in its
essence a struggle of interests and forces, not of arguments. The
quality of the leadership is, of course, far from a matter of
indifference for the outcome of the conflict, but it is not the only
factor, and in the last analysis is not decisive. Each of the struggling
camps moreover demands leaders in its own image.

The February revolution raised Kerensky and Tsereteli to power, not
because they were “cleverer” or “more astute” than the ruling tzarist
clique, but because they represented, at least temporarily, the
revolutionary masses of the people in their revolt against the old
regime. Kerensky was able to drive Lenin underground and imprison other
Bolshevik leaders, not because he excelled them in personal
qualifications, but because the majority of the workers and soldiers in
those days were still following the patriotic petty bourgeoisie. The
personal “superiority” of Kerensky, if it is suitable to employ such a
word in this connection, consisted in the fact that he did not see
farther than the overwhelming majority. The Bolsheviks in their turn
conquered the petty bourgeois democrats, not through the personal
superiority of their leaders, but through a new correlation of social
forces. The proletariat had succeeded at last in leading the
discontented peasantry against the bourgeoisie.

The consecutive stages of the great French Revolution, during its rise
and fall alike, demonstrate no less convincingly that the strength of
the “leaders” and “heroes” that replaced each other consisted primarily
in their correspondence to the character of those classes and strata
which supported them. Only this correspondence, and not any irrelevant
superiorities whatever, permitted each of them to place the impress of
his personality upon a certain historic period. In the successive
supremacy of Mirabeau, Brissot, Robespierre, Barras and Bonaparte, there
is an obedience to objective law incomparably more effective than the
special traits of the historic protagonists themselves.

It is sufficiently well known that every revolution up to this time has
been followed by a reaction, or even a counterrevolution. This, to be
sure, has never thrown the nation all the way back to its starting
point, but it has always taken from the people the lion’s share of their
conquests. The victims of the first revolutionary wave have been, as a
general rule, those pioneers, initiators, and instigators who stood at
the head of the masses in the period of the revolutionary offensive. In
their stead people of the second line, in league with the former enemies
of the revolution, have been advanced to the front. Beneath this
dramatic duel of “coryphées” on the open political scene, shifts have
taken place in the relations between classes, and, no less important,
profound changes in the psychology of the recently revolutionary masses.

Answering the bewildered questions of many comrades as to what has
become of the activity of the Bolshevik party and the working class –
where is its revolutionary initiative, its spirit of self-sacrifice and
plebian pride – why, in place of all this, has appeared so much
vileness, cowardice, pusillanimity and careerism – Rakovsky referred to
the life story of the French revolution of the 18th century, and offered
the example of Babuef, who on emerging from the Abbaye prison likewise
wondered what had become of the heroic people of the Parisian suburbs. A
revolution of the heroic people of the Parisian suburbs. A revolution is
a mighty devourer of human energy, both individual and collective. The
nerves give way. Consciousness is shaken and characters are worn out.
Events unfold too swiftly for the flow of fresh forces to replace the
loss. Hunger, unemployment, the death of the revolutionary cadres, the
removal of the masses from administration, all this led to such a
physical and moral impoverishment of the Parisian suburbs that they
required three decades before they were ready for a new insurrection.

The axiomatic assertions of the Soviet literature, to the effect that
the laws of bourgeois revolutions are “inapplicable” to a proletarian
revolution, have no scientific content whatever. The proletarian
character of the October revolution was determined by the world
situation and by a special correlation of internal forces. But the
classes themselves were formed in the barbarous circumstances of tzarism
and backward capitalism, and were anything but made to order for the
demands of a socialist revolution. The exact opposite is true. It is for
the very reason that a proletariat still backward in many respects
achieved in the space of a few months the unprecedented leap from a
semi-feudal monarchy to a socialist dictatorship, that the reaction in
its ranks was inevitable. This reaction has developed in a series of
consecutive waves. External conditions and events have vied with each
other in nourishing it. Intervention followed intervention. The
revolution got no direct help from the west. Instead of the expected
prosperity of the country an ominous destitution reigned for long.
Moreover, the outstanding representatives of the working class either
died in the civil war, or rose a few steps higher and broke away from
the masses. And thus after an unexampled tension of forces, hopes and
illusions, there came a long period of weariness, decline and sheer
disappointment in the results of the revolution. The ebb of the “plebian
pride” made room for a flood of pusillanimity and careerism. The new
commanding caste rose to its place upon this wave.

The demobilization of the Red Army of five million played no small role
in the formation of the bureaucracy. The victorious commanders assumed
leading posts in the local Soviets, in economy, in education, and they
persistently introduced everywhere that regime which had ensured success
in the civil war. Thus on all sides the masses were pushed away
gradually from actual participation in the leadership of the country.

The reaction within the proletariat caused an extraordinary flush of
hope and confidence in the petty bourgeois strata of town and country,
aroused as they were to new life by the NEP, and growing bolder and
bolder. The young bureaucracy, which had arisen at first as an agent of
the proletariat, began ow to feel itself a court of arbitration between
classes. Its independence increased from mouth to mouth.

The international situation was pushing with mighty forces in the same
direction. The Soviet bureaucracy became more self-confident, the
heavier blows dealt to the working class. Between these two facts there
was not only a chronological, but a causal connection, and one which
worked in two directions. The leaders of the bureaucracy promoted the
proletarian defeats; the defeats promoted the rise of the bureaucracy.
The crushing of the Bulgarian insurrection in 1924, the treacherous
liquidation of the General Strike in England and the unworthy conduct of
the Polish workers’ party at the installation of Pilsudski in 1926, the
terrible massacre of the Chinese revolution in 1927, and, finally, the
still more ominous recent defeats in Germany and Austria – these are the
historic catastrophes which killed the faith of the Soviet masses in
world revolution, and permitted the bureaucracy to rise higher and
higher as the sole light of salvation.

As to the causes of the defeat of the world proletariat during the last
thirteen years, the author must refer to his other works, where he has
tried to expose the ruinous part played by the leadership in the
Kremlin, isolated from the masses and profoundly conservative as it is,
in the revolutionary movement of all countries. Here we are concerned
primarily with the irrefutable and instructive fact that the continual
defeats of the revolution in Europe and Asia, while weakening the
international position of the Soviet Union, have vastly strengthened the
Soviet bureaucracy. Two dates are especially significant in this
historic series. In the second half of 1923, the attention of the Soviet
workers was passionately fixed upon Germany, where the proletariat, it
seemed, had stretched out its hand to power. The panicky retreat of the
German Communist Party was the heaviest possible disappointment to the
working masses of the Soviet Union. The Soviet bureaucracy straightway
opened a campaign against the theory of “permanent revolution”, and
dealt the Left Opposition its first cruel blow. During the years 1926
and 1927 the population of the Soviet Union experienced a new tide of
hope. All eyes were now directed to the East where the drama of the
Chinese revolution was unfolding. The Left Opposition had recovered from
the previous blows and was recruiting a phalanx of new adherents. At the
end of 1927 the Chinese revolution was massacred by the hangman, Chiang
Kai-shek, into whose hands the Communist International had literally
betrayed the Chinese workers and peasants. A cold wave of disappointment
swept over the masses of the Soviet Union. After an unbridled baiting in
the press and at meetings, the bureaucracy finally, in 1928, ventured
upon mass arrests among the Left Opposition.

To be sure, tens of thousands of revolutionary fighters gathered around
the banner of the Bolshevik-Leninists. The advanced workers were
indubitably sympathetic to the Opposition, but that sympathy remained
passive. The masses lacked faith that the situation could be seriously
changed by a new struggle. Meantime the bureaucracy asserted:

“For the sake of an international revolution, the Opposition proposes to
drag us into a revolutionary war. Enough of shake-ups! We have earned
the right to rest. We will build the socialist society at home. Rely
upon us, your leaders!”

This gospel of repose firmly consolidated the _apparatchiki_ and the
military and state officials and indubitably found an echo among the
weary workers, and still more the peasant masses. Can it be, they asked
themselves, that the Opposition is actually ready to sacrifice the
interests of the Soviet Union for the idea of “permanent revolution”? In
reality, the struggle had been about the life interests of the Soviet
state. The false policy of the International in Germany resulted ten
years later in the victory of Hitler – that is, in a threatening war
danger from the West. And the no less false policy in China reinforced
Japanese imperialism and brought very much nearer the danger in the
East. But periods of reaction are characterized above all by a lack of
courageous thinking.

The Opposition was isolated. The bureaucracy struck while the iron was
hot, exploiting the bewilderment and passivity of the workers, setting
their more backward strata against the advanced, and relying more and
more boldly upon the _kulak_ and the petty bourgeois ally in general. In
the course of a few years, the bureaucracy thus shattered the
revolutionary vanguard of the proletariat.

It would be naive to imagine that Stalin, previously unknown to the
masses, suddenly issued from the wings full armed with a complete
strategical plan. No indeed. Before he felt out his own course, the
bureaucracy felt out Stalin himself. He brought it all the necessary
guarantees: the prestige of an old Bolshevik, a strong character, narrow
vision, and close bonds with the political machine as the sole source of
his influence. The success which fell upon him was a surprise at first
to Stalin himself. It was the friendly welcome of the new ruling group,
trying to free itself from the old principles and from the control of
the masses, and having need of a reliable arbiter in its inner affairs.
A secondary figure before the masses and in the events of the
revolution, Stalin revealed himself as the indubitable leader of the
Thermidorian bureaucracy, as first in its midst.

The new ruling caste soon revealed soon revealed its own ideas, feelings
and, more important, its interests. The overwhelming majority of the
older generation of the present bureaucracy had stood on the other side
of the barricades during the October revolution. (Take, for example, the
Soviet ambassadors only: Troyanovsky, Maisky, Potemkin, Suritz,
Khinchuk, etc.) Or at best they had stood aside from the struggle. Those
of the present bureaucrats who were in the Bolshevik camp in the October
dys played in the majority of cases no considerable role. As for the
young bureaucrats, they have been chosen and educated by the elders,
frequently from among their own offspring. These people could not have
achieved the October revolution, but they were perfectly suited to
exploit it.

Personal incidents in the interval between these two historic chapters
were not, of course, without influence. Thus the sickness and death of
Lenin undoubtedly hastened the denouement. Had Lenin lived longer, the
pressure of the bureaucratic power would have developed, at least during
the first years, more slowly. But as early as 1926 Krupskaya said, of
Left Oppositionists: “If Ilych were alive, he would probably already be
in prison.” The fears and alarming prophecies of Lenin himself were then
still fresh in her memory, and she cherished no illusions as to his
personal omnipotence against opposing historic winds and currents.

The bureaucracy conquered something more than the Left Opposition. It
conquered the Bolshevik party. It defeated the program of Lenin, who had
seen the chief danger in the conversion of the organs of the state “from
servants of society to lords over society.” It defeated all these
enemies, the Opposition, the party and Lenin, not with ideas and
arguments, but with its own social weight. The leaden rump of
bureaucracy outweighed the head of the revolution. That is the secret of
the Soviet’s Thermidor.
 

2. The Degeneration of the Bolshevik Party

The Bolshevik party prepared and insured the October victory. It also
created the Soviet state, supplying it with a sturdy skeleton. The
degeneration of the party became both cause and consequence of the
bureaucratization of the state. It is necessary to show at at least
briefly how this happened.

The inner regime of the Bolshevik party was characterized by the method
of democratic centralism. The combination of these two concepts,
democracy and centralism, is not in the least contradictory. The party
took watchful care not only that its boundaries should always be
strictly defined, but also that all those who entered these boundaries
should enjoy the actual right to define the direction of the party
policy. Freedom of criticism and intellectual struggle was an
irrevocable content of the party democracy. The present doctrine that
Bolshevism does not tolerate factions is a myth of epoch decline. In
reality the history of Bolshevism is a history of the struggle of
factions. And, indeed, how could a genuinely revolutionary organisation,
setting itself the task of overthrowing the world and uniting under its
banner the most audacious iconoclasts, fighters and insurgents, live and
develop without intellectual conflicts, without groupings and temporary
factional formations? The farsightedness of the Bolshevik leadership
often made it possible to soften conflicts and shorten the duration of
factional struggle, but no more than that. The Central Committee relied
upon this seething democratic support. From this it derived the audacity
to make decisions and give orders. The obvious correctness of the
leadership at all critical stages gave it that high authority which is
the priceless moral capital of centralism.

The regime of the Bolshevik party, especially before it came to power,
stood thus in complete contradiction to the regime of the present
sections of the Communist International, with their “leaders” appointed
from above, making complete changes of policy at a word of command, with
their uncontrolled apparatus, haughty in its attitude to the rank and
file, servile in its attitude to the Kremlin. But in the first years
after the conquest of power also, even when the administrative rust was
already visible on the party, every Bolshevik, not excluding Stalin,
would have denounced as a malicious slanderer anyone who should have
shown him on a screen the image of the party ten or fifteen years later.

The very center of Lenin’s attention and that of his colleagues was
occupied by a continual concern to protect the Bolshevik ranks from the
vices of those in power. However, the extraordinary closeness and at
times actual merging of the party with the state apparatus had already
in those first years done indubitable harm to the freedom and elasticity
of the party regime. Democracy had been narrowed in proportion as
difficulties increased. In the beginning, the party had wished and hoped
to preserve freedom of political struggle within the framework of the
Soviets. The civil war introduced stern amendments into this
calculation. The opposition parties were forbidden one after the other.
This measure, obviously in conflict with the spirit of Soviet democracy,
the leaders of Bolshevism regarded not as a principle, but as an
episodic act of self-defense.

The swift growth of the ruling party, with the novelty and immensity of
its tasks, inevitably gave rise to inner disagreements. The underground
oppositional currents in the country exerted a pressure through various
channels upon the sole legal political organisation, increasing the
acuteness of the factional struggle. At the moment of completion of the
civil war, this struggle took such sharp forms as to threaten to
unsettle the state power. In March 1921, in the days of the Kronstadt
revolt, which attracted into its ranks no small number of Bolsheviks,
the 10th Congress of the party thought it necessary to resort to a
prohibition of factions – that is, to transfer the political regime
prevailing in the state to the inner life of the ruling party. This
forbidding of factions was again regarded as an exceptional measure to
be abandoned at the first serious improvement in the situation. At the
same time, the Central Committee was extremely cautious in applying the
new law, concerning itself most of all lest it lead to a strangling of
the inner life of the party.

However, what was in its original design merely a necessary concession
to a difficult situation, proved perfectly suited to the taste of the
bureaucracy, which had then begun to approach the inner life of the
party exclusively from the viewpoint of convenience in administration.
Already in 1922, during a brief improvement in his health, Lenin,
horrified at the threatening growth of bureaucratism, was preparing a
struggle against the faction of Stalin, which had made itself the axis
of the party machine as a first step toward capturing the machinery of
state. A second stroke and then death prevented him from measuring
forces with this internal reaction.

The entire effort of Stalin, with whom at that time Zinoviev and Kamenev
were working hand in hand, was thenceforth directed to freeing the party
machine from the control of the rank-and-file members of the party. In
this struggle for “stability” of the Central Committee, Stalin proved
the most consistent and reliable among his colleagues. He had no need to
tear himself away from international problems; he had never been
concerned with them. The petty bourgeois outlook of the new ruling
stratum was his own outlook. He profoundly believed that the task of
creating socialism was national and administrative in its nature. He
looked upon the Communist International as a necessary evil would should
be used so far as possible for the purposes of foreign policy. His own
party kept a value in his eyes merely as a submissive support for the
machine.

Together with the theory of socialism in one country, there was put into
circulation by the bureaucracy a theory that in Bolshevism the Central
Committee is everything and the party nothing. This second theory was in
any case realised with more success than the first. Availing itself of
the death of Lenin, the ruling group announced a “Leninist levy.” The
gates of the party, always carefully guarded, were now thrown wide open.
Workers, clerks, petty officials, flocked through in crowds. The
political aim of this maneuver was to dissolve the revolutionary
vanguard in raw human material, without experience, without
independence, and yet with the old habit of submitting to the
authorities. The scheme was successful. By freeing the bureaucracy from
the control of the proletarian vanguard, the “Leninist levy” dealt a
death blow to the party of Lenin. The machine had won the necessary
independence. Democratic centralism gave place to bureaucratic
centralism. In the party apparatus itself there now took place a radical
reshuffling of personnel from top to bottom. The chief merit of a
Bolshevik was declared to be obedience. Under the guise of a struggle
with the opposition, there occurred a sweeping replacement of
revolutionists with _chinovniks_. [1] The history of the Bolshevik party
became a history of its rapid degeneration.

The political meaning of the developing struggle was darkened for many
by the circumstances that the leaders of all three groupings, Left,
Center and Right, belonged to one and the same staff in the Kremlin, the
Politburo. To superficial minds it seemed to be a mere matter of
personal rivalry, a struggle for the “heritage” of Lenin. But in the
conditions of iron dictatorship social antagonisms could not show
themselves at first except through the institutions of the ruling party.
Many Thermidorians emerged in their day from the circle of the Jacobins.
Bonaparte himself belonged to that circle in his early years, and
subsequently it was from among former Jacobins that the First Consul and
Emperor of France selected his most faithful servants. Times change and
the Jacobins with them, not excluding the Jacobins of the twentieth
century.

Of the Politburo of Lenin’s epoch there now remains only Stalin. Two of
its members, Zinoviev and Kamenev, collaborators of Lenin throughout
many years as émigrés, are enduring ten-year prison terms for a crime
which they did not commit. Three other members, Rykov, Bukharin and
Tomsky, are completely removed from the leadership, but as a reward for
submission occupy secondary posts. [2]

And, finally, the author of these lines is in exile. The widow of Lenin,
Krupskaya, is also under the ban, having proved unable with all her
efforts to adjust herself completely to the Thermidor.

The members of the present Politburo occupied secondary posts throughout
the history of the Bolshevik party. If anybody in the first years of the
revolution had predicted their future elevation, they would have been
the first in surprise, and there would have been no false modesty in
their surprise. For this very reason, the rule is more stern at present
that the Politburo is always right, and in any case that no man can be
right against Stalin, who is unable to make mistakes and consequently
cannot be right against himself.

Demands for party democracy were through all this time the slogans of
all the oppositional groups, as insistent as they were hopeless. The
above-mentioned platform of the Left Opposition demanded in 1927 that a
special law be written into the Criminal Code “punishing as a serious
state crime every direct or indirect persecution of a worker for
criticism.” Instead of this, there was introduced into the Criminal Code
an article against the Left Opposition itself.

Of party democracy there remained only recollections in the memory of
the older generation. And together with it had disappeared the democracy
of the soviets, the trade unions, the co-operatives, the cultural and
athletic organisations. Above each and every one of them there reigns an
unlimited hierarchy of party secretaries. The regime had become
“totalitarian” in character several years before this word arrived from
Germany.

“By means of demoralizing methods, which convert thinking communists
into machines, destroying will, character and human dignity,” wrote
Rakovsky in 1928, “the ruling circles have succeeded in converting
themselves into an unremovable and inviolate oligarchy, which replaces
the class and the party.”

Since these indignant lines were written,the degeneration of the regime
has gone immeasurably farther. The GPU has become the decisive factor in
the inner life of the party. If Molotov in March 1936 was able to boast
to a French journalist that the ruling party no longer contains any
factional struggle, it is only because disagreements are now settled by
the automatic intervention of the political police. The old Bolshevik
party is dead and no force will resurrect it.

* * *

Parallel with the political degeneration of the party, there occurred a
moral decay of the uncontrolled apparatus. The word “_sovbour_” – soviet
bourgeois – as applied to a privileged dignitary appeared very early in
the workers’ vocabulary. With the transfer to the NEP bourgeois
tendencies received a more copious field of action. At the 11th Congress
of the party, in March 1922, Lenin gave warning of the danger of a
degeneration of the ruling stratum. It has occurred more than once in
history, he said, that the conqueror took over the culture of the
conquered, when the latter stood on a higher level. The culture of the
Russian bourgeoisie and the old bureaucracy was, to be sure, miserable,
but alas the new ruling stratum must often take off its hat to that
culture. “Four thousand seven hundred responsible communists” in Moscow
administer the state machine. “Who is leading whom? I doubt very much
whether you can say that the communists are in the lead ...” In
subsequent congresses, Lenin could not speak. But all his thoughts in
the last months of his active life were of warning and arming the
workers against the oppression, caprice and decay of the bureaucracy.
He, however, saw only the first symptoms of the disease.

Christian Rakovsky, former president of the soviet of People’s
Commissars of the Ukraine, and later Soviet Ambassador in London and
Paris, sent to his friends in 1928, when already in exile, a brief
inquiry into the Soviet bureaucracy, which we have quoted above several
times, for it still remains the best that has been written on this
subject.

“In the mind of Lenin, and in all our minds,” says Rakovsky, “the task
of the party leadership was to protect both the party and the working
class from the corrupting action of privilege, place and patronage on
the part of those in power, from rapprochement with the relics of the
old nobility and burgherdom, from the corrupting influence of the NEP,
from the temptation of bourgeois morals and ideologies ... We must say
frankly, definitely and loudly that the party apparatus has not
fulfilled this task, that it has revealed a complete incapacity for its
double role of protector and educator. It has failed. It is bankrupt.”

It is true that Rakovsky himself, broken by the bureaucratic
repressions, subsequently repudiated his own critical judgments. But the
70-year-old Galileo too, caught in the vise of the Holy Inquisition,
found himself compelled to repudiate the system of Copernicus – which
did not prevent the earth from continuing to revolve around the sun. We
do not believe in the recantation of the 60-year-old Rakovsky, for he
himself has more than once made a withering analysis of such
recantations. As to his political criticisms, they have found in the
facts of the objective development a far more reliable support than in
the subjective stout-heartedness of their author.

The conquest of power changes not only the relations of the proletariat
to other classes, but also its own inner structure. The wielding of
power becomes the speciality of a definite social group, which is the
more impatient to solve its own “social problem”, the higher its opinion
of the own mission.

“In a proletarian state, where capitalist accumulation is forbidden to
the members of the ruling party, the differentiation is at first
functional, but afterward becomes social. I do not say it becomes a
class differentiation, but a social one ...”

Rakovsky further explains:

“The social situation of the communist who has at his disposition an
automobile, a good apartment, regular vacations, and receives the party
maximum of salary, differs from the situation of the communist who works
in the coal mines, where he receives from 50 to 60 rubles a month.”

Counting over the causes of the degeneration of the Jacobins when in
power – the chase after wealth, participation in government contracts,
supplies, etc., Rakovsky cites a curious remark of Babeuf to the effect
that the degeneration of the new ruling stratum was helped along not a
little by the former young ladies of the aristocracy toward whom the
Jacobins were very friendly. “What are you doing, small-hearted
plebians?” cries Babeuf. “Today they are embracing you and tomorrow they
will strangle you.” A census of the wives of the ruling stratum in the
Soviet Union would show a similar picture. The well-known Soviet
journalist, Sosnovsky, pointed out the special role played by the
“automobile-harem factor” in forming the morals of the Soviet
bureaucracy. It is true that Sosnovsky, too, following Rakovsky,
recanted and was returned from Siberia. But that did not improve the
morals of the bureaucracy. On the contrary, that very recantation is
proof of a progressing demoralization.

The old articles of Sosnovsky, passed about in manuscript from hand to
hand, were sprinkled with unforgettable episodes from the life of the
new ruling stratum, plainly showing to what vast degree the conquerors
have assimilated the morals of the conquered. Not to return, however, to
past years – for Sosnovsky finally exchanged his whip for a lyre in 1934
– we will confine ourselves to wholly fresh examples from the Soviet
press. And we will not select the abuses and co-called “excesses”,
either, but everyday phenomena legalized by official social opinion.

The director of a Moscow factory, a prominent communist, boasts in
PRAVDA of the cultural growth of the enterprise directed by him. “A
mechanic telephones: ‘What is your order, sir, check the furnace
immediately or wait?’ I answer: ‘Wait.’” [3] The mechanic addresses the
director with extreme respect, using the second person plural, while the
director answers him in the second person singular. And this disgraceful
dialogue, impossible in any cultures capitalist country, is related by
the director himself on the pages of Pravda as something entirely
normal! The editor does not object because he does not notice it. The
readers do not object because they are accustomed to it. We are also not
surprised, for at solemn sessions in the Kremlin, the “leaders” and
People’s Commissars address in the second person singular directors of
factories subordinate to them, presidents of collective farms, shop
foremen and working women, especially invited to receive decorations.
How can they fail to remember that one of the most popular revolutionary
slogans in tzarist Russia was the demand for the abolition of the use of
the second person singular by bosses in addressing their subordinates!

These Kremlin dialogues of the authorities with “the people”,
astonishing in their lordly ungraciousness, unmistakably testify that,
in spite of the October Revolution, the nationalization of the means of
production, collectivization, and “the liquidation of the _kulaks_ as a
class”, the relations among men, and that at the very heights of the
Soviet pyramid, have not only not yet risen to socialism, but in many
respects are still lagging behind a cultured capitalism. In recent years
enormous backward steps have been taken in this very important sphere.
And the source of this revival of genuine Russian barbarism is
indubitably the Soviet Thermidor, which has given complete independence
nd freedom from control to a bureaucracy possessing little culture, and
has given to the masses the well-known gospel of obedience and silence.

We are far from intending to contrast the abstraction of dictatorship
with the abstraction of democracy, and weight their merits on the scales
of pure reason. Everything is relative in this world, where change alone
endures. The dictatorship of the Bolshevik party proved one of the most
powerful instruments of progress in history. But here too, in the words
of the poet, “Reason becomes unreason, kindness a pest.” The prohibition
of oppositional parties brought after it the prohibition of factions.
The prohibition of factions ended in a prohibition to think otherwise
than the infallible leaders. The police-manufactured monolithism of the
party resulted in a bureaucratic impunity which has become the sources
of all kinds of wantonness and corruption.
 

3. The Social Roots of Thermidor

We have defined the Soviet Thermidor as a triumph of the bureaucracy
over the masses. We have tried to disclose the historic conditions of
this triumph. The revolutionary vanguard of the proletariat was in part
devoured by the administrative apparatus and gradually demoralized, in
part annihilated in the civil war, and in part thrown out and crushed.
The tired and disappointed masses were indifferent to what was happening
on the summits. These conditions, however, are inadequate to explain why
the bureaucracy succeeded in raising itself above society and getting
its fate firmly into its own hands. Its own will to this would in any
case be inadequate; the arising of a new ruling stratum must have deep
social causes.

The victory of the Thermidorians over the Jacobins in the 18th century
was also aided by the weariness of the masses and the demoralization of
the leading cadres, but beneath these essentially incidental phenomena a
deep organic process was taking place. The Jacobins rested upon the
lower petty bourgeoisie lifted by the great wave. The revolution of the
18th century, however, corresponding to the course of development of the
productive forces, could not but bring the great bourgeoisie to
political ascendancy in the long run. The Thermidor was only one of the
stages in this inevitable process. What similar social necessity found
expression in the Soviet Thermidor? We have tried already in one of the
preceding chapters to make a preliminary answer to the question why the
gendarme triumphed. We must now prolong out analysis of the conditions
of the transition from capitalism to socialism, and the role of the
state in this process. Let us again compare theoretic prophecy with
reality.

“It is still necessary to suppress the bourgeoisie and its resistance,”
wrote Lenin in 1917, speaking of the period which should begin
immediately after the conquest of power, “but the organ of suppression
here is now the majority of the population, and not the minority as had
heretofore always been the case.... In that sense the state is beginning
to die away.”

In what does this dying away express itself? Primarily in the fact that
“in place of special institutions of a privileged minority (privileged
officials, commanders of a standing army), the majority itself can
directly carry out” the functions of suppression. Lenin follows this
with a statement axiomatic and unanswerable:

“The more universal becomes the very fulfillment of the functions of the
state power, the less need is there of this power.”

The annulment of private property in the means of production removes the
principal task of the historic state – defence of the proprietary
privileges of the minority against the overwhelming majority.

The dying away of the state begins, then, according to Lenin, on the
very day after the expropriation of the expropriators – that is, before
the new regime has had time to take up its economic and cultural
problems. Every success in the solution of these problems mens a further
step in the liquidation of the state, its dissolution in the socialist
society. The degree of this dissolution is the best index of the depth
and efficacy of the socialist structure. We may lay down approximately
this sociological theorem: The strength of the compulsion exercised by
the masses in a workers’ state is directly proportional to the strength
of the exploitive tendencies, or the danger of a restoration of
capitalism, and inversely proportional to the strength of the social
solidarity and the general loyalty to the new regime. Thus the
bureaucracy – that is, the “privileged officials and commanders of the
standing army” – represents a special kind of compulsion which the
masses cannot or do not wish to exercise, and which, one way or another,
is directed against the masses themselves.

If the diplomatic soviets had preserved to this day their original
strength and independence, and yet were compelled to resort to
repressions and compulsions on the scale of the first years, this
circumstance might of itself give rise to serious anxiety. How much
greater must be the alarm in view of the fact that the mass soviet have
entirely disappeared from the scene, having turned over the function of
compulsion to Stalin, Yagoda and company. And what forms of compulsion!
First of all we must ask ourselves: What social cause stands behind its
policification The importance of this question is obvious. In dependence
upon the answer, we must either radically revise out traditional views
of the socialist society in general, or as radically reject the official
estimates of the Soviet Union.

Let us now take from the latest number of a Moscow newspaper a
stereotyped characterization of the present Soviet regime, one of those
which are repeated throughout the country from day to day and which
school children learn by heart:

“In the Soviet Union the parasitical classes of capitalists, landlords
and _kulaks_ are completely liquidated, and thus is forever ended the
exploitation of man by man. The whole national economy has become
socialistic, and the growing Stakhanov movement is preparing the
conditions for a transition from socialism to communism.” (PRAVDA, April
4, 1936)

The world press of the Communist International, it goes without saying,
has no other thing to say on this subject. But if exploitation is “ended
forever”, if the country is really now on the road from socialism, that
is, the lowest stage of communism, to its higher stage, then there
remains nothing for society to do but throw off at last the straitjacket
of the state. In place of this – it is hard even to grasp this contrast
with the mind! – the Soviet state has acquired a
totalitarian-bureaucratic character.

The same fatal contradiction finds illustration in the fate of the
party. Here the problem may be formulated approximately thus: Why, from
1917 to 1921, when the old ruling classes were still fighting with
weapons in the hands, when they were actively supported by the
imperialists of the whole world, when the _kulaks_ in arms were
sabotaging the army and food supplies of the country, – why was it
possible to dispute openly and fearlessly in the party about the most
critical questions of policy? Why now, after the cessation of
intervention, after the shattering of the exploiting classes, after the
indubitable successes of industrialization, after the collectivization
of the overwhelming majority of the peasants, is it impossible to permit
the slightest word of criticism of the unremovable leaders? Why is it
that any Bolshevik who should demand a calling of the congress of the
party in accordance with its constitution would be immediately expelled,
any citizen who expressed out loud a doubt of the infallibility of
Stalin would be tried and convicted almost as though a participant in a
terrorist plot? Whence this terrible, monstrous and unbearable intensity
of repression and of the police apparatus?

Theory is not a note which you can present at any moment to reality for
payment. If a theory proves mistaken we must revise it or fill out its
gaps. We must find out those real social forces which have given rise to
the contrast between Soviet reality and the traditional Marxian
conception. In any case we must not wander in the dark, repeating ritual
phrases, useful for the prestige of the leaders, but which nevertheless
slap the living reality in the face. We shall now see a convincing
example of this.

In a speech at a session of the Central Executive Committee in January
1936, Molotov, the president of the Council of People’s Commissars,
declared:

“The national economy of the country has become socialistic.
(_applause_) In that sense [?] we have solved the problem of the
liquidation of classes.” (_applause_)

However, there still remain from the past “elements in their nature
hostile to us,” fragments of the former ruling classes. Moreover, among
the collectivised farmers, state employees and sometimes also the
workers, _spekulantiki_ [“petty speculators”] are discovered, “grafters
in relation to the collective and state wealth, anti-Soviets gossip,
etc.” And hence results the necessity of a further reinforcement of the
dictatorship. In opposition to Engels, the workers’ state must not “fall
asleep”, but on the contrary become more and more vigilant.

The picture drawn by the head of the Soviet government would be
reassuring in the highest degree, were it not murderously
self-contradictory. Socialism completely reigns in the country: “In that
sense” classes are abolished. (If they are abolished in that sense, they
they are in every other.) To be sure, the social harmony is broken here
and there by fragments and remnants of the past, but it is impossible to
think that scattered dreamers of a restoration of capitalism, deprived
of power and property, together with “petty speculators” (not even
speculators!) and “gossips” are capable of overthrowing the classless
society. Everything is getting along, it seems, the very best you can
imagine. But what is the use then of the iron dictatorship of the
bureaucracy.

Those reactionary dreamers, we must believe, will gradually die out. The
“petty speculators” and “gossips” might be disposed of with a laugh by
the super-democratic Soviets.

“We are not Utopians,” responded Lenin in 1917 to the bourgeois and
reformist theoreticians of the bureaucratic state, and “by no means deny
the possibility and inevitability of excesses on the part of individual
persons, and likewise the necessity for suppressing such excesses. But
... for this there is no need of a special machine, a special apparatus
of repression. This will be done by the armed people themselves, with
the same simplicity and ease with which any crowd of civilized people
even in contemporary society separate a couple of fighters or stop an
act of violence against a woman.”

Those words sound as though the author has especially foreseen the
remarks of one of his successors at the head of the government. Lenin is
taught in the public schools of the Soviet Union, but apparently not in
the COuncil of People’s Commissars. Otherwise it would be impossible to
explain Molotov’s daring to resort without reflection to the very
construction against which Lenin directed his well-sharpened weapons.
The flagrant contradictions between the founder and his epigones is
before us! Whereas Lenin judged that even the liquidation of the
exploiting classes might be accomplished without a bureaucratic
apparatus, Molotov, in explaining why after the liquidation of classes
the bureaucratic machine has strangled the independence of the people,
finds no better pretext than a reference to the “remnants” of the
liquidated classes.

To live on these “remnants” becomes, however, rather difficult since,
according to the confession of authoritative representatives of the
bureaucracy itself, yesterday’s class enemies are being successfully
assimilated by the Soviet society. Thus Postyshev, one of the
secretaries of the Central Committee of the party, said in April 1936,
at a congress of the League of Communist Youth: “Many of the sabotagers
... have sincerely repented and joined the ranks of the Soviet people.”
In view of the successful carrying out of collectivization, “the
children of _kulaks_ are not to be held responsible for their parents.”
And yet more: “The _kulak_ himself now hardly believes in the
possibility of a return to his former position of exploiter in the
village.”

Not without reason did the government annul the limitations connected
with social origins! But if Postyshev’s assertion, wholly agreed to by
Molotov, makes any sense it is only this: Not only has the bureaucracy
become a monstrous anachronism, but state compulsion in general has
nothing whatever to do in the land of the Soviets. However, neither
Molotov nor Postyshev agrees with that immutable inference. They prefer
to hold the power even at the price of self-contradiction.

In reality, too, they cannot reject the power. Or, to translate this
into objective language: The present Soviet society cannot get along
without a state, nor even – within limits – without a bureaucracy. But
the case of this is by no means the pitiful remnants of the past, but
the mighty forces and tendencies of the present. The justification for
the existence of a Soviet state as an apparatus of compulsion lies in
the fact that the present transitional structure is still full of social
contradictions, which in the sphere of consumption – most close nd
sensitively felt by all – are extremely tense, nd forever threaten to
break over into the sphere of production. The triumph of socialism
cannot be called either final or irrevocable.

The basis of bureaucratic rule is the poverty of society in objects of
consumption, with the resulting struggle of each against all. When there
is enough goods in a store, the purchasers can come whenever they want
to. When there is little goods, the purchasers are compelled to stand in
line. When the lines are very long, it is necessary to appoint a
policeman to keep order. Such is the starting point of the power of the
Soviet bureaucracy. It “knows” who is to get something and how has to
wait.

A raising of the material and cultural level ought, at first glance, to
lessen the necessity of privileges, narrow the sphere of application of
“bourgeois law”, and thereby undermine the standing ground of its
defenders, the bureaucracy. In reality the opposite thing has happened:
the growth of the productive forces has been so far accompanied by an
extreme development of all forms of inequality, privilege and advantage,
and therewith of bureaucratism. That too is not accidental.

In its first period, the Soviet regime was undoubtedly far more
equalitarian and less bureaucratic than now. But that was an equality of
general poverty. The resources of the country were so scant that there
was no opportunity to separate out from the masses of the population any
broad privileged strata. At the same time the “equalizing” character of
wages, destroying personal interestedness, became a brake upon the
development of the productive forces. Soviet economy had to lift itself
from its poverty to a somewhat higher level before fat deposits of
privilege became possible. The present state of production is still far
from guaranteeing all necessities to everybody. But it is already
adequate to give significant privileges to a minority, and convert
inequality into a whip for the spurring on of the majority. That is the
first reason why the growth of production has so far strengthened not
the socialist, but the bourgeois features of the state.

But that is not the sole reason. Alongside the economic factor dictating
capitalist methods of payment at the present stage, there operates a
parallel political factor in the person of the bureaucracy itself. In
its very essence it is the planter and protector of inequality. It arose
in the beginning as the bourgeois organ of a workers’ state. In
establishing and defending the advantages of a minority, it of course
draws off the cream for its own use. Nobody who has wealth to distribute
ever omits himself. Thus out of a social necessity there has developed
an organ which has far outgrown its socially necessary function, and
become an independent factor and therewith the source of great danger
for the whole social organism.

The social meaning of the Soviet Thermidor now begins to take form
before us. The poverty and cultural backwardness of the masses has again
become incarnate in the malignant figure of the ruler with a great club
in his hand. The deposed and abused bureaucracy, from being a servant of
society, has again become its lord. On this road it has attained such a
degree of social and moral alienation from the popular masses, that it
cannot now permit any control over wither its activities or its income.

The bureaucracy’s seemingly mystic fear of “petty speculators, grafters,
and gossips” thus finds a wholly natural explanation. Not yet able to
satisfy the elementary needs of the population, the Soviet economy
creates and resurrects at every step tendencies to graft and
speculation. On the other side, the privileges of the new aristocracy
awaken in the masses of the population a tendency to listen to
anti-Soviet “gossips” – that is, to anyone who, albeit in a whisper,
criticizes the greedy and capricious bosses. It is a question,
therefore, not of spectres of the past, not of the remnants of what no
longer exists, not, in short, of the snows of yesteryear, but of new,
mighty, and continually reborn tendencies to personal accumulation. The
first still very meager wave of prosperity in the country, just because
of its meagerness, has not weakened, but strengthened, these centrifugal
tendencies. On the other hand, there has developed simultaneously a
desire of the unprivileged to slap the grasping hands of the new gentry.
The social struggle again grows sharp. Such are the sources of the power
of the bureaucracy. But from those same sources comes also a threat to
its power.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Professional governmental functionaries.

2. _TRANSLATOR’S NOTE_ – Zinoviev and Kamenev were executed in August
1936 for alleged complicity in a “terrible plot” against Stalin; Tomsky
committed suicide or was shot in connection with the same case; Rykov
was removed from his post in connection with the plot; Bukharin,
although suspected, is still at liberty.

3. _TRANSLATOR:_ It is impossible to convey the flavor of this dialogue
in English. The second person singular is used either with intimates in
token of affection, or with children, servants and animals in token of
superiority.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 6 THE GROWTH OF INEQUALITY AND SOCIAL ANTAGONISMS


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Want, Luxury and Speculation

After starting out with “socialist distribution”, the Soviet power found
itself obliged in 1921 to return to the market. The extreme stretching
of material means in the epoch of the five-year-plan again led to state
distribution – that is, a repetition of the experiment of “military
Communism” on a higher basis. This basis too, however, proved
inadequate. In the year 1935, the system of planned distribution again
gave way to trade. Thus, a second time it is made evident that
practicable methods of distribution depend more upon the level of
technique and the existing material resources, than even upon forms of
property.

The raising of the productivity of labour, in particular through
piecework payment, promises in the future an increase of the mass of
commodities, a lowering of prices, and a consequent rise in the standard
of living of the population. But that is only one aspect of the matter –
an aspect which has also been observed under capitalism in its
flourishing epoch. Social phenomena and processes must, however, be
taken in their connections and interactions. A raising of the
productivity of labour on the basis of commodity circulation, means at
the same time a growth of inequality. The rise in the prosperity of the
commanding strata is beginning to exceed by far the rise in the standard
of living of the masses. Along with an increase of state wealth goes a
process of new social differentiation.

According to the conditions of its daily life, Soviet society is already
divided into a secure and privileged minority, and a majority getting
along in want. At its extremes, moreover, this inequality assumes the
character of flagrant contrast. Products designed for broad circulation
are as a rule, in spite of their high prices, of low quality, and the
farther from the centers the more difficult to obtain. Not only
speculation but the downright theft of objects of consumption assumes in
these circumstances a mass character. And while up to yesterday these
acts supplemented the planned distribution, they now serve as a
corrective to Soviet trade.

The “friends” of the Soviet Union have a professional habit of
collecting impressions with closed eyes and cotton in their ears. We
cannot rely upon them. The enemies frequently propagate malicious
slanders. Let us turn, therefore, to the bureaucracy itself. Since it is
at least not hostile to itself, its official self-accusations, evoked
always by some sort of urgent practical demand, deserve a great deal
more confidence than its more frequent and noisy self-praise.

The industrial plan of 1935, as is well known, was more than carried
out. But in the matter of housing, it was only 55.7 per cent carried
out. And moreover the construction of houses for the workers proceeded
most slowly, badly and sloppily of all. As for the members of collective
farms, they live as formerly in the old huts with their calves and
cockroaches. On the other hand, the Soviet dignitaries complain in the
press that not all the houses newly constructed for them possess “rooms
for houseworkers” – that is, for domestic servants.

Every regime has its monumental reflection in buildings and
architecture. Characteristic of the present Soviet epoch are the
numerous palaces and houses of the Soviets, genuine temples of the
bureaucracy sometimes costing as much as ten million rubles, expensive
theaters, houses of the Red Army – that is, military clubs chiefly for
officers – luxurious subways for those who can pay, and therewith an
extreme and unchanging backwardness in the construction of workers’
dwellings even of the barrack type.

In the matter of transporting state freight on the railroads, genuine
progress has been attained. But the simple Soviet human being has gained
very little from that. Innumerable orders from the heads of the
Department of Roads and Communications complain of the unsanitary
condition of the cars and passenger stations, of “the intolerable fact
of inaction in the service of passengers on the road,” “the great number
of abuses, thieveries and cheatings with railroad tickets ...
concealment of vacant seats and speculation on them, bribe-taking ...
robbing of luggage at the stations and on the road.” Such facts are “a
disgrace to socialist transport”! As a matter of fact they are criminal
offences in capitalist transport. These repeated complaints of the
eloquent administrator bear certain witness to the extreme inadequacy of
the means of transport for the use of the population, the bitter want of
those products which are transported, and, finally, the cynical neglect
of simple mortals on the part of railroad officials as of all other
persons in authority. The bureaucracy is admirably able to provide
service for itself on land and water and in the air, as we learn from
the great number of Soviet parlor cars, special trains and special
steamers – and these more and more giving place to the best of
automobiles and aeroplanes.

In characterizing the successes of Soviet industry, the president of the
Leningrad Central Committee, Zhdanov, to the applause of his immediately
interested audience, promised that in a year “our active workers will
arrive for the conference not in the present modest Fords, but in
limousines.” The Soviet technique, insofar as its face is turned toward
mankind, directs its efforts primarily to satisfying the high-class
demands of a chosen minority. The streetcars, where they exist at all,
are as before filled to suffocation.

When the People’s Commissar of Food Industries, Mikoyan, boasts that the
lowest kind of confections are rapidly being crowded out of production
by the highest, and that “our women” are demanding fine perfumes, this
only means that industry, with the transfer to money circulation, is
accommodating itself to the better qualified consumer. Such are the laws
of the market, in which by no means the last place is occupied by the
highly placed “wives.” Together with this it becomes known that
sixty-eight co-operative shops out of ninety-five investigated in the
Ukraine in 1935, had no confections at all, and that the demand for
pastries was only 15 to 20 per cent satisfied, and this with a very low
quality of goods. “The factories are working,” complains IZVESTIA,
“without regard to the demands of the consumer.” Naturally, if the
consumer is not one who is able to stand up for himself.

Professor Bakh, who approaches the question from the standpoint of
organic chemistry, finds that “our bread is sometimes intolerably bad.”
The working man and woman, although not initiated into the mysteries of
yeast and its fermentation, think the very same thought. In distinction
from the esteemed professor, however, they have not the opportunity to
express their appraisal on the pages of the press.

In Moscow, the garment trust advertises variegated fashions of silk
dresses designed by the special “house of fashions.” In the provinces,
even in the great industrial cities, the workers as formerly cannot,
without standing in lines and submitting to other vexations, obtain a
cottonprint shirt: There aren’t enough! It is much harder to supply the
needs of the many than to supply luxuries to the few. All history
vouches for that.

In listing his achievements, Mikoyan informs us: “The oleomargarine
industry is new.” It is true that this industry did not exist under the
old regime. We need not rush to the conclusion, however, that the
situation has become worse than under the tzar. The people saw no butter
in those days, either. But the appearance of a substitute means at least
that in the Soviet Union there are two classes of consumers: one prefers
butter, the other gets along with margarine. “We supply plenty of
_makhorka_ to all who need it,” boasts the same Mikoyan. He forgets to
add that neither Europe nor America ever heard of such low-grade tobacco
as _makhorka_.

One of the very clear, not to say defiant, manifestations of inequality
is the opening in Moscow and other big cities of special stores with
high-quality articles under the very expressive, although not very
Russian, designation of “Luxe.” At the same time ceaseless complaints of
mass robbery in the food shops of Moscow and the provinces, mean that
foodstuffs are adequate only for the minority, although everybody would
like to have something to eat.

The worker-mother has her view of the social regime, and her
“consumer’s” criterion, as the functionary – very attentive, by the way,
to his own consumption – scornfully expresses it, is in the last
analysis decisive. In the conflict between the working woman and the
bureaucracy, Marx and Lenin, and we with them, stand on the side of the
working woman. We stand against the bureaucrat, who is exaggerating his
achievements, blurring contradictions, and holding the working woman by
the throat in order that she may not criticize.

Granted that margarine and _makhorka_ are today unhappy necessities.
Still it is useless to boast and ornament reality. Limousines for the
“activists”, fine perfumes for “our women”, margarine for the workers,
stores “de luxe” for the gentry, a look at delicacies through the store
windows for the plebs – such socialism cannot but seem to the masses a
new re-facing of capitalism, and they are not far wrong. On a basis of
“generalized want”, the struggle for the means of subsistence threatens
to resurrect “all the old crap”, and is partially resurrecting it at
every step.

Present market relations differ from relations under the NEP (1921-28)
in that they are supposed to develop directly without the middleman and
the private trader between the state co-operative and collective farm
organisations and the individual citizen. However, this is true only in
principle. The swiftly growing turnover of retail trade, both state and
co-operative, should in 19156, according to specifications, amount to
one hundred billion rubles. The turnover of collective farm trade, which
amounted to sixteen billion in 1965, is to grow considerably during the
current year. It is hard to determine what place – at least not an
insignificant one! – will be occupied by illegal and semi-legal
middlemen both within this turnover and alongside it. Not only the
individual peasants, but also the collectives, and especially individual
members of the collectives, are much inclined to resort to the
middleman. The same road is followed by the home-industry workers,
co-operators, and the local industries dealing with the peasants. From
time to time, it unexpectedly transpires that the trade in meat, butter
or eggs throughout a large district, has been cornered by “speculators.”
Even the most necessary articles of daily use, like salt, matches,
flour, kerosene, although existing in the state storehouses in
sufficient quantity, are lacking for weeks and months at a time in the
bureaucratized rural co-operatives. It is clear that the peasants will
get the goods they need by other roads. The Soviet press often speaks of
the jobber as of something to be taken for granted.

As for the other forms of private enterprise and accumulation, they
play, it seems, a smaller role. Independent cabmen, innkeepers, solitary
artisans, are, like the independent peasants, semi-tolerated
professions. In Moscow itself there are a considerable number of private
small business and repair shops. Eyes are closed to them because they
fill up important gaps in the economy. An incomparably greater number of
private entrepreneurs work, however, under the false label of all kinds
of artels and co-operatives, or hide under the roofs of the collective
farms – as though for the special purpose of emphasizing the rifts in
the planned economy. The G-men in Moscow arrest from time to time, in
the character of malicious speculators, hungry women who are selling
homemade berets or cotton shirts on the street.

“The basis of speculation in our land is destroyed,” announced Stalin in
the autumn of 1935, “and if we have speculators none the less, it can be
explained by only one fact: lack of class vigilance and a liberal
attitude toward the speculators in various links of the Soviet
apparatus.” An ideally pure culture of bureaucratic thinking! The
economic basis of speculation is destroyed? But then there is no need of
any vigilance whatever. If the state could, for example, guarantee the
population a sufficient quantity of modest headdresses, there would be
no necessity of arresting those unfortunate street traders. It is
doubtful, indeed, if such a necessity exists now.

In itself the number of the private traders above mentioned, like the
quantity of their business, is not alarming. You cannot really fear an
attack of truck drivers, traders in berets, watchmakers and buyers of
eggs, upon the fortresses of the state property! But still the question
is not decided by bare arithmetical correlations. An abundance and
variety of speculators coming to the surface at the least sign of
administrative weakness like a rash in a fever, testifies to the
continual pressure of petty bourgeois tendencies. How much danger to the
socialist future is represented by the speculation bacillus is
determined wholly by the general power of resistance of the economic and
political organism of the country.

The mood and conduct of the rank-and-file workers and collective farmers
that is, about 90 per cent of the population – is determined primarily
by changes in their own real wages. But no less significance must be
given to the relation between their income and the income of the
better-placed strata. The law of relativity proclaims itself most
directly in the sphere of human consumption ! The translation of all
social relations into the language of money accounting will reveal to
the bottom the actual share enjoyed by the different strata of society
in the national income. Even when we understand the historic necessity
of inequality for a prolonged period, questions remain open about its
admissible limits and its social expediency in each concrete case. The
inevitable struggle for a share of the national income necessarily
becomes a political struggle. The question whether the present structure
is socialist or not will be decided, not by the sophisms of the
bureaucracy, but by the attitude toward it of the masses themselves –
that is, the industrial workers and collectivised peasants.
 

2. The Differentiation of the Proletariat

One would think that in a workers’ state data about real wages would be
studied with especial care – indeed that all statistics of income
according to categories of the population would be distinguished by
complete lucidity and general accessibility. As a matter of fact this
whole question, which touches the most vital interests of the toilers,
is surrounded with an impenetrable veil. The budget of the worker’s
family in the Soviet Union, unbelievable as this may be, is a magnitude
incomparably more enigmatical for the investigator than in any
capitalist country. We have tried in vain to plot the curve of real
wages of the different categories of the working class even for the
period of the second five-year plan. The stubborn silence of the sources
and authorities on this subject is as eloquent as their boasting about
meaningless totals.

According to the report of the Commissar of Heavy Industry,
Ordjonikidze, the monthly output of the worker rose, during the decade
1925 to 1935, 3.2 times, and money wages 4.5 times. What part of the
latter so impressive-looking figure is swallowed by specialists in the
upper layers of the working class and not less important, what is the
expression of this nominal sum in real values – of this we can find out
nothing either from his report or from the commentaries of the press. At
a congress of the Soviet Youth in April 1936, the secretary of the
Komsomol, Kossarov, declared: “From January 1931 to December 1935 the
wages of the youth rose 340 per cent!” But even from the carefully
selected young decoration wearers, generous in ovations, whom he
addressed, this boast did not evoke one handclap. The listeners, like
the orator, knew too well that the abrupt change to market prices had
lowered the material situation of the basic mass of the workers.

The “average” wage per person, if you join together the director of the
trust and the charwoman, was about 2800 rubles in 1935, and was to be in
1936 about 2500 rubles – that is, nominally 7500 French francs, although
hardly more than 8500 to 4000 in real purchasing power. This figure,
very modest in itself, goes still lower if you take into consideration
that the rise of wages in 1936 is only a partial compensation for the
abolition of special prices on objects of consumption, and the abolition
of a series of free services. But the principal thing is that 2500
rubles a year, or 208 rubles a month, is, as we said, the _average_
payment – that is, an arithmetical fiction whose function is to mask the
real and cruel inequality in the payment of labour.

It is indubitable that the situation of the upper layer of the workers,
especially the so-called Stakhanovists, has risen considerably during
the last year. The press is not without foundation in eagerly listing
the number of suits, shoes, gramophones, bicycles, or jars of conserves
this or that decorated worker has bought himself. Incidentally it
becomes clear how little these benefits are accessible to the
rank-and-file worker. Speaking of the impelling motives of the Stakhanov
movement, Stalin declared: “Life has become easier, life has become
happier, and when life is happy then work goes fast.” In that optimistic
illumination of the piecework system, extremely characteristic of the
ruling stratum, there is this amount of prosaic truth, that the
formation of a workers’ aristocracy has proven possible only thanks to
the preceding economic successes of the country. The motive force of the
Stakhanovists, however, is not a “happy” mood, but a desire to earn more
money. Molotov introduced this correction of Stalin: “The immediate
impulse to high productivity on the part of the Stakhanovists is a
simple interest in increasing their earnings.” That is true. In the
course of a few months an entire stratum of workers has arisen whom they
call “thousand men”, since their earnings exceed a thousand rubles a
month. There are others who earn even more than two thousand rubles a
month, while the workers of the lower categories often receive less than
a hundred.

It would seem as though this divergence of wages alone establishes a
sufficient distinction between the “rich” and “unrich” workers. But that
is not enough for the bureaucracy. They literally shower privileges upon
the Stakhanovists. They give them new apartments or repair their old
ones. They send them out of turn to resthouses and sanatoriums. They
send free teachers and physicians to their houses. They give them free
tickets to the moving pictures. In some places they even cut their hair
and shave them free and out of turn. Many of these privileges seem to be
deliberately calculated to injure and insult the average worker. The
cause of this importunate good will on the part of the authorities is,
in addition to careerism, a troubled conscience. The local ruling groups
eagerly seize the chance to escape from their isolation by allowing the
upper stratum of the workers to participate in their privileges. As a
result, the real earnings of the Stakhanovists often exceed by twenty or
thirty times the earnings of the lower categories of workers. And as for
especially fortunate specialists, their salaries would in many cases pay
for the work of eighty to a hundred unskilled laborers. In scope of
inequality in the payment of labour, the Soviet Union has not only
caught up to, but far surpassed the capitalist countries!

The best of the Stakhanovists, those who are really impelled by
socialist motives, are not happy in their privileges, but irked by them.
And no wonder. Their individual enjoyment of all kinds of material goods
on a background of general scarcity surrounds them with a ring of envy
and ill will, and poisons their existence. Relations of this kind are
farther from socialist morals than the relations of the workers of a
capitalist factory, joined together as they are in a struggle against
exploitation.

In spite of all this, everyday life is not easy even for the skilled
worker especially in the provinces. Aside from the fact that the
seven-hour working day is being more and more sacrificed to higher
productivity, no small number of hours are expended in a supplementary
struggle for existence. As a symptom of the special prosperity of the
better workers of the Soviet farms, for example, they point to the fact
that the tractor men, combine operators, etc. – an already notorious
aristocracy – own their own cows and pigs. The theory that socialism
without milk is better than milk without socialism has been abandoned.
It is now recognized that the workers in the state agricultural
undertakings, where it would seem there is no lack either of cows or
pigs, are compelled in order to guarantee their subsistence to create
their own pocket economies. No less striking is the triumphal
announcement that in Kharkov 96,000 workers have their own gardens –
other towns are challenged to vie with Kharkov. What a terrible robbery
of human power is implied by those words “his own cow” and “his own
garden”, and what a burden of medieval digging in manure and in the
earth they lay upon the worker, and yet more upon his wife and children!

As concerns the fundamental masses. they, of course, have neither cows
nor gardens, nor even in large part their own homes. The wages of
unskilled workers are 1200 to 1500 rubles a year and even less – which
under Soviet prices means a regime of destitution. Living conditions,
the most reliable indicator of the material and cultural level, are.
extremely bad, often unbearable. The overwhelming majority of the
workers huddle in common dwellings, which in equipment and upkeep are
considerably worse than barracks. When it is necessary to justify
industrial unsuccesses, malingerings and trashy products, the
administration itself through its journalists gives such a picture as
this of living conditions: “The workers sleep on the floor, since
bedbugs eat them up in the beds. The chairs are broken; there are no
mugs to drink water from, etc.” “Two families live in one room. The roof
leaks. When it rains they carry the water out of the room by pailfuls.”
“The privies are in a disgusting condition.” Such descriptions, relating
to different parts of the country, could be multiplied at will. As a
result of these unbearable conditions, “the fluidity of labour” –
writes, for example, the head of the oil industry – “has reached a very
high point ... Owing to lack of workers, a great number of the drills
are altogether abandoned.” There are certain especially unfavorable
regions, where only those will consent to work who have been fined or
discharged from other places for various violations of discipline. Thus
at the bottom of the proletariat there is accumulating a layer of
rejected Soviet pariahs, possessing no rights, and of whom nevertheless
such an important branch of industry as oil production is compelled to
make use.

As a result of these flagrant differences in wages, doubled by arbitrary
privileges, the bureaucracy has managed to introduce sharp antagonisms
in the proletariat. Accounts of the Stakhanov campaign presented at
times the picture of a small civil war. “The wrecking and breaking of
mechanisms is the favorite [!] method of struggle against the Stakhanov
movement,” wrote, for example, the organ of the trade unions. “The class
struggle,” we read farther, “makes itself felt at every step.” In this
“class” struggle, the workers are on one side, the trade unions on the
other. Stalin publicly recommended that those who resist should get it
“in the teeth.” Other members of the Central Committee have more than
once threatened to sweep the “insolent enemy” from the face of the
earth. The experience of the Stakhanov movement has made especially
clear the deep alienation between the authorities and the proletariat,
and the furious insistence with which the bureaucracy is applying the
maxim – not, it is true, invented by itself: “Divide and rule!”
Moreover, to console the workers, this forced piecework labour is called
“socialist competition.” The name sounds like a mockery!

Competition, whose roots lie in our biological inheritance, having
purged itself of greed, envy and privilege, will indubitably remain the
most important motive force of culture under communism too. But in the
closer-by preparatory epoch the actual establishment of a socialist
society can and will be achieved, not by these humiliating measures of a
backward capitalism to which the Soviet government is resorting, but by
methods more worthy of a liberated humanity – and above all not under
the whip of a bureaucracy. For this very whip is the most disgusting
inheritance from the old world. It will have to be broken in pieces and
burned at a public bonfire before you can speak of socialism without a
blush of shame. 

3. Social Contradictions in the Collective Village

If the industrial trusts are “in principle” socialist enterprises, this
cannot be said of the collective farms.

They rest not upon state, but upon group property. This is a great step
forward by comparison with individual scatteredness, but whether the
collective enterprises will lead to socialism depends upon a whole
series of circumstances, a part lying within the collectives, a part
outside them in the general conditions of the Soviet system, and a part,
finally, no less a part, on the world arena.

The struggle between the peasants and the state is far from ended. The
present still very unstable organisation of agriculture is nothing but a
temporary compromise between the struggling camps, following the
dreadful outbreak of civil war between them. To be sure, 90 per cent of
the peasant farms are collectivised, and 94 per cent of the entire
agricultural product is taken from the fields of the collective farms.
Even if you take into consideration a certain percentage of fictitious
collectives, behind which essentially individual farmers are hiding, you
still have to concede, it would seem, that the victory over individual
economy is at least nine tenths won. However, the real struggle of
forces and tendencies in the rural districts is far from contained
within the framework of a bare contrast between individual and
collective farmers.

With the purpose of pacifying the peasants, the state has found itself
compelled to make very great concessions to the proprietary and
individualist tendencies of the village, beginning with the solemn
transfer to the collectives of their land allotments for “eternal” use
that is, in essence, the annulment of the socialization of the land. Is
this a legal fiction? In dependence upon the correlation of forces, it
might prove a reality and offer in the very near future immense
difficulties for planned economy on a state-wide scale. It is far more
important, however, that the state was compelled to restore individual
peasant farming on special midget farms with their own cows, pigs,
sheep, domestic fowls, etc. In exchange for this transgressing of
socialization and limiting of collectivization, the peasant agrees
peaceably, although as yet without great zest, to work in the collective
farms, which offer him the opportunity to fulfill his obligation to the
state and get something into his own hands. The new relations still
assume such immature forms that it would: be difficult to measure them
in figures, even if the Soviet statistics were more honest. Many things,
however, permit the conclusion that in the personal existence of the
peasant his own midget holdings have no less significance than the
collectives. This means that the struggle between individualistic and
collective tendencies is still in progress throughout the whole mass of
the villages, and that its outcome is not yet decided. Which way are the
peasants inclined? They themselves do not as yet exactly know.

The People’s Commissar of Agriculture said, at the end of 1935: “Up to
the present moment, we have met great resistance from the side of the
_kulak_ elements to the fulfillment of the state plan of grain
provisioning.” This means, in other words, that the majority of
collectivised peasants “up to recent times” (and today?) considered the
surrender of grain to the state as an operation disadvantageous to them,
and were tending toward private trade. The same thing is testified to in
another manner by the Draconic laws for the protection of collective
property against plunder by the collectivised peasants themselves. It is
very instructive that the property of the collectives is insured with
the state for twenty billion rubles, and the private property of the
collectivised peasants for twenty-one billion. If this correlation does
not necessarily mean that the peasants taken separately are richer than
the collectives, it does at any rate mean that the peasants insure their
personal more carefully than their common property.

No less indicative from our point of view is the course of development
in stockbreeding. While the number of horses continued to decline up to
1935, and only as a result of a series of governmental measures has
begun during the last year to rise slightly, the increase of horned
cattle during the preceding year had already amounted to four million
head. The plan for horses was fulfilled in the favourable year 1935 only
up to 94 per cent, while in the matter of horned cattle it was
considerably exceeded. The meaning of these data becomes clear in the
fact that horses exist only as collective property, while cows are
already among the personal possessions of the majority of collectivised
peasants. It remains only to add that in the steppe regions, where the
collectivised peasants are permitted as an exception to possess a horse,
the increase of horses is considerably more rapid than in the collective
farms, which in their turn are ahead of the Soviet farms. From all this
it is not to be inferred that private small economy is superior to
large-scale socialized economy, but that the transition from the one to
the other, from barbarism to civilization, conceals many difficulties
which cannot be removed by mere administrative pressure.

“Law can never stand higher than the economic structure and the cultural
development conditioned by it.” The renting of land, although forbidden
by law, is really very widely practiced, and moreover in its most
pernicious form of share-cropping. Land is rented by one collective farm
to another, and sometimes to an outsider, and finally, sometimes to its
own more enterprising members. Unbelievable as it is, the Soviet farms –
that is, the “socialist” enterprises resort to the rental of land. And,
what is especially instructive, this is practiced by the Soviet farms of
the GPU! Under the protection of this high institution which stands
guard over the laws, the director of the Soviet farm imposes upon the
peasant renter conditions almost copied from the old landlord-peon
contracts. We thus have cases of the exploitation of peasants by the
bureaucrats, no longer in the character of agents of the state, but in
the character of semi-legal landlords.

Without in the least exaggerating the scope of such ugly phenomena,
which are of course not capable of statistical calculation, we still
cannot fail to see their enormous symptomatic significance. They
unmistakably testify to the strength of bourgeois tendencies in this
still extremely backward branch of economy which comprises the
overwhelming majority of the population. Meanwhile, market relations are
inevitably strengthening the individualistic tendencies, and deepening
the social differentiation of the village, in spite of the new structure
of property relations.

On the average, the income of each collective farm is about 4,000
rubles. But in relation to the peasants, “average” figures are even more
deceptive than in relation to the workers. It was reported in the
Kremlin, for example, that the collective fishermen earned in 1935 twice
as much as in 1934, or 1,919 rubles each, and the applause offered to
this last figure showed how considerably it rises above the earnings of
the principal mass of the collectives. On the other hand, there are
collectives in which the income amounts to 80,000 rubles for each
household, not counting either income in money and kind from individual
holdings, or the income in kind of the whole enterprise. In general, the
income of every one of these big collective farmers is ten to fifteen
times more than the wage of the “average” worker and the lower-grade
collectivised peasant.

The gradations of income are only in part determined by skill and
assiduousness in labour. Both the collectives and the personal
allotments of the peasants are of necessity placed in extraordinarily
unequal conditions, depending upon climate, soil, kind of crop, and also
upon position in relation to the towns and industrial centers. The
contrast between the city and the village not only was not softened
during the five-year plan, but on the contrary was greatly sharpened as
a result of the feverish growth of cities and new industrial regions.
This fundamental social contrast in Soviet society inevitably creates
derivative contradictions among the collectives and within the
collectives, chiefly thanks to differential rent.

The unlimited power of the bureaucracy is a no less forceful instrument
of social differentiation. It has in its hand such levers as wages,
prices, taxes, budget and credit. The completely disproportionate income
of a series of central Asiatic cotton collectives depends much more upon
the correlation of prices established by the government than upon the
work of the members of the collectives. The exploitation of certain
strata of the population by other strata has not disappeared, but has
been disguised. The first tens of thousands of “well-off” collectives
have prospered at the expense of the remaining mass of the collectives
and the industrial workers. To raise all the collectives to a level of
well-being is an incomparably more difficult and prolonged task than to
give privileges to the minority at the expense of a majority. In 1927
the Left Opposition declared that “the income of the _kulak_ has
increased immeasurably more than that of the workers,” and this
proposition retains its force now too, although in a changed form. The
income of the upper class of collectives has grown immeasurably more
than the income of the fundamental peasant and worker mass. The
differentiation of material levels of existence is now, perhaps, even
more considerable than on the eve of dekulakization.

The differentiation taking place _within_ the collectives finds its
expression partly in the sphere of personal consumption; partly it
precipitates itself in the personal enterprises adjoining the
collectives, since the fundamental property of the collective itself is
socialized. The differentiation _between_ collectives is already having
deeper consequences, since the rich collective has the opportunity to
apply more fertilizer and more machines, and consequently to get rich
quicker. The successful collectives often hire labour power from the
poor ones, and the authorities shut their eyes to this. The deeding over
of land allotments of unequal value to the collectives greatly promotes
a further differentiation between them, and consequently the
crystallizing of a species of bourgeois collectives, or “millionaire
collectives” as they are even now called.

Of course the state power is able to interfere as a regulator in the
process of social differentiation among the peasantry. But in what
direction and within what limits? To attack the _kulak_ collectives and
members of collectives would be to open up a new conflict with the more
“progressive” layers of the peasantry, who are only now, after a painful
interruption, beginning to feel an exceptionally greedy thirst for a
“happy life.” Moreover – and this is the chief thing – the state power
itself becomes less and less capable of socialist control. In
agriculture as in industry, it seeks the support and friendship of
strong, successful “Stakhanovists of the fields,” of millionaire
collectives. Starting with a concern for the development of the
productive forces, it invariably ends with a concern about itself. It is
exactly in agriculture, where consumption is so closely bound up with
production, that collectivization has opened up grandiose opportunities
for the parasitism of the bureaucracy, and therewith for its intergrowth
with the upper circles of the collectives. Those complimentary “gifts”,
which the collective farmers present to the leaders at solemn sessions
in the Kremlin, are only the symbolic expression of an unsymbolic
tribute which they place at the disposal of the local representatives of
power.

Thus in agriculture immeasurably more than in industry, the low level of
production comes into continual conflict with the socialist and even
co-operative (collective farm) forms of property. The bureaucracy, which
in the last analysis grew out of this contradiction, deepens it in turn.
 

4. The Social Physiognomy of the Ruling Stratum

In Soviet political literature you often meet with accusations of
“bureaucratism” as a bad custom of thought or method of work. (The
accusation is always directed from above downward and is a method of
self-defense on the part of the upper circles.) But what you cannot meet
anywhere is an investigation of the bureaucracy as a ruling stratum –
its numbers and structure, its flesh and blood, its privileges and
appetites, and the share of the national income which it swallows up.
Nevertheless it exists. And the fact that it so carefully conceals its
social physiognomy proves that it possesses the specific consciousness
of a ruling “class” which, however, is still far from confident of its
right to rule.

It is absolutely impossible to describe the Soviet bureaucracy in
accurate figures, and that for reasons of two kinds. In the first place,
in a country where the state is almost the sole employer it is hard to
say where the administrative apparatus ends. In the second place, upon
this question the Soviet statisticians, economists and publicists
preserve, as we have said, an especially concentrated silence. And they
are imitated by their “friends.” We remark in passing that in all the
twelve hundred pages of their labour of compilation, the Webbs never
once mention the Soviet bureaucracy as a social category. And no wonder,
for they wrote, in the essence of the matter, under its dictation!

The central state apparatus numbered on November 1, 1933, according to
official figures about 55,000 people in the directing personnel. But in
this figure, which has increased extraordinarily in recent years, there
are not included, on the one hand, the military and naval departments
and the GPU, and, on the other, the co-operative centers and the series
of so-called social organisations such as the Ossoaviokhim. [1] Each of
the republics, moreover, has its own governmental apparatus.

Parallel with the state, trade union, co-operative and other general
staffs, and partly interwoven with them, there stands the powerful staff
of the party. We will hardly be exaggerating if we number the commanding
upper circles of the Soviet Union and the individual republics at
400,000 people. It is possible that at the present time this number has
already risen to the half-million mark. This does not include
functionaries, but, so to speak, “dignitaries”, “leaders”, a ruling
caste in the proper sense of the word, although, to be sure,
hierarchically divided in its turn by very important horizontal
boundaries.

This half-million upper caste is supported by a heavy administrative
pyramid with a broad and many-faceted foundation. The executive
committees of the provincial town and district soviets, together with
the parallel organs of the party, the trade unions, the Communist Youth,
the local organs of transport, the commanding staffs of the army and
fleet, and the agentry of the GPU, should give a number in the vicinity
of two million. And we must not forget also the presidents of the
soviets of six hundred thousand towns and villages.

The immediate administration of the industrial enterprises was
concentrated in 1933 (there are no more recent data) in the hands of
17,000 directors and vice-directors. The whole administrative and
technical personnel of the shops, factories and mines, counting lower
links down to and including the foremen, amounted to about 250,000
people (although, of these, 54,000 were specialists without
administrative functions in the proper sense of the word). To this we
must add the party and trade-union apparatus in the factories, where
administration is carried on, as is well known, in the manner of the
“triangle.” A figure of half a million for the administration of the
industrial enterprises of all-union significance will not be at the
present time exaggerated. And to this we must add the administrative
personnel of the undertakings of the separate republics and the local
soviets.

In another cross-section the official statistics indicate for 1933 more
than 860,000 administrators and specialists in the whole Soviet economy
– in industry over 480,000, in transport over 100,000, in agriculture
93,000, in commerce 25,000. In this number are included, to be sure,
specialists without administrative power, but on the other hand neither
collective farms nor co-operatives are included. These data, too, have
been left far behind during the last two and a half years.

For 250,000 collective farms, if you count only the presidents and party
organizers, there are a half-million administrators. In actual reality,
the number is immeasurably higher. If you add the Soviet farms and the
tractor and machinery stations, the general number of commanders of the
socialized agriculture far exceeds a million.

The state possessed, in 1935, 115,000 trade departments, the
co-operatives 200,000. The leaders of both are in essence not commercial
employees, but functionaries of the state, and moreover monopolists.
Even the Soviet press from time to time complains that “the co-operators
have ceased to regard the members of the collective as their electors” –
as though the mechanism of the co-operatives could be qualitatively
distinguished from that of the trade unions, soviets and the party
itself ! This whole stratum, which does not engage directly in
productive labour, but administers, orders, commands, pardons and
punishes – teachers and students we are leaving aside must be numbered
at five or six million. This total figure, like the items composing it,
by no means pretends to accuracy, but it will do well enough for a first
approach. It is sufficient to convince us that “the general line” of the
leadership is not a disembodied spirit.

In the various stages or stories of this ruling structure, passing from
below upward, the communist filling amounts to from 20 to 90 per cent.
In the whole mass of the bureaucracy, the communists together with the
Communist Youth constitute a block of 1½ to 2 million – at present,
owing to continued purgations, rather less than more. This is the
backbone of the state power. These same communist administrators are the
backbone of the party, and of the Communist Youth. The former Bolshevik
party is now no longer the vanguard of the proletariat, but the
political organisation of the bureaucracy. The remaining mass of the
members of the party and the Communist Youth serve only as a source for
the formation of this “active” – that is, a reserve for the
replenishment of the bureaucracy. The nonparty “active” serves the same
purpose. Hypothetically, we may assume that the labour and collectivised
peasant aristocracy, the Stakhanovists, the nonparty “active”, trusted
personages, their relatives and relatives-in-law, approximate the same
figure that we adopted for the bureaucracy, that is, five to six
million. With their families, these two interpenetrating strata
constitute as many as twenty to twenty-five million. We make a
comparatively low estimate of the numbers in a family for the reason
that often husband and wife, and sometimes also son and daughter, occupy
a place in the apparatus. Moreover, the wives of the ruling group find
it much easier to limit the size of their family than workingwomen, and
above all peasant women. The present campaign against abortion was set
in motion by the bureaucracy, but does not apply to it. Twelve per cent,
or perhaps 15 per cent, of the population – that is the authentic social
basis of the autocratic ruling circles.

Where a separate room and sufficient food and neat clothing are still
accessible only to a small minority, millions of bureaucrats, great and
small, try to use the power primarily in order to guarantee their own
well-being. Hence the enormous egoism of this stratum, its firm inner
solidarity, its fear of the discontent of the masses, its rabid
insistence upon strangling all criticism, and finally its hypocritically
religious kowtowing to “the Leader”, who embodies and defends the power
and privileges of these new lords.

The bureaucracy itself is still far less homogeneous than the
proletariat or the peasantry. There is a gulf between the president of
the rural soviet and the dignitary of the Kremlin. The life of the lower
functionaries of various categories proceeds essentially upon a very
primitive level – lower than the standard of living of the skilled
worker of the West. But everything is relative, and the level of the
surrounding population is considerably lower. The fate of the president
of the collective farm, of the party organizer, of the lower order of
co-operator, like that of the highest bosses, does not in the least
depend upon so-called “electors.” Any one of these functionaries can be
sacrificed at any moment by the bosses next above, in order to quiet
some discontent. But moreover each of them can on occasion raise himself
a step higher. They are all, at least up to the first serious shock,
bound together by mutual guarantees of security with the Kremlin.

In its conditions of life, the ruling stratum comprises all gradations,
from the petty bourgeoisie of the backwoods to the big bourgeoisie of
the capitals. To these material conditions correspond habits, interests
and circles of ideas. The present leaders of the Soviet trade unions are
not much different in their psychological type from the Citrines,
Jouhaux’s and Greens. Other phraseology, but the same scornfully
patronizing relation to the masses, the same conscienceless astuteness
in second-rate maneuvers, the same conservativism, the same narrowness
of horizon, the same hard concern for their own peace, and finally the
same worship for the most trivial forms of bourgeois culture. The Soviet
colonels and generals are in the majority little different from the
colonels and generals of the rest of the earth, and in any case are
trying their best to be like them. The Soviet diplomats have
appropriated from the Western diplomats not only their tailcoats, but
their modes of thought. The Soviet journalists fool the readers no less
than their foreign colleagues, although they do it in a special manner.

If it is difficult to estimate the numbers of the bureaucracy, it is
still harder to determine their income. As early as 1927, the Left
Opposition protested that the “swollen and privileged administrative
apparatus is devouring a very considerable part of the surplus value.”
In the Opposition platform it was estimated that the trade apparatus
alone “devours an enormous share of the national income more than one
tenth of the total production.” After that the authorities took the
necessary measures to make such estimates impossible. But for that very
reason overhead expenses have not been cut down, but have grown.

It is no better in other spheres than in the sphere of trade. It
required, as Rakovsky wrote in 1930, a fleeting quarrel between the
party and the trade-union bureaucrats in order that the population
should find out from the press that out of the budget of the trade
unions, amounting to 400,000,000 rubles, 80,000,000 go for the support
of the personnel. And here, we remark, it was a question only of the
legal budget. Over and above this, the bureaucracy of the trade unions
receives from the industrial bureaucracy in token of friendship immense
gifts of money, apartments, means of transport, etc. “How much goes for
the support of party, co-operative, collective farm, Soviet farm,
industrial and administrative apparatus with all their ramifications?”
asked Rakovsky. And he answered: “We possess not even hypothetical
information.”

Freedom from control inevitably entails abuse of office, including
pecuniary malfeasance. On September 29, 1931;, the government, compelled
again to raise the question of the bad work of the co-operatives,
established over the signatures of Molotov and Stalin, and not for the
first time, “the presence of immense plunderings and squanderings and
losses in the work of many of the rural consumers’ societies.” At a
session of the Central Executive Committee in January 1936, the People’s
Commissar of Finance complained that local executive committees permit
completely arbitrary expenditures of state funds. If the Commissar was
silent about the central institutions, it was only because he himself
belongs to their circle. There is no possibility of estimating what
share of the national income is appropriated by the bureaucracy. This is
not only because it carefully conceals even its legalized incomes. It is
not only because standing on the very boundary of malfeasance, and often
stepping over the boundary, it makes a wide use of unforeseen incomes.
It is chiefly because the whole advance in social well-being, municipal
utilities, comfort, culture, art, still serves chiefly, if not
exclusively, this upper privileged stratum. In regard to the bureaucracy
as a consumer, we may, with the necessary changes, repeat what was said
about the bourgeoisie. There is no reason or sense in exaggerating its
appetite for articles of personal consumption. But the situation changes
sharply as soon as we take into consideration its almost monopolistic
enjoyment of the old and new conquests of civilization. Formally, these
good things are, of course, available to the whole population, or at
least to the population of the cities. But in reality they are
accessible only in exceptional cases. The bureaucracy, on the contrary,
avails itself of them as a rule when and to what extent it wishes as of
its personal property. If you count not only salaries and all forms of
service in kind, and every type of semi-legal supplementary source of
income, but also add the share of the bureaucracy and the Soviet
aristocracy in the theaters, rest palaces, hospitals, sanatoriums,
summer resorts, museums, clubs, athletic institutions, etc., etc., it
would probably be necessary to conclude that 15 per cent, or, say, 20
per cent, of the population enjoys not much less of the wealth than is
enjoyed by the remaining 80 to 85 per cent.

The “friends” will want to dispute our figures? Let them give us others
more accurate. Let them persuade the bureaucracy to publish the income
and expense book of Soviet society. Until they do, we shall hold to our
opinion. The distribution of this earth’s goods in the Soviet Union, we
do not doubt, is incomparably more democratic than it was in tzarist
Russia, and even than it is in the most democratic countries of the
West. But it has as yet little in common with socialism.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Society for the Defense of the Soviet Union and Development of Its
Aviation and Chemical Industries.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 7 FAMILY, YOUTH AND CULTURE


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Thermidor in the Family

The October revolution honestly fulfilled its obligations in relation to
woman. The young government not only gave her all political and legal
rights in equality with man, but, what is more important, did all that
it could, and in any case incomparably more than any other government
ever did, actually to secure her access to all forms of economic and
cultural work. However, the boldest revolution, like the “all-powerful”
British parliament, cannot convert a woman into a man – or rather,
cannot divide equally between them the burden of pregnancy, birth,
nursing and the rearing of children. The revolution made a heroic effort
to destroy the so-called “family hearth” – that archaic, stuffy and
stagnant institution in which the woman of the toiling classes performs
galley labour from childhood to death. The place of the family as a
shut-in petty enterprise was to be occupied, according to the plans, by
a finished system of social care and accommodation: maternity houses,
creches, kindergartens, schools, social dining rooms, social laundries,
first-aid stations, hospitals, sanatoria, athletic organisations,
moving-picture theaters, etc. The complete absorption of the
housekeeping functions of the family by institutions of the socialist
society, uniting all generations in solidarity and mutual aid, was to
bring to woman, and thereby to the loving couple, a real liberation from
the thousand-year-old fetters. Up to now this problem of problems has
not been solved. The forty million Soviet families remain in their
overwhelming majority nests of medievalism, female slavery and hysteria,
daily humiliation of children, feminine and childish superstition. We
must permit ourselves no illusions on this account. For that very
reason, the consecutive changes in the approach to the problem of the
family in the Soviet Union best of all characterize the actual nature of
Soviet society and the evolution of its ruling stratum.

It proved impossible to take the old family by storm – not because the
will was lacking, and not because the family was so firmly rooted in
men’s hearts. On the contrary, after a short period of distrust of the
government and its creches, kindergartens and like institutions, the
working women, and after them the more advanced peasants, appreciated
the immeasurable advantages of the collective care of children as well
as the socialization of the whole family economy. Unfortunately society
proved too poor and little cultured. The real resources of the state did
not correspond to the plans and intentions of the Communist Party. You
cannot “abolish” the family; you have to replace it. The actual
liberation of women is unrealizable on a basis of “generalized want.”
Experience soon proved this austere truth which Marx had formulated
eighty years before.

During the lean years, the workers wherever possible, and in part their
families, ate in the factory and other social dining rooms, and this
fact was officially regarded as a transition to a socialist form of
life. There is no need of pausing again upon the peculiarities of the
different periods: military communism, the NEP and the first five-year
plan. The fact is that from the moment of the abolition of the food-card
system in 1935, all the better placed workers began to return to the
home dining table. It would be incorrect to regard this retreat as a
condemnation of the socialist system, which in general was never tried
out. But so much the more withering was the judgment of the workers and
their wives upon the “social feeding” organized by the bureaucracy. The
same conclusion must be extended to the social laundries, where they
tear and steal linen more than they wash it. Back to the family hearth!
But home cooking and the home washtub, which are now half shamefacedly
celebrated by orators and journalists, mean the return of the workers’
wives to their pots and pans that is, to the old slavery. It is doubtful
if the resolution of the Communist International on the “complete and
irrevocable triumph of socialism in the Soviet Union” sounds very
convincing to the women of the factory districts!

The rural family, bound up not only with home industry but with
agriculture, is infinitely more stable and conservative than that of the
town. Only a few, and as a general rule, anaemic agricultural communes
introduced social dining rooms and creches in the first period.
Collectivization, according to the first announcements, was to initiate
a decisive change in the sphere of the family. Not for nothing did they
expropriate the peasant’s chickens as well as his cows. There was no
lack, at any rate, of announcements about the triumphal march of social
dining rooms throughout the country. But when the retreat began, reality
suddenly emerged from the shadow of this bragging. The peasant gets from
the collective farm, as a general rule, only bread for himself and
fodder for his stock. Meat, dairy products and vegetables, he gets
almost entirely from the adjoining private lots. And once the most
important necessities of life are acquired by the isolated efforts of
the family, there can no longer be any talk of social dining rooms. Thus
the midget farms, creating a new basis for the domestic hearthstone, lay
a double burden upon woman.

The total number of steady accommodations in the creches amounted, in
1932, to 600,000, and of seasonal accommodations solely during work in
the fields to only about 4,000,000. In 1935 the cots numbered 5,600,000,
but the steady ones were still only an insignificant part of the total.
Moreover, the existing creches, even in Moscow, Leningrad and other
centers, are not satisfactory as a general rule to the least fastidious
demands. “A creche in which the child feels worse than he does at home
is not a creche but a bad orphan asylum,” complains a leading Soviet
newspaper. It is no wonder if the better-placed workers’ families avoid
creches. But for the fundamental mass of the toilers, the number even of
these “bad orphan asylums” is insignificant. Just recently the Central
Executive Committee introduced a resolution that foundlings and orphans
should be placed in private hands for bringing up. Through its highest
organ, the bureaucratic government thus acknowledged its bankruptcy in
relation to the most important socialist function. The number of
children in kindergartens rose during the five years 1930-1935 from
370,000 to 1,181,000. The lowness of the figure for 1930 is striking,
but the figure for 1935 also seems only a drop in the ocean of Soviet
families. A further investigation would undoubtedly show that the
principal, and in any case the better part of these kindergartens,
appertain to the families of the administration, the technical
personnel, the Stakhanovists, etc.

The same Central Executive Committee was not long ago compelled to
testify openly that the “resolution on the liquidation of homeless and
uncared-for children is being weakly carried out.” What is concealed
behind this dispassionate confession? Only by accident, from newspaper
remarks printed in small type, do we know that in Moscow more than a
thousand children are living in “extraordinarily difficult family
conditions”; that in the so-called children’s homes of the capital there
are about 1,500 children who have nowhere to go and are turned out into
the streets; that during the two autumn months of 1935 in Moscow and
Leningrad “7,500 parents were brought to court for leaving their
children without supervision.” What good did it do to bring them to
court? How many thousand parents have avoided going to court? How many
children in “extraordinarily difficult conditions” remained unrecorded?
In what do _extraordinarily_ difficult conditions differ from _simply_
difficult ones? Those are the questions which remain unanswered. A vast
amount of the homelessness of children, obvious and open as well as
disguised, is a direct result of the great social crisis in the course
of which the old family continues to dissolve far faster than the new
institutions are capable of replacing it.

From these same accidental newspaper remarks and from episodes in the
criminal records, the reader may find out about the existence in the
Soviet Union of prostitution – that is, the extreme degradation of woman
in the interests of men who can pay for it. In the autumn of the past
year IZVESTIA suddenly informed its readers, for example, of the arrest
in Moscow of “as many as a thousand women who were secretly selling
themselves on the streets of the proletarian capital.” Among those
arrested were 177 working women, 92 clerks, 5 university students, etc.
What drove them to the sidewalks? Inadequate wages, want, the necessity
to “get a little something for a dress, for shoes.” We should vainly
seek the approximate dimensions of this social evil. The modest
bureaucracy orders the statistician to remain silent. But that enforced
silence itself testifies unmistakably to the numerousness of the “class”
of Soviet prostitutes. Here there can be essentially no question of
“relics of the past”; prostitutes are recruited from the younger
generation. No reasonable person, of course, would think of placing
special blame for this sore, as old as civilization, upon the Soviet
regime. But it is unforgivable in the presence of prostitution to talk
about the triumph of socialism. The newspapers assert, to be sure
insofar as they are permitted to touch upon this ticklish theme – that
“prostitution is decreasing.” It is possible that this is really true by
comparison with the years of hunger and decline (1931-1933). But the
restoration of money relations which has taken place since then,
abolishing all direct rationing, will inevitably lead to a new growth of
prostitution as well as of homeless children. Wherever there are
privileged there are pariahs !

The mass homelessness of children is undoubtedly the most unmistakable
and most tragic symptom of the difficult situation of the mother. On
this subject even the optimistic PRAVDA is sometimes compelled to make a
bitter confession: “The birth of a child is for many women a serious
menace to their position.” It is just for this reason that the
revolutionary power gave women the right to abortion, which in
conditions of want and family distress, whatever may be said upon this
subject by the eunuchs and old maids of both sexes, is one of her most
important civil, political and cultural rights. However, this right of
women too, gloomy enough in itself, is under the existing social
inequality being converted into a privilege. Bits of information
trickling into the press about the practice of abortion are literally
shocking. Thus through only one village hospital in one district of the
Urals, there passed in 1935 “195 women mutilated by midwives” – among
them 33 working women, 28 clerical workers, 65 collective farm women, 58
housewives, etc. This Ural district differs from the majority of other
districts only in that information about it happened to get into the
press. How many women are mutilated every day throughout the extent of
the Soviet Union?

Having revealed its inability to serve women who are compelled to resort
to abortion with the necessary medical aid and sanitation, the state
makes a sharp change of course, and takes the road of prohibition. And
just as in other situations, the bureaucracy makes a virtue of
necessity. One of the members of the highest Soviet court, Soltz, a
specialist on matrimonial questions, bases the forthcoming prohibition
of abortion on the fact that in a socialist society where there are no
unemployed, etc., etc., a woman has no right to decline “the joys of
motherhood.” The philosophy of a priest endowed also with the powers of
a gendarme. We just heard from the central organ of the ruling party
that the birth of a child is for many women, and it would be truer to
say for the overwhelming majority, “a menace to their position.” We just
heard from the highest Soviet institution that “the liquidation of
homeless and uncared-for children is being weakly carried out,” which
undoubtedly means a new increase of homelessness. But here the highest
Soviet judge informs us that in a country where “life is happy” abortion
should be punished with imprisonment – just exactly as in capitalist
countries where life is grievous. It is clear in advance that in the
Soviet Union as in the West those who will fall into the claws of the
jailer will be chiefly working women, servants, peasant wives, who find
it hard to conceal their troubles. As far as concerns “our women”, who
furnish the demand for fine perfumes and other pleasant things, they
will, as formerly, do what they find necessary under the very nose of an
indulgent justiciary. “We have need of people,” concludes Soltz, closing
his eyes to the homeless. “Then have the kindness to bear them
yourselves,” might be the answer to the high judge of millions of
toiling women, if the bureaucracy had not sealed their lips with the
seal of silence. These gentlemen have, it seems, completely forgotten
that socialism was to remove the cause which impels woman to abortion,
and not force her into the “joys of motherhood” with the help of a foul
police interference in what is to every woman the most intimate sphere
of life.

The draft of the law forbidding abortion was submitted to so-called
universal popular discussion, and even through the fine sieve of the
Soviet press many bitter complaints and stifled protests broke out. The
discussion was cut off as suddenly as it had been announced, and on June
27th the Central Executive Committee converted the shameful draft into a
thrice shameful law. Even some of the official apologists of the
bureaucracy were embarrassed. Louis Fischer declared this piece of
legislation something in the nature of a deplorable misunderstanding. In
reality the new law against women – with an exception in favor of ladies
– is the natural and logical fruit of a Thermidorian reaction.

The triumphal rehabilitation of the family, taking place simultaneously
– what a providential coincidence! – with the rehabilitation of the
ruble, is caused by the material and cultural bankruptcy of the state.
Instead of openly saying, “We have proven still too poor and ignorant
for the creation of socialist relations among men, our children and
grandchildren will realize this aim”, the leaders are forcing people to
glue together again the shell of the broken family, and not only that,
but to consider it, under threat of extreme penalties, the sacred
nucleus of triumphant socialism. It is hard to measure with the eye the
scope of this retreat.

Everybody and everything is dragged into the new course: lawgiver and
litterateur, court and militia, newspaper and schoolroom. When a naive
and honest communist youth makes bold to write in his paper: “You would
do better to occupy yourself with solving the problem how woman can get
out of the clutches of the family,” he receives in answer a couple of
good smacks and – is silent. The ABCs of communism are declared a
“leftist excess.” The stupid and stale prejudices of uncultured
philistines are resurrected in the name of a new morale. And what is
happening in daily life in all the nooks and corners of this measureless
country? The press reflects only in a faint degree the depth of the
Thermidorian reaction in the sphere of the family.

Since the noble passion of evangelism grows with the growth of sin, the
seventh commandment is acquiring great popularity in the ruling stratum.
The Soviet moralists have only to change the phraseology slightly. A
campaign is opened against too frequent and easy divorces. The creative
thought of the lawgivers had already invented such a “socialistic”
measure as the taking of money payment upon registration of divorces,
and increasing it when divorces were repeated. Not for nothing we
remarked above that the resurrection of the family goes hand in hand
with the increase of the educative role of the ruble. A tax indubitably
makes registration difficult for those for whom it is difficult to pay.
For the upper circles, the payment, we may hope, will not offer any
difficulty. Moreover, people possessing nice apartments, automobiles and
other good things arrange their personal affairs without unnecessary
publicity and consequently without registration. It is only on the
bottom of society that prostitution has a heavy and humiliating
character. On the heights of the Soviet society, where power is combined
with comfort, prostitution takes the elegant form of small mutual
services, and even assumes the aspect of the “socialist family.” We have
already heard from Sosnovsky about the importance of the
“automobile-harem factor” in the degeneration of the ruling stratum.

The lyric, academical and other “friends of the Soviet Union” have eyes
in order to see nothing. The marriage and family laws established by the
October revolution, once the object of its legitimate pride, are being
made over and mutilated by vast borrowings from the law treasuries of
the bourgeois countries. And as though on purpose to stamp treachery
with ridicule, the same arguments which were earlier advanced in favor
of unconditional freedom of divorce and abortion – “the liberation of
women,” “defence of the rights of personality,” “protection of
motherhood” – are repeated now in favor of their limitation and complete
prohibition.

The retreat not only assumes forms of disgusting hypocrisy, but also is
going infinitely farther than the iron economic necessity demands. To
the objective causes producing this return to such bourgeois forms as
the payment of alimony, there is added the social interest of the ruling
stratum in the deepening of bourgeois law. The most compelling motive of
the present cult of the family is undoubtedly the need of the
bureaucracy for a stable hierarchy of relations, and for the
disciplining of youth by means of 40,000,000 points of support for
authority and power.

While the hope still lived of concentrating the education of the new
generations in the hands of the state, the government was not only
unconcerned about supporting the authority of the “elders”, and, in
particular of the mother and father, but on the contrary tried its best
to separate the children from the family, in order thus to protect them
from the traditions of a stagnant mode of life. Only a little while ago,
in the course of the first five-year plan, the schools and the Communist
Youth were using children for the exposure, shaming and in general
“re-educating” of their drunken fathers or religious mothers with what
success is another question. At any rate, this method meant a shaking of
parental authority to its very foundations. In this not unimportant
sphere too, a sharp turn has now been made. Along with the seventh, the
fifth commandment is also fully restored to its rights as yet, to be
sure, without any references to God. But the French schools also get
along without this supplement, and that does not prevent them from
successfully inculcating conservatism and routine.

Concern for the authority of the older generation, by the way, has
already led to a change of policy in the matter of religion. The denial
of God, his assistance and his miracles, was the sharpest wedge of all
those which the revolutionary power drove between children and parents.
Outstripping the development of culture, serious propaganda and
scientific education, the struggle with the churches, under the
leadership of people of the type of Yaroslavsky, often degenerated into
buffoonery and mischief. The storming of heaven, like the storming of
the family, is now brought to a stop. The bureaucracy, concerned about
their reputation for respectability, have ordered the young “godless” to
surrender their fighting armor and sit down to their books. In relation
to religion, there is gradually being established a regime of ironical
neutrality. But that is only the first stage. It would not be difficult
to predict the second and third, if the course of events depended only
upon those in authority.

The hypocrisy of prevailing opinion develops everywhere and always as
the square, or cube, of the social contradictions. Such approximately is
the historic law of ideology translated into the language of
mathematics. Socialism, if it is worthy of the name, means human
relations without greed, friendship without envy and intrigue, love
without base calculation. The official doctrine declares these ideal
norms already realised – and with more insistence the louder the reality
protests against such declarations. “On a basis of real equality between
men and women,” says, for example, the new program of the Communist
Youth, adopted in April 1986, “a new family is coming into being, the
flourishing of which will be a concern of the Soviet state.” An official
commentary supplements the program: “Our youth in the choice of a
life-friend – wife or husband – know only one motive, one impulse: love.
The bourgeois marriage of pecuniary convenience does not exist for our
growing generation.” (PRAVDA, April 4, 1936.) So far as concerns the
rank-and-file workingman and woman, this is more or less true. But
“marriage for money” is comparatively little known also to the workers
of capitalist countries. Things are quite different in the middle and
upper strata. New social groupings automatically place their stamp upon
personal relations. The vices which power and money create in sex
relations are flourishing as luxuriously in the ranks of the Soviet
bureaucracy as though it had set itself the goal of outdoing in this
respect the Western bourgeoisie.

In complete contradiction to the just quoted assertion of PRAVDA,
“marriage for convenience,” as the Soviet press itself in moments of
accidental or unavoidable frankness confesses, is now fully resurrected.
Qualifications, wages, employment, number of chevrons on the military
uniform, are acquiring more and more significance, for with them are
bound up questions of shoes, and fur coats, and apartments, and
bathrooms, and – the ultimate dream – automobiles. The mere struggle for
a room unites and divorces no small number of couples every year in
Moscow. The question of relatives has acquired exceptional significance.
It is useful to have as a father-in-law a military commander or an
influential communist, as a mother-in-law the sister of a high
dignitary. Can we wonder at this? Could it be otherwise?

One of the very dramatic chapters in the great book of the Soviets will
be the tale of the disintegration and breaking up of those Soviet
families where the husband as a party member, trade unionist, military
commander or administrator, grew and developed and acquired new tastes
in life, and the wife, crushed by the family, remained on the old level.
The road of the two generations of the Soviet bureaucracy is sown thick
with the tragedies of wives rejected and left behind. The same
phenomenon is now to be observed in the new generation. The greatest of
all crudities and cruelties are to be met perhaps in the very heights of
the bureaucracy, where a very large percentage are parvenus of little
culture, who consider that everything i8 permitted to them. Archives and
memoirs will some day expose downright crimes in relation to wives, and
to women in genera], on the part of those evangelists of family morals
and the compulsory “joys of motherhood,” who are, owing to their
position, immune from prosecution.

No, the Soviet woman is not yet free. Complete equality before the law
has so far given infinitely more to the women of the upper strata,
representatives of bureaucratic, technical, pedagogical and, in general,
intellectual work, than to the working women and yet more the peasant
women. So long as society is incapable of taking upon itself the
material concern for the family, the mother can successfully fulfill a
social function only on condition that she has in her service a white
slave: nurse, servant, cook, etc. Out of the 40,000,000 families which
constitute the population of the Soviet Union, 5 per cent, or maybe 10,
build their “hearthstone” directly or indirectly upon the labour of
domestic slaves. An accurate census of Soviet servants would have as
much significance for the socialistic appraisal of the position of women
in the Soviet Union as the whole Soviet law code, no matter how
progressive it might be. But for this very reason the Soviet statistics
hide servants under the name of “working woman” or “and others”! The
situation of the mother of the family who is an esteemed communist, has
a cook, a telephone for giving orders to the stores, an automobile for
errands, etc., has little in common with the situation of the working
woman who is compelled to run to the shops, prepare dinner herself, and
carry her children on foot from the kindergarten – if, indeed, a
kindergarten is available. No socialist labels can conceal this social
contrast, which is no less striking than the contrast between the
bourgeois lady and the proletarian woman in any country of the West.

The genuinely socialist family, from which society will remove the daily
vexation of unbearable and humiliating cares, will have no need of any
regimentation, and the very idea of laws about abortion and divorce will
sound no better within its walls than the recollection of houses of
prostitution or human sacrifices. The October legislation took a bold
step in the direction of such a family. Economic and cultural
backwardness has produced a cruel reaction. The Thermidorian legislation
is beating a retreat to the bourgeois models, covering its retreat with
false speeches about the sacredness of the “new” family. On this
question, too, socialist bankruptcy covers itself with hypocritical
respectability.

There are sincere observers who are, especially upon the question of
children, shaken by the contrast here between high principles and ugly
reality. The mere fact of the furious criminal measures that have been
adopted against homeless children is enough to suggest that the
socialist legislation in defence of women and children is nothing but
crass hypocrisy. There are observers of an opposite kind who are
deceived by the broadness and magnanimity of those ideas that have been
dressed up in the form of laws and administrative institutions. When
they see destitute mothers, prostitutes and homeless children, these
optimists tell themselves that a further growth of material wealth will
gradually fill the socialist laws with flesh and blood. It is not easy
to decide which of these two modes of approach is more mistaken and more
harmful. Only people stricken with historical blindness can fail to see
the broadness and boldness of the social plan, the significance of the
first stages of its development, and the immense possibilities opened by
it. But on the other hand, it is impossible not to be indignant at the
passive and essentially indifferent optimism of those who shut their
eyes to the growth of social contradictions, and comfort themselves with
gazing into a future, the key to which they respectfully propose to
leave in the hands of the bureaucracy. As though the equality of rights
of women and men were not already converted into an equality of
deprivation of rights by that same bureaucracy ! And as though in some
book of wisdom it were firmly promised that the Soviet bureaucracy will
not introduce a new oppression in place of liberty.

How man enslaved woman, how the exploiter subjected them both, how the
toilers have attempted at the price of blood to free themselves from
slavery and have only exchanged one chain for another – history tells us
much about all this. In essence, it tells us nothing else. But how in
reality to free the child, the woman and the human being? For that we
have as yet no reliable models. All past historical experience, wholly
negative, demands of the toilers at least and first of all an implacable
distrust of all privileged and uncontrolled guardians.
 

2.The Struggle Against the Youth

Every revolutionary party finds its chief support in the younger
generation of the rising class. Political decay expresses itself in a
loss of ability to attract the youth under one’s banner. The parties of
bourgeois democracy, in withdrawing one after another from the scene,
are compelled to turn over the young either to revolution or fascism.
Bolshevism when underground was always a party of young workers. The
Mensheviks relied upon the more respectable skilled upper stratum of the
working class, always prided themselves on it, and looked down upon the
Bolsheviks. Subsequent events harshly showed them their mistake. At the
decisive moment the youth carried with them the more mature stratum and
even the old folks.

The revolution gave a mighty historical impulse to the new Soviet
generation. It cut them free at one blow from conservative forms of
life, and exposed to them the great secret – the first secret of the
dialectic – that there is nothing unchanging on this earth, and that
society is made out of plastic materials. How stupid is the theory of
unchanging racial types in the light of the events of our epoch ! The
Soviet Union is an immense melting pot in which the characters of dozens
of nationalities are being mixed. The mysticism of the “Slavic soul” is
coming off like scum.

But the impulse given to the younger generation has not yet found
expression in a corresponding historic enterprise. To be sure, the youth
are very active in the sphere of economics. In the Soviet Union there
are 7,000,000 workers under twenty-three – 3,140,000 in industry,
700,000 in the railroads, 700,000 in the building trades. In the new
giant factories, about half the workers are young. There are now
1,200,000 Communist Youth in the collective farms. Hundreds of thousands
of members of the Communist Youth have been mobilized during recent
years for construction work, timber work, coal mining, gold production,
for work in the Arctic, Sakhalin, or in Amur where the new town of
Komsomolsk is in process of construction. The new generation is putting
out shock brigades, champion workers, Stakhanovists, foremen,
under-administrators. The youth are studying, and a considerable part of
them are studying assiduously. They are as active, if not more so, in
the sphere of athletics in its most daring or warlike forms, such as
parachute jumping and marksmanship. The enterprising and audacious are
going on all kinds of dangerous expeditions.

“The better part of our youth,” said recently the well-known polar
explorer, Schmidt, “are eager to work where difficulties await them.”
This is undoubtedly true. But in all spheres the post-revolutionary
generation is still under guardianship. They are told from above what to
do, and how to do it. Politics, as the highest form of command, remains
wholly in the hands of the so-called “Old Guard”, and in all the ardent
and frequently flattering speeches they address to the youth the old
boys are vigilantly defending their own monopoly.

Not conceiving of the development of a socialist society without the
dying away of the state that is, without the replacement of all kinds of
police oppression by the self-administration of educated producers and
consumers – Engels laid tile accomplishment of this task upon the
younger generation, “who will grow up in new, free social conditions,
and will be in a position to cast away all this rubbish of state-ism.”
Lenin adds on his part: “... every kind of state-ism, the
democratic-republican included.” The prospect of the construction of a
socialist society stood, then, in the mind of Engels and Lenin
approximately thus: The generation which conquered the power, the “Old
Guard”, will begin the work of liquidating the state; the next
generation will complete it.

How do things stand in reality? Forty-three per cent of the population
of the Soviet Union were born after the October revolution. If you take
the age of twenty-three as the boundary between the two generations,
then over 50 per cent of Soviet humanity has not yet reached this
boundary. A big half of the population of the country, consequently,
knows nothing by personal recollection of any regime except that of the
Soviets. But it is just this new generation which is forming itself, not
in “free social conditions,” as Engels conceived it, but under
intolerable and constantly increasing oppression from the ruling stratum
composed of those same ones who – according to the official fiction –
achieved the great revolution. In the factory, the collective farm, the
barracks, the university, the schoolroom, even in the kindergarten, if
not in the creche, the chief glory of man is declared to be: personal
loyalty to the leader and unconditional obedience. Many pedagogical
aphorisms and maxims of recent times might seem to have been copied from
Goebbels, if he himself had not copied them in good part from the
collaborators of Stalin.

The school and the social life of the student are saturated with
formalism and hypocrisy. The children have learned to sit through
innumerable deadly dull meetings, with their inevitable honorary
presidium, their chants in honor of the dear leaders, their predigested
righteous debates in which, quite in the manner of their elders, they
say one thing and think another. The most innocent groups of school
children who try to create oases in this desert of officiousness are met
with fierce measures of repression. Through its agentry the GPU
introduces the sickening corruption of treachery and tale-bearing into
the so-called “socialist schools.” The more thoughtful teachers and
children’s writers, in spite of the enforced optimism, cannot always
conceal their horror in the presence of this spirit of repression,
falsity and boredom which is killing school life. Having no experience
of class struggle and revolution, the new generations could have ripened
for independent participation in the social life of the country only in
conditions of soviet democracy, only by consciously working over the
experience of the past and the lessons of the present. Independent
character like independent thought cannot develop without criticism. The
Soviet youth, however, are simply denied the elementary opportunity to
exchange thoughts, make mistakes and try out and correct mistakes, their
own as well as others’. All questions, including their very own, are
decided for them. Theirs only to carry out the decision and sing the
glory of those who made it. To every word of criticism, the bureaucracy
answers with a twist of the neck. All who are outstanding and
unsubmissive in the ranks of the young are systematically destroyed,
suppressed or physically exterminated. This explains the fact that out
of the millions upon millions of Communist youth there has not emerged a
single big figure.

In throwing themselves into engineering, science, literature, sport or
chess playing, the youth are, so to speak, winning their spurs for
future great action. In all these spheres they compete with the badly
prepared older generation, and often equal and best them. But at every
contact with politics they burn their fingers. They have, thus, but
three possibilities open to them: participate in the bureaucracy and
make a career; submit silently to oppression, retire into economic work,
science or their own petty personal affairs; or, finally, go underground
and Iearn to struggle and temper their character for the future. The
road of the bureaucratic career is accessible only to a small minority.
At the other pole a small minority enter the ranks of the Opposition.
The middle group, the overwhelming mass, is in turn very heterogeneous.
But in it, under the iron press, extremely significant although hidden
processes arc at work which will to a great extent determine the future
of the Soviet Union.

The ascetic tendencies of the epoch of the civil war gave way in the
period of the NEP to a more epicurean, not to say avid, mood. The first
five-year plan again became a time of involuntary asceticism – but now
only for the masses and the youth. The ruling stratum had firmly dug
themselves in in positions of personal prosperity. The second five-year
plan is undoubtedly accompanied by a sharp reaction against asceticism.
A concern for personal advancement has seized upon broad circles of the
population, especially the young. The fact is, however, that in the new
Soviet generation well-being and prosperity arc accessible only to that
thin layer who manage to rise above the mass and one way or another
accommodate themselves to the ruling stratum. The bureaucracy on its
side is consciously developing and sorting out machine politicians and
careerists.

Said the chief speaker at a Congress of the Communist Youth (April
1936): “Greed for profits, philistine pettiness and base egotism are not
the attributes of Soviet youth.” These words sound sharply discordant
with the reigning slogans of a “prosperous and handsome life,” with the
methods of piecework, premiums and decorations. Socialism is not
ascetic; on the contrary, it is deeply hostile to the asceticism of
Christianity. It is deeply hostile, in its adherence to _this_ world,
and this only, to all religion. But socialism has its gradations of
earthly values. Human personality begins for socialism not with the
concern for a prosperous life, but on the contrary with the cessation of
this concern. However, no generation can jump over its own head. The
whole Stakhanov movement is for the present built upon “base egotism.”
The very measures of success – the number of trousers and neckties
earned – testifies to nothing but “philistine pettiness.” Suppose that
this historic stage is unavoidable. All right. It is still necessary to
see it as it is. The restoration of market relations opens an
indubitable opportunity for a considerable rise of personal prosperity.
The broad trend of the Soviet youth toward the engineering profession is
explained, not so much by the allurements of socialist construction, as
by the fact that engineers earn incomparably more than physicians or
teachers. When such tendencies arise in circumstances of intellectual
oppression and ideological reaction, and with a conscious unleashing
from above of careerist instincts, then the propagation of what is
called “socialist culture” often turns out to be education in the spirit
of the most extreme antisocial egotism.

Still it would be a crude slander against the youth to portray them as
controlled exclusively, or even predominantly, by personal interests.
No, in the general mass they are magnanimous, responsive, enterprising.
Careerism colors them only from above. In their depths arc various
unformulated tendencies grounded in heroism and still only awaiting
application. It is upon these moods in particular that the newest kind
of Soviet patriotism is nourishing itself. It is undoubtedly very deep,
sincere and dynamic. But in this patriotism, too, there is a rift which
separates the young from the old.

Healthy young lungs find it intolerable to breathe in the atmosphere of
hypocrisy inseparable from a Thermidor – from a reaction, that is, which
is still compelled to dress in the garments of revolution. The crying
discord between the socialist posters and the reality of life undermines
faith in the official canons. A considerable stratum of the youth takes
pride in its contempt for politics, in rudeness and debauch. In many
cases, and probably a majority, this indifferentism and cynicism is but
the initial form of discontent and of a hidden desire to stand up on
one’s own feet. The expulsion from the Communist Youth and the party,
the arrest and exile, of hundreds of thousands of young “white guards”
and “opportunists”, on the one hand, and “Bolshevik-Leninists” on the
other, proves that the wellsprings of conscious political opposition,
both right and left, are not exhausted. On the contrary, during the last
couple of years they have been bubbling with renewed strength. Finally,
the more impatient, hot-blooded, unbalanced, injured in their interests
and feelings, are turning their thoughts in the direction of terrorist
revenge. Such, approximately, is the spectrum of the political moods of
the Soviet youth.

The history of individual terror in the Soviet Union clearly marks the
stages in the general evolution of the country. At the dawn of the
Soviet power, in the atmosphere of the still unfinished civil war,
terrorist deeds were perpetrated by white guards or Social
Revolutionaries. When the former ruling classes lost hope of a
restoration, terrorism also disappeared. The _kulak_ terror, echoes of
which have been observed up to very recent times, had always a local
character and supplemented the guerrilla warfare against the Soviet
regime. As for the latest outburst of terrorism, it does not rest either
upon the old ruling classes or upon the _kulak_. The terrorists of the
latest draft are recruited exclusively from among the young, from the
ranks of the Communist Youth and the party – not infrequently from the
offspring of the ruling stratum. Although completely impotent to solve
the problems which it sets itself, this individual terror has
nevertheless an extremely important symptomatic significance. It
characterizes the sharp contradiction between the bureaucracy and the
broad masses of the people, especially the young.

All taken together – economic hazards, parachute jumping, polar
expeditions, demonstrative indifferentism, “romantic hooligans”,
terroristic mood, and individual acts of terror – are preparing an
explosion of the younger generation against the intolerable tutelage of
the old. A war would undoubtedly serve as a vent for the accumulating
vapors of discontent – but not for long. In a war the youth would soon
acquire the necessary fighting temper and the authority which it now so
sadly lacks. At the same time the reputation of the majority of “old
men” would suffer irremediable damage. At best, a war would give the
bureaucracy only a certain moratorium. The ensuing political conflict
would be so much the more sharp.

It would be one-sided, of course, to reduce the basic political problem
of the Soviet Union to the problem of the two generations. There are
many open and hidden foes of the bureaucracy among the old, just as
there are hundreds of thousands of perfected yes-men among the young.
Nevertheless, from whatever side the attack came against the position of
the ruling stratum, from left or right, the attackers would recruit
their chief forces among the oppressed and discontented youth deprived
of political rights. The bureaucracy admirably understands this. It is
in general exquisitely sensitive to everything which threatens its
dominant position. Naturally, in trying to consolidate its position in
advance, it erects the chief trenches and concrete fortifications
against the younger generation.

In April 1936, as we have said, there assembled in the Kremlin the tenth
congress of the Communist Youth. Nobody bothered to exclaim, of course,
why in violation of its constitution, the congress had not been called
for an entire five years. Moreover, it soon became clear that this
carefully sifted and selected congress was called at this time
exclusively for the purpose of a political expropriation of the youth.
According to the new constitution the Communist Youth League is now even
juridically deprived of the right to participate in the social life of
the country. Its sole sphere henceforth is to be education and cultural
training. The General Secretary of the Communist Youth, under orders
from above, declared in his speech: “We must ... _end the chatter_ about
industrial and financial planning, about the lowering, of production
costs, economic accounting, crop sowing, and other important state
problems _as though we were going to decide them_.” The whole country
might well repeat those last words: “as though we were going, to decide
them!” That insolent rebuke: “End the chatter!” welcomed with anything
but enthusiasm even by this supersubmissive congress – is the more
striking when you remember that the Soviet law defines the age of
political maturity as 18 years, giving all electoral rights to young men
and women of that age, whereas the age limit for Communist Youth
members, according to the old Constitution, was 23 years, and a good
third of the members of the organisation were in reality older than
that. This last congress adopted two simultaneous reforms: It legalized
membership in the Communist Youth for people of greater age, thus
increasing the number of Communist Youth electors, and at the same time
deprived the organisation as a whole of the right to intrude into the
sphere, not only of general politics – of that there can never be any
question! – but of the current problems of economy. The abolition of the
former age limit was dictated by the fact that transfer from the
Communist Youth into the party, formerly an almost automatic process,
has now been made extremely difficult. This annulment of the last
remnant of political rights, and even of the appearance of them, was
caused by a desire fully and finally to enslave the Communist Youth to
the well-purged party. Both measures, obviously contradicting each
other, derive nevertheless from the same source: the bureaucracy’s fear
of the younger generation.

The speakers at the congress, who according to their own statements were
carrying out the express instructions of Stalin – they gave these
warnings in order to forestall in advance the very possibility of a
debate explained the aim of the reform with astonishing frankness: “We
have no need of any second party.” This argument reveals the fact that
in the opinion of the ruling circles the Communist Youth League, if it
is not decisively strangled, threatens to become a second party. As
though on purpose to define these possible tendencies, another speaker
warningly declared: “In his time, no other than Trotsky himself
attempted to make a demagogic play for the youth, to inspire it with the
anti-Leninist, anti-Bolshevik idea of creating a second party, etc.” The
speaker’s historic allusion contains an anachronism. In reality, Trotsky
“in his time” only gave warning that a further bureaucratization of the
regime would inevitably lead to a break with the youth, and produce the
danger of a second party. But never mind: the course of events, in
confirming that warning, has converted it _ipso facto_ into a program.
The degenerating party has kept its attractive power only for
careerists. Honest and thinking young men and girls cannot but be
nauseated by the Byzantine slavishness, the false rhetoric, concealing
privilege and caprice, the braggadocio of mediocre bureaucrats singing
praises to each other – at all these marshals who because they can’t
catch the stars in heaven have to stick them on their own bodies in
various places. [1] Thus it is no longer a question of the “danger” as
it was twelve or thirteen years ago of a second party, but of its
historic necessity as the sole power capable of further advancing the
cause of the October revolution. The change in the constitution of the
Communist Youth League, although reinforced with fresh police threats,
will not, of course, halt the political maturing of the youth, and will
not prevent their hostile clash with the bureaucracy.

Which way will the youth turn in case of a great political disturbance?
Under what banner will they assemble their ranks? Nobody can give a sure
answer to that question now, least of all the youth themselves.
Contradictory tendencies are furrowing their minds. In the last
analysis, the alignment of the principal mass will be determined by
historic events of world significance, by a war, by new successes of
fascism, or, on the contrary, by the victory of the proletarian
revolution in the West. In any case the bureaucracy will find out that
these youth deprived of rights represent a historic charge with mighty
explosive power.

In 1894 the Russian autocracy, through the lips of the young tzar
Nicholas II, answered the _Zemstvos_, which were timidly dreaming of
participating in political life, with the famous words: “Meaningless
fancies!” In 1936 the Soviet bureaucracy answered the as yet vague
claims of the younger generation with the still ruder cry: “Stop your
chatter!” Those words, too, will become historic. The regime of Stalin
may pay no less dear for them than the regime headed by Nicholas II.
 

3. Nationality and Culture

The policy of Bolshevism on the national question, having ensured the
victory of the October revolution, also helped the Soviet Union to hold
out afterward notwithstanding inner centrifugal forces and a hostile
environment. The bureaucratic degeneration of the state has rested like
a millstone upon the national policy. It was upon the national question
that Lenin intended to give his first battle to the bureaucracy, and
especially to Stalin, at the 12th Congress of the party in the spring of
1923. But before the congress met Lenin had gone from the ranks. The
documents which he then prepared remain even now suppressed by the
censor.

The cultural demands of the nations aroused by the revolution require
the widest possible autonomy. At the same time, industry can
successfully develop only by subjecting all parts of the Union to a
general centralized plan. But economy and culture are not separated by
impermeable partitions. The tendencies of cultural autonomy and economic
centralism come naturally from time to time into conflict. The
contradiction between them is, however, far from irreconcilable.
Although there can be no once-and-for-all prepared formula to resolve
the problem, still there is the resilient will of the interested masses
themselves. Only their actual participation in the administration of
their own destinies can at each new stage draw the necessary lines
between the legitimate demands of economic centralism and the living
gravitations of national culture. The trouble is, however, that the will
of the population of the Soviet Union in all its national divisions is
now wholly replaced by the will of a bureaucracy which approaches both
economy and culture from the point of view of convenience of
administration and the specific interests of the ruling stratum.

It is true that in the sphere of national policy, as in the sphere of
economy, the Soviet bureaucracy still continues to carry out a certain
part of the progressive work, although with immoderate overhead
expenses. This is especially true of the backward nationalities of the
Union, which must of necessity pass through a more or less prolonged
period of borrowing, imitation and assimilation of what exists. The
bureaucracy is laying down a bridge for them to the elementary benefits
of bourgeois, and in part even pre-bourgeois, culture. In relation to
many spheres and peoples, the Soviet power is to a considerable extent
carrying out the historic work fulfilled by Peter I and his colleagues
in relation to the old Muscovy, only on a larger scale and at a swifter
tempo.

In the schools of the Union, lessons are taught at present in no less
than eighty languages. For a majority of them, it was necessary to
compose new alphabets, or to replace the extremely aristocratic Asiatic
alphabets with the more democratic Latin. Newspapers are published in
the same number of languages – papers which for the first time acquaint
the peasants and nomad shepherds with the elementary ideas of human
culture. Within the far-flung boundaries of the tzar’s empire, a native
industry is arising. The old semi-clan culture is being destroyed by the
tractor. Together with literacy, scientific agriculture and medicine are
coming into existence. It would be difficult to overestimate the
significance of this work of raising up new human strata. Marx was right
when he said that revolution is the locomotive of history.

But the most powerful locomotive cannot perform miracles. It cannot
change the laws of space, and can only accelerate movement. The very
necessity of acquainting tens of millions of grown-up people with the
alphabet and the newspaper, or with the simple laws of hygiene, shows
what a long road must be traveled before you can really pose the
question of a new socialist culture. The press informs us, for example,
that in western Siberia the Oirots who formerly did not know what a bath
means, have now “in many villages baths to which they sometimes travel
30 kilometers to wash themselves.” This extreme example, although taken
at the lowest level of culture, nevertheless truthfully suggests the
height of many other achievements, and that not only in the backward
regions. When the head of a government, in order to illustrate the
growth of culture, refers to the fact that in the collective farms a
demand has arisen for “iron bedsteads, wall clocks, knit underwear,
sweaters, bicycles, etc.,” this only means that the well-off upper
circles of the Soviet villages are beginning to use those articles of
manufacture which were long ago in common use among the peasant masses
of the West. From day to day, in speeches and in the press, lessons are
pronounced on the theme of “cultured socialist trade.” In the essence,
it is a question of giving a clean attractive look to the government
stores, supplying them with the necessary technical implements and a
sufficient assortment of goods, not letting the apples rot, throwing in
darning cotton with stockings, and teaching the selling clerk to be
polite and attentive to the customer – in other words, acquiring the
commonplace methods of capitalist trade. We are still far from solving
this extremely important problem – in which, however, there is not a
drop of socialism.

If we leave laws and institutions aside for a moment, and take the daily
life of the basic mass of the population, and if we do not deliberately
delude our minds or others’, we are compelled to acknowledge that in
life customs and culture the heritage of tzarist and bourgeois Russia in
the Soviet country vastly prevails over the embryonic growth of
socialism. Most convincing on this subject is the population itself,
which at the least rise of the standard of living throws itself avidly
upon the ready models of the West. The young Soviet clerks, and often
the workers too, try both in dress and manner to imitate American
engineers and technicians with whom they happen to come in contact in
the factories. The industrial and clerical working girls devour with
their eyes the foreign lady tourist in order to capture her modes and
manners. The lucky girl who succeeds in this becomes an object of
wholesale imitation. Instead of the old bangs, the better-paid working
girl acquires a “permanent wave.” The youth are eagerly joining “Western
dancing circles.” In a certain sense all this means progress, but what
chiefly expresses itself here is not the superiority of socialism over
capitalism, but the prevailing of petty bourgeois culture over
patriarchal life, the city over the village, the center over the
backwoods, the West over the East.

The privileged Soviet stratum does its borrowing meanwhile in the higher
capitalistic spheres. And in this field the pacemakers are the
diplomats, directors of trusts, engineers, who have to make frequent
trips to Europe and America. Soviet satire is silent on this question,
for it is simply forbidden to touch the upper “ten thousand.” However,
we cannot but remark with sorrow that the loftiest emissaries of the
Soviet Union have been unable to reveal in the face of capitalist
civilization either a style of their own, or any independent traits
whatever. They have not found sufficient inner stability to enable them
to scorn external shine and observe the necessary aloofness. Their chief
ambition ordinarily is to differ as little as possible from the most
finished snobs of the bourgeoisie. In a word, they feel and conduct
themselves in a majority of cases not as the representatives of a new
world, but as ordinary _parvenus_!

To say that the Soviet Union is now performing that cultural work which
the advanced countries long ago performed on the basis of capitalism,
would be, however, only half the truth. The new social forms are by no
means irrelevant. They not only give to a backward country the
possibility of gaining the level of the most advanced, but they permit
it to achieve this task in a much shorter space of time than was needed
formerly in the West. The explanation of this acceleration of tempo is
simple. The bourgeois pioneers had to invent their technique and learn
to apply it in the spheres both of economy and culture. The Soviet Union
takes it ready made in its latest forms and, thanks to the socialized
means of production, applies the borrowings not partially and by degrees
but at once and on a gigantic scale.

Military authorities have more than once celebrated the role of the army
as a carrier of culture, especially in relation to the peasantry.
Without deceiving ourselves as to the specific kind of “culture’, which
bourgeois militarism inculcates, we cannot deny that many progressive
customs have been instilled in the popular masses through the army. Not
for nothing have former soldiers and under-officers in revolutionary and
especially peasant movements usually stood at the head of the
insurrectionists. The Soviet regime has an opportunity to influence the
daily life of the people not only through the army, but also through the
whole state apparatus, and interwoven with it the apparatus of have not
found sufficient inner stability to enable them to scorn external shine
and observe the necessary aloofness. Their chief ambition ordinarily is
to differ as little as possible from the most finished snobs of the
bourgeoisie. In a word, they feel and conduct themselves in a majority
of cases not as the representatives of a new world, but as ordinary
parvenus!

To say that the Soviet Union is now performing that cultural work which
the advanced countries long ago performed on the basis of capitalism,
would be, however, only half the truth. The new social forms are by no
means irrelevant. They not only give to a backward country the
possibility of gaining the level of the most advanced, but they permit
it to achieve this task in a much shorter space of time than was needed
formerly in the West. The explanation of this acceleration of tempo is
simple. The bourgeois pioneers had to invent their technique and learn
to apply it in the spheres both of economy and culture. The Soviet Union
takes it ready made in its latest forms and, thanks to the socialized
means of production, applies the borrowings not partially and by degrees
but at once and on a gigantic scale.

Military authorities have more than once celebrated the role of the army
as a carrier of culture, especially in relation to the peasantry.
Without deceiving ourselves as to the specific kind of “culture’, which
bourgeois militarism inculcates, we cannot deny that many progressive
customs have been instilled in the popular masses through the army. Not
for nothing have former soldiers and under-officers in revolutionary and
especially peasant movements usually stood at the head of the
insurrectionists. The Soviet regime has an opportunity to influence the
daily life of the people not only through the army, but also through the
whole state apparatus, and interwoven with it the apparatus of the
Party, the Communist Youth and the trade unions. An appropriation of
ready-made models of technique, hygiene, art, sport, in an infinitely
shorter time than was demanded for their development in their homeland,
is guaranteed by the state forms of property, the political dictatorship
and the planned methods of administration.

If the October revolution had given nothing but this accelerated forward
movement, it would be historically justified, for the declining
bourgeois regime has proved incapable during the last quarter century of
seriously moving forward any one of the backward countries in any part
of the earth. However, the Russian proletariat achieved the revolution
in the name of much more far-reaching tasks. No matter how suppressed it
is politically at present, in its better parts it has not renounced the
communist program nor the mighty hope bound up with it. The bureaucracy
is compelled to accommodate itself to the proletariat, partly in the
very direction of its policy, but chiefly in the interpretation of it.
Hence, every step forward in the sphere either of economy or culture,
regardless of its actual historic content or its real significance in
the life of the masses, is proclaimed as a hitherto unseen and
unheard-of conquest of “socialist culture.” There is not a doubt that to
make toilet soap and a toothbrush the possession of millions who up to
yesterday never heard of the simplest requirements of neatness is a very
great cultural work. But neither soap nor a brush, nor even the perfumes
which “our women” are demanding, quite constitute a socialist culture,
especially in conditions where these pitiable attributes of civilization
are accessible only to some 15 per cent of the population.

The “making over of men” of which they talk so much in the Soviet press
is truly in full swing. But to what degree is this a socialist making
over? The Russian people never knew in the past either a great religious
reformation like the Germans, or a great bourgeois revolution like the
French. Out of these two furnaces, if we leave aside the
reformation-revolution of the British Islanders in the seventeenth
century, came bourgeois individuality, a very important step in the
development of human personality in general. The Russian revolutions of
1905 and 1917 necessarily meant the first awakening of individuality in
the masses, its crystallization out of the primitive medium. That is to
say, they fulfilled, in abridged form and accelerated tempo, the
educational work of the bourgeois reformations and revolutions of the
West. Long before this work was finished, however, even in the rough,
the Russian revolution, which had broken out in the twilight of
capitalism, was compelled by the course of the class struggle to leap
over to the road of socialism. The contradictions in the sphere of
Soviet culture only reflect and refract the economic and social
contradictions which grew out of this leap. The awakening of personality
under these circumstances necessarily assumes a more or less petty
bourgeois character, not only in economics, but also in family life and
lyric poetry. The bureaucracy itself has become the carrier of the most
extreme, and sometimes unbridled, bourgeois individualism. Permitting
and encouraging the development of economic individualism (piecework,
private land allotments, premiums, decorations), it at the same time
ruthlessly suppresses the progressive side of individualism in the realm
of spiritual culture (critical views, the development of one’s own
opinion, the cultivation of personal dignity).

The more considerable the level of development of a given national
group, or the higher the sphere of its cultural creation, or, again, the
more closely it grapples with the problems of society and personality,
the more heavy and intolerable becomes the pressure of the bureaucracy.
There can be in reality no talk of uniqueness of national culture when
one and the same conductor’s baton, or rather one and the same police
club, undertakes to regulate all the intellectual activities of all the
peoples of the Soviet Union. The Ukrainian, White Russian, Georgian, or
Turk newspapers and books are only translations of the bureaucratic
imperative into the language of the corresponding nationality. Under the
name of models of popular creativeness, the Moscow press daily publishes
in Russian translation odes by the prize poets of the different
nationalities in honor of the leaders, miserable verses in reality which
differ only in the degree of their servility and want of talent.

The Great Russian culture, which has suffered from the regime of the
guardhouse no less than the others, lives chiefly at the expense of the
older generation formed before the revolution. The youth are suppressed
as though with an iron plank. It is a question, therefore, not of the
oppression of one nationality over another in the proper sense of the
word, but of oppression by the centralized police apparatus over the
cultural development of all the nations, starting with the Great
Russian. We cannot, however, ignore the fact that 90 per cent of the
publications of the Soviet Union are printed in the Russian language. If
this percentage is, to be sure, in flagrant contradiction with the
relative number of the Great Russian population, still it perhaps the
better corresponds to the general influence of Russian culture, both in
its independent weight and its role as mediator between the backward
peoples of the country and the West. But with all that, does not the
excessively high percentage of Great Russians in the publishing houses
(and not only there, of course) mean an actual autocratic privilege of
the Great Russians at the expense of the other nationalities of the
Union? It is quite possible. To this vastly important question it is
impossible to answer as categorically as one would wish, for in life it
is decided not so much by collaboration, rivalry and mutual
fertilizations of culture, as by the ultimate arbitrament of the
bureaucracy. And since the Kremlin is the residence of the authorities,
and the outlying territories are compelled to keep step with the center,
bureaucratism inevitably takes the color of an autocratic Russification,
leaving to the other nationalities the sole indubitable cultural right
of celebrating the arbiter in their own language.

* * *

The official doctrine of culture changes in dependence upon economic
zigzags and administrative expediencies. But with all its changes, it
retains one trait – that of being absolutely categorical. Simultaneously
with the theory of “socialism in one country,” the previously frowned-on
theory of “proletarian culture” received official recognition. The
opponents of this theory pointed out that the regime of proletarian
dictatorship has a strictly transitional character, that in distinction
from the bourgeoisie the proletariat does not intend to dominate
throughout a series of historical epochs, that the task of the present
generation of the new ruling class reduces itself primarily to an
assimilation of all that is valuable in bourgeois culture, that the
longer the proletariat remains a proletariat – that is, bears the traces
of its former oppression – the less is it capable of rising above the
historic heritage of the past, and that the possibilities of new
creation will really open themselves only to the extent that the
proletariat dissolves itself in a socialist society. All this means, in
other words, that the bourgeois culture should be replaced by a
socialist, not a proletarian, culture.

In a polemic against the theory of a “proletarian art” produced by
laboratory methods, the author of these lines wrote: “Culture feeds upon
the juices of industry, and a material excess is necessary in order that
culture should grow, refine and complicate itself.” Even the most
successful solution of elementary economic problems “would far from
signify as yet a complete victory of the new historic principle of
socialism. Only a forward movement of scientific thought on an
all-national basis and the development of a new art would mean that the
historic kernel had produced a blossom as well as a stalk. In this sense
the development of art is the highest test of the viability and
significance of every epoch.” This point of view, which had prevailed up
to that moment, was in an official declaration suddenly proclaimed to be
“capitulatory”, and dictated by a “disbelief” in the creative powers of
the proletariat. There opened the period of Stalin and Bukharin, the
latter of whom had long before appeared as an evangel of “proletarian
culture”, and the former never given a thought to these questions. They
both considered, in any case, that the movement toward socialism would
develop with a “tortoise stride”, and that the proletariat would have at
its disposal decades for the creation of its own culture. As to the
character of this culture, the ideas of these theoreticians were as
vague as they were uninspiring.

The stormy years of the first five-year plan upset the tortoise
perspective. In 1931, on the eve of a dreadful famine, the country had
already “entered into socialism.” Thus, before the officially patronized
writers, artists and painters had managed to create a proletarian
culture, or even the first significant models of it, the government
announced that the proletariat had dissolved in the classless society.
It remained for the artists to reconcile themselves with the fact that
the proletariat did not possess the most necessary condition for the
creation of a proletarian culture: time. Yesterday’s conceptions were
immediately abandoned to oblivion. “Socialist culture” was placed
instantly upon the order of the day. We have already in part become
acquainted with its content.

Spiritual creativeness demands freedom. The very purpose of communism is
to subject nature to technique and technique to plan, and compel the raw
material to give unstintingly everything to man that he needs. Far more
than that, its highest goal is to free finally and once for all the
creative forces of mankind from all pressure, limitation and humiliating
dependence. Personal relations, science and art will not know any
externally imposed “plan”, nor even any shadow of compulsion. To what
degree spiritual creativencss shall be individual or collective will
depend entirely upon its creators.

A transitional regime is a different thing. The dictatorship reflects
the past barbarism and not the future culture. It necessarily lays down
severe limitations upon all forms of activity, including spiritual
creation. The program of the revolution from the very beginning regarded
these limitations as a temporary evil, and assumed the obligation, in
proportion as the new regime was consolidated, to remove one after the
other all restrictions upon freedom. In any case, and in the hottest
years of the civil war, it was clear to the leaders of the r evolution
that the government could, guided by political considerations, place
limitations upon creative freedom, but in no case pretend to the role of
commander in the sphere of science, literature and art. Although he had
rather “conservative” personal tastes in art, Lenin remained politically
extremely cautious in artistic questions, eagerly confessing his
incompetence. The patronizing of all kinds of modernism by Lunacharsky,
the People’s Commissar of Art and Education, was often embarrassing to
Lenin. But he confined himself to ironical remarks in private
conversations, and remained remote from the idea of converting his
literary tastes into law. In 1924, on the threshold of the new period,
the author of this book thus formulated the relation of the state to the
various artistic groups and tendencies: “while holding over them all the
categorical criterion, _for_ the revolution or _against_ the revolution,
to give them complete freedom in the sphere of artistic
self-determination.”

While the dictatorship had a seething mass-basis and a prospect of world
revolution, it had no fear of experiments, searchings, the struggle of
schools, for it understood that only in this way could a new cultural
epoch be prepared. The popular masses were still quivering in every
fiber, and were thinking aloud for the first time in a thousand years.
All the best youthful forces of art were touched to the quick. During
those first years, rich in hope and daring, there were created not only
the most complete models of socialist legislation, but also the best
productions of revolutionary literature. To the same times belong, it is
worth remarking, the creation of those excellent Soviet films which, in
spite of a poverty of technical means, caught the imagination of the
whole world with the freshness and vigor of their approach to reality.

In the process of struggle against the party Opposition, the literary
schools were strangled one after the other. It was not only a question
of literature, either. The process of extermination took place in all
ideological spheres, and it took place more decisively since it was more
than half unconscious. The present ruling stratum considers itself
called not only to control spiritual creation politically, but also to
prescribe its roads of development. The method of command-without-appeal
extends in like measure to the concentration camps, to scientific
agriculture and to music. The central organ of the party prints
anonymous directive editorials, having the character of military orders,
in architecture, literature, dramatic art, the ballet, to say nothing of
philosophy, natural science and history.

The bureaucracy superstitiously fears whatever does not serve it
directly, as well as whatever it does not understand. When it demands
some connection between natural science and production, this is on a
large scale right; but when it commands that scientific investigators
set themselves goals only of immediate practical importance, this
threatens to seal up the most precious sources of invention, including
practical discoveries, for these most often arise on unforeseen roads.
Taught by bitter experience, the natural scientists, mathematicians,
philologists, military theoreticians, avoid all broad generalizations
out of fear lest some “red professor”, usually an ignorant careerist,
threateningly pull up on them with some quotation dragged in by the hair
from Lenin, or even from Stalin. To defend one’s own thought in such
circumstances, or one’s scientific dignity, means in all probability to
bring down repressions upon one’s head.

But it is infinitely worse in the sphere of the social sciences.
Economists, historians, even statisticians, to say nothing of
journalists, are concerned above all things not to fall, even obliquely,
into contradiction with the momentary zigzag of the official course.
About Soviet economy, or domestic or foreign policy, one cannot write at
all except after covering his rear and flanks with banalities from the
speeches of the “leader”, and having assumed in advance the task of
demonstrating that everything is going exactly as it should go and even
better. Although this 100 per cent conformism frees one from everyday
unpleasantnesses, it entails the heaviest of punishments: sterility.

In spite of the fact that Marxism is formally a state doctrine in the
Soviet Union, there has not appeared during the last twelve years one
Marxian investigation – in economics, sociology, history or philosophy –
which deserves attention and translation into foreign languages. The
Marxian works do not transcend the limit of scholastic compilations
which say over the same old ideas, endorsed in advance, and shuffle over
the same old quotations according to the demands of the current
administrative conjuncture. Millions of copies are distributed through
the state channels of books and brochures that are of no use to anybody,
put together with the help of mucilage, flattery and other sticky
substances. Marxists who might say something valuable and independent
are sitting in prison, or forced into silence, and this in spite of the
fact that the evolution of social forms is raising gigantic scientific
problems at every step! Befouled and trampled underfoot is the one thing
without which theoretical work is impossible: scrupulousness. Even the
explanatory notes to the complete works of Lenin are radically worked
over in every new edition from the point of view of the personal
interests of the ruling staff: the names of “leaders” magnified, those
of opponents vilified; tracks covered up. The same is true of the
textbooks on the history of the party and the revolution. Facts are
distorted, documents concealed or fabricated, reputations created or
destroyed. A simple comparison of the successive variants of one and the
same book during the last twelve years permits us to trace infallibly
the process of degeneration of the thought and conscience of the ruling
stratum.

No less ruinous is the effect of the “totalitarian” regime upon artistic
literature. The struggle of tendencies and schools has been replaced by
interpretation of the will of the leaders. There has been created for
all groups a general compulsory organisation, a kind of concentration
camp of artistic literature. Mediocre but “right-thinking” storytellers
like Serafimovich or Gladkov are inaugurated as classics. Gifted writers
who cannot do sufficient violence to themselves are pursued by a pack of
instructors armed with shamelessness and dozens of quotations. The most
eminent artists either commit suicide, or find their material in the
remote past, or become silent. Honest and talented books appear as
though accidentally, bursting out from somewhere under the counter, and
have the character of artistic contraband.

The life of Soviet art is a kind of martyrology. After the editorial
orders in PRAVDA against “formalism”, there began an epidemic of
humiliating recantations by writers, artists, stage directors and even
opera singers. One after another, they renounced their own past sins,
refraining, however – in case of further emergencies – from any
clear-cut definition of the nature of this “formalism.” In the long run,
the authorities were compelled by a new order to put an end to a too
copious flow of recantations. Literary estimates are transformed within
a few weeks, textbooks made over, streets renamed, statues brought
forward, as a result of a few eulogistic remarks of Stalin about the
poet Maiakovsky. The impressions made by the new opera upon high-up
auditors are immediately converted into a musical directive for
composers. The Secretary of the Communist Youth said at a conference of
writers: “The suggestions of Comrade Stalin are a law for everybody,”
and the whole audience applauded, although some doubtless burned with
shame. As though to complete the mockery of literature, Stalin, who does
not know how to compose a Russian phrase correctly, is declared a
classic in the matter of style. There is something deeply tragic in this
Byzantinism and police rule, notwithstanding the involuntary comedy of
certain of its manifestations.

The official formula reads: Culture should be socialist in content,
national in form. As to the content of a socialist culture, however,
only certain more or less happy guesses are possible. Nobody can grow
that culture upon an inadequate economic foundation. Art is far less
capable than science of anticipating the future. In any case, such
prescriptions as, “portray the construction of the future,” “indicate
the road to socialism,” “make over mankind,” give little more to the
creative imagination than does the price list of a hardware store, or a
railroad timetable.

The national form of an art is identical with its universal
accessibility. “What is not wanted by the people,” PRAVDA dictates to
the artists, “cannot have aesthetic significance.” That old Narodnik
formula, rejecting the task of artistically educating the masses, takes
on a still more reactionary character when the right to decide what art
the people want and what they don’t want remains in the hands of the
bureaucracy. It prints books according to its own choice. It sells them
also by compulsion, offering no choice to the reader. In the last
analysis the whole affair comes down in its eyes to taking care that art
assimilates its interests, and finds such forms for them as will make
the bureaucracy attractive to the popular masses.

In vain! No literature can fulfill that task. The leaders themselves are
compelled to acknowledge that “neither the first nor the second
five-year plan has yet given us a new literary wave which can rise above
the first wave born in October.” That is very mildly said. In reality,
in spite of individual exceptions, the epoch of the Thermidor will go
into the history of artistic creation pre-eminently as an epoch of
mediocrities, laureates and toadies.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Translator’s Note:_ The phrase “he does not catch the stars in
heaven” is a proverbial way of saying that a man is mediocre.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 8 FOREIGN POLICY AND THE ARMY


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. From “World Revolution” to _Status Quo_

Foreign policy is everywhere and always a continuation of domestic
policy, for it is conducted by the same ruling class and pursues the
same historic goals. The degeneration of the governing stratum in the
Soviet Union could not but be accompanied by a corresponding change of
aims and methods in Soviet diplomacy. The “theory” of socialism in one
country, first announced in the autumn of 1924, already signalized an
effort to liberate Soviet foreign policy from the program of
international revolution. The bureaucracy, however, had no intention to
liquidate therewith its connection with the Communist International.
That would have converted the latter into a world oppositional
organisation, with resulting unfavorable consequences in the correlation
of forces within the Soviet Union. On the contrary, the less the policy
of the Kremlin preserved of its former internationalism, the more firmly
the ruling clique clutched in its hands the rudder of the Communist
International. Under the old name it was now to serve new ends. For the
new ends, however, new people were needed. Beginning with the autumn of
1923, the history of the Communist International is a history of the
complete renovation of its Moscow staff, and the staffs of all the
national sections, by way of a series of palace revolutions, purgations
from above, expulsions, etc. At the present time, the Communist
International is a completely submissive apparatus in the service of
Soviet foreign policy, ready at any time for any zigzag whatever.

The bureaucracy has not only broken with the past, but has deprived
itself of the ability to understand the most important lessons of that
past. The chief of these lessons was that the Soviet power could not
have held out for 12 months without the direct help of the international
– and especially the European – proletariat, and without a revolutionary
movement of the colonial peoples. The only reason the Austro-German
military powers did not carry their attack upon Soviet Russia through to
the end was that they felt behind their back the hot breath of the
revolution. In some three quarters of a year, insurrections in Germany
and Austro-Hungary put an end to the Brest-Litovsk treaty. The revolt of
the French sailors in the Black Sea in April 1919 compelled the
government of the Third Republic to renounce its military operations in
the Soviet South. The British government, in September 1919, withdrew
its expeditionary forces from the Soviet North under direct pressure
from its own workers. After the retreat of the Red Army from the
vicinity of Warsaw in 1920, only a powerful wave of revolutionary
protests prevented the Entente from coming to the aid of Poland and
crushing the Soviets. The hands of Lord Curzon, when he delivered his
threatening ultimatum to Moscow in 1923, were bound at the decisive
moment by the resistance of the British workers’ organisations. These
clear episodes are not peculiar. They depict the whole character of the
first and most difficult period of Soviet existence. Although the
revolution triumphed nowhere outside the limits of Russia, the hopes of
its triumph were far from being fruitless.

During those years, the Soviet government concluded a series of treaties
with bourgeois governments: the Brest-Litovsk peace in 1918; a treaty
with Estonia in 1920; the Riga peace with Poland in October 1920; the
treaty of Rapallo with Germany in April 1922; and other less important
diplomatic agreements. It could never have entered the mind of the
Soviet government as a whole, however, nor any member of it, to
represent its bourgeois counteragents as “friends of peace”, and still
less to invite the communist parties of Germany, Poland, or Estonia, to
support with their votes the bourgeois governments which had signed
these treaties. It is just this question, moreover, which is decisive
for the revolutionary education of the masses. The Soviets could not
help signing the Brest-Litovsk peace, just as exhausted strikers cannot
help signing the most cruel conditions imposed by the capitalists. But
the vote cast in favor of this peace by the German Social Democrats, in
the hypothetical form of “abstention”, was denounced by the Bolsheviks
as a support of brigandage and brigands. Although the Rapallo agreement
with democratic Germany was signed four years later on a formal basis of
“equal rights” for both parties, nevertheless if the German communist
party had made this a pretext to express confidence in the diplomacy of
its country, it would have been forthwith expelled from the
International. The fundamental line of the international policy of the
Soviets rested on the fact that this or that commercial, diplomatic, or
military bargain of the Soviet government with the imperialists,
inevitable in the nature of the case, should in no case limit or weaken
the struggle of the proletariat of the corresponding capitalist country,
for in the last analysis the safety of the workers’ state itself could
be guaranteed only by the growth of the world revolution. When
Chicherin, during the preparations for the Geneva Conference, proposed
for the benefit of “public opinion” in America to introduce certain
“democratic” changes in the Soviet Constitution, Lenin, in an official
letter of January 23, 1922, urgently recommended that Chicherin be sent
immediately to a sanatorium. If anybody had dared in those days to
propose that we purchase the good favor of “democratic” imperialism by
adhering, let us say, to the false and hollow Kellog Pact, or by
weakening the policy of the Communist International, Lenin would
indubitably have proposed that the innovator be sent to an insane asylum
– and he would hardly have met any opposition in the Politburo.

The leaders of those days were especially implacable in relation to all
kinds of pacifist illusions – League of Nations, collective security,
courts of arbitration, disarmament, etc. – seeing in them only a method
of lulling the toiling masses in order to catch them unawares when a new
war breaks out. In the program of the party, drafted by Lenin and
adopted at the Congress of 1919, we find the following unequivocal lines
on this subject:

“The developing pressure of the proletariat, and especially its
victories in individual countries, are strengthening the resistance of
the exploiters and impelling them to new forms of international
consolidation of the capitalists (League of Nations, etc.) which,
organizing on a world scale the systematic exploitation of all the
peoples of the Earth, are directing their first efforts toward the
immediate suppression of the revolutionary movements of the proletariat
of all countries. All this inevitably leads to a combination of civil
wars within the separate states with revolutionary wars, both of the
proletarian countries defending themselves, and of the oppressed peoples
against the yoke of the imperialist powers. In these conditions the
slogans of pacifism, international disarmament under capitalism, courts
of arbitration, etc., are not only reactionary utopias, but downright
deceptions of the toilers designed to disarm the proletariat and
distract it from the task of disarming the exploiters.”

These lines, from the Bolshevik program, constitute an advance estimate,
and moreover a truly devastating one, of the present Soviet foreign
policy and the policy of the Communist International, with all its
pacifistic “friends” in every corner of the Earth.

After the period of intervention and blockade, the economic and military
pressure of the capitalist world on the Soviet Union did, to be sure,
prove considerably weaker than might have been feared. Europe was still
thinking of the past and not the future war. Then came the unheard of
economic world crisis, causing prostrations in the ruling classes of the
whole world. It was only thanks to this that the Soviet Union could
survive the trials of the first five-year plan, when the country again
became an arena of civil war, famine, and epidemic. The first years of
the second five-year plan, which have brought an obvious betterment of
internal conditions, have coincided with the beginning of an economic
revival in the capitalist world, and a new tide of hopes, appetites,
yearnings and preparations for war. The danger of a combined attack on
the Soviet Union takes palpable form in our eyes only because the
country of the Soviets is still isolated, because to a considerable
extent this “one-sixth of the Earth’s surface” is a realm of primitive
backwardness, because the productivity of labour in spite of the
nationalization of the means of production is still far lower than in
capitalist countries, and, finally – what is at present most important –
because the chief detachments of the world proletariat are shattered,
distrustful of themselves, nd deprived of reliable leadership. Thus the
October revolution, in which its leaders saw only a prelude to world
revolution, but which in the course of things has received a temporary
independent significance, reveals in this new historic stage its deep
dependence upon world development. Again it becomes obvious that the
historic question, _who shall prevail?_ cannot be decided within
national boundaries, that interior successes and failures only prepare
more or less favourable conditions for its decision on the world arena.

The Soviet bureaucracy – we must do it this justice – has acquired a
vast experience in directing popular masses, in lulling them to sleep,
dividing and weakening them, or deceiving them outright for the purpose
of unlimited domination over them. But for this very reason it has lost
every trace of the faculty of revolutionary education of the masses.
Having strangled independence and initiative in the lower ranks of the
people at home, it naturally cannot provoke critical thought and
revolutionary daring on the world arena. Moreover, as a ruling and
privileged stratum, it values infinitely more the help and friendship of
those who are kin to it in social type in the West – bourgeois radicals,
reformist parliamentarians, trade-union bureaucrats – than of the
rank-and-file workers who are separated from it by social chasms. This
is not the place for a history of the decline and degeneration of the
Third International, a subject to which the author has dedicated a
series of independent investigations published in almost all the
languages of the civilized world. The fact is that in its capacity as
leader of the Communist International, the nationally limited and
conservative, ignorant and irresponsible Soviet bureaucracy has brought
nothing but misfortunes to the workers’ movement of the world. As though
in historic justice, the present international position of the Soviet
Union is determined to a far higher degree by the consequences of the
defeat of the world proletariat, than by the successes of an isolated
Socialist construction. It is sufficient to recall that the defeat of
the Chinese revolution in 1925-27, which untied the hands of Japanese
militarism in the East, and the shattering of the German proletariat
which led to the triumph of Hitler and the mad growth of German
militarism, are alike the fruits of the policy of the Communist
International.

Having betrayed the world revolution, but still feeling loyal to it, the
Thermidorean bureaucracy has directed its chief efforts to
“neutralizing” the bourgeoisie. For this it was necessary to seem a
moderate, respectable, authentic bulwark of order. But in order to seem
something successfully and for a long time, you have to be it. The
organic evolution of the ruling stratum has taken care of that. Thus,
retreating step-by-step before the consequences of its own mistakes, the
bureaucracy has arrived at the idea of insuring the inviolability of the
Soviet Union by including it in the system of the European-Asiastic
_status quo_. What could be finer, when all is said and done, than an
eternal pact of non-aggression between socialism and capitalism? The
present official formula of foreign policy, widely advertised not only
by the Soviet diplomacy, which is permitted to speak in the customary
language of its profession, but by the Communist International, which is
supposed to speak the language of revolution, reads: “We don’t want an
inch of foreign land, but we will not surrender an inch of our own.” As
though it were a question of mere quarrels about a bit of land, and not
of the world struggle of two irreconcilable social systems!

When the Soviet Union considered it more sensible to surrender the
Chinese-Eastern Railroad to Japan, this act of weakness, prepared by the
collapse of the Chinese revolution, was celebrated as a manifestation of
self-confident power in the service of peace. In reality, by
surrendering to the enemy an extremely important strategic highway, the
Soviet government promoted Japan’s further seizures in North China and
her present attempts upon Mongolia. That forced sacrifice did not mean a
“neutralization” of the danger, but at the best a short breathing spell,
and at the same time a mighty stimulus to the appetites of the ruling
military clique in Tokyo.

The question of Mongolia is already a question of the strategic
positions to be occupied by Japan in a future war against the Soviet
Union. The Soviet government found itself this time compelled to
announce openly that it would answer the intrusion of Japanese troops
into Mongolia with war. Here, however, it is no question of the
immediate defence of “our land”: Mongolia is an independent state. A
passive defence of the Soviet boundaries seemed sufficient only when
nobody was seriously threatening them. The real method of defence of the
Soviet Union is to weaken the positions of imperialism, and strengthen
the position of the proletariat and the colonial peoples throughout the
Earth. An unfavorable correlation of forces might compel us to surrender
many “inches” of land, as it did at the moment of the Brest-Litovsk
peace, the Riga peace, and in the matter of the handing over of the
Chinese-Eastern Railroad. At the same time, the struggle for a
favourable change in the correlation of world forces puts upon the
workers’ state a continual obligation to come to the help of the
liberative movements in other countries. But it is just this fundamental
task which conflict absolutely with the conservative policy of the
_status quo_.
 

2. The League of Nations and the Communist International

The _rapprochement_ and subsequent outright military treaty with France,
the chief defender of the _status quo_ – a policy which resulted from
the victory of German National Socialism – is infinitely more favourable
to France than to the Soviets. The obligation to military from the side
of the Soviets is, according to the treaty, unconditional; French help,
on the contrary, is conditioned upon a preliminary agreement with
England and Italy, which opens an unlimited field for hostile
machinations against the Soviet Union. The events connected with the
Rhineland demonstrated that, with a more realistic appraisal of the
situation, and with more restraint, Moscow might have gotten better
guarantees from France – if indeed treaties can be considered
“guarantees” in an epoch of sharp changes of set-up, continued
diplomatic crises, _rapprochements_ and breaks. But this is not the
first time it has become evident that the Soviet bureaucracy is far more
firm in its struggles against the advanced workers of its own country,
than in negotiation with the bourgeois diplomats.

The assertion that help from the side of the Soviet Union is of little
consequence in view of the fact that it has no common boundary with
Germany, is not to be taken seriously. In case Germany attacks the
Soviet Union, the common boundary will obviously be found by the
attacking side. In the case of an attack by Germany on Austria,
Czechoslovakia, and France, Poland cannot remain neutral for a day. If
she recognizes her obligations as an ally of France, she will inevitably
open the road to the Red Army; and if she breaks her treaty of alliance,
she will immediately become a helpmate of Germany. In the latter case,
the Soviet Union will have no difficulty in finding a “common boundary.”
Moreover, in a future war, the sea and air “boundaries” will play no
less a role than those on land.

The entrance of the Soviet Union into the League of Nations –
represented to the Russian population, with the help of a stage
management worthy of Goebbels, as a triumph of socialism and a result of
“pressure” from the world proletariat – was in reality acceptable to the
bourgeoisie only as a result of the extreme weakening of the
revolutionary danger. It was not a victory of the Soviet Union, but a
capitulation of the Thermidorean bureaucracy to this hopelessly
compromised Geneva institution, which, according to the above-quoted
words of the Bolshevik program, “will direct its future efforts to the
suppression of revolutionary movements.” What has changed so radically
since the days of the Magna Carta of Bolshevism: the nature of the
League of Nations, the function of pacifism in a capitalist society, or
– the policy of the Soviets? To ask the question is to answer it.

Experience quickly proved that participation in the League of Nations,
while adding nothing to those practical advantages which could be had by
way of agreements with separate bourgeois states, imposes at the same
time serious limitations and obligations. These the Soviet Union is
performing with the most pedantic faithfulness in the interest of its
still unaccustomed conservative prestige. The necessity of accommodation
within the League not only to France, but also to her allies, compelled
Soviet diplomacy to occupy an extremely equivocal position in the
Italian-Abyssinian conflict. At the very time when Litvinov, who was
nothing at Geneva but a shadow of Laval, expressed his gratitude to the
diplomats of France and England for their efforts “in behalf of peace”,
efforts which so auspiciously resulted in the annihilation of Abyssinia,
oil from the Caucausus continued to nourish the Italian fleet. Even if
you can understand that the Moscow government hesitated openly to break
a commercial treaty, still the trade unions were not obliged to take
into consideration the undertakings of the Commissariat of Foreign
Trade. An actual stoppage of exports to Italy by a decision of the
Soviet trade unions would have evoked a world movement of boycott
incomparably more real than the treacherous “sanctions”, measured as
they were in advance by diplomatists and jurists in agreement with
Mussolini. And if the Soviet trade unions never lifted a finger this
time, in contrast with 1926, when they openly collected millions of
rubles for the British coal strike, it is only because such an
initiative was forbidden by the ruling bureaucracy, chiefly to curry
favor with France. In the coming world war, however, no military allies
can recompense the Soviet Union for the lost confidence of the colonial
peoples and of the toiling masses in general.

Can it be that this is not understood in the Kremlin?

The fundamental aim of German fascism” – so answers the Soviet official
newspaper – “is to isolate the Soviet Union ... Well, and what of it?
The Soviet Union has today more friends in the world than ever before.”
(IZVESTIA, 17/9/35)

The Italian proletariat is in the chains of fascism; the Chinese
revolution is shattered, and Japan is playing the boss in China; the
German proletariat is so crushed that Hitler’s plebiscite encounters no
resistance whatever; the proletariat of Austria is bound hand and foot;
the revolutionary parties of the Balkans are trampled in the earth; in
France, in Spain, the workers are marching at the tail of the radical
bourgeoisie. In spite of all this, the Soviet government from the time
of its entrance into the League of Nation has had “more friends in the
world than ever before”! This boast, so fantastic at first glance, has a
very real meaning when you apply it not to the workers’ state, but to
its ruling group. Was it not indeed the cruel defeats of the world
proletariat which permitted the Soviet bureaucracy to usurp the power at
home and earn a more or less favourable “public opinion” in the
capitalist countries? The less the Communist International is capable of
threatening the positions of capital, the more political credit is given
to the Kremlin government in the eyes of French, Czechoslovak, and other
bourgeoisies. Thus the strength of the bureaucracy, both domestic and
international, is in inverse proportion to the strength of the Soviet
Union as a socialist state and a fighting base of the proletarian
revolution. However, that is only one side of the medal. There is
another.

Lloyd George, in whose jumps and sensations there is often a glimmer of
shrewd penetration, warned the House of Commons in November 1934 against
condemning fascist Germany, which, according to his words, was destined
to be the most reliable bulwark against communism in Europe. “We shall
yet greet her as our friend.” Most significant words! The
half-patronizing, half-ironical praise addressed by the world
bourgeoisie to the Kremlin is not of itself in the slightest degree a
guarantee of peace, or even a simple mitigation of the war danger. The
evolution of the Soviet bureaucracy is of interest to the world
bourgeoisie in the last analysis from the point of view of possible
changes in the forms of property. Napoleon I, after radically abandoning
the traditions of Jacobinism, donning the crown, and restoring the
Catholic cult, remained nevertheless an object of hatred to the whole of
ruling semi-feudal Europe, because he continued to defend the new
property system created by the revolution. Until the monopoly of foreign
trade is broken and the rights of capital restored, the Soviet Union, in
spite of all the services of its ruling stratum, remains in the eyes of
the bourgeoisie of the whole world an irreconcilable enemy, and German
National Socialism a friend, if not today, at least of tomorrow. Even
during the negotiations of Barthou and Laval with Moscow, the big French
bourgeoisie, in spite of the critical danger from the side of Hitler,
and the sharp turn of the French Communist Party to patriotism,
stubbornly refused to stake its game on the Soviet card. When he signed
the treaty with the Soviet Union, Laval was accused from the Left of
frightening Berlin with Moscow, while seeking in reality a
_rapprochement_ with Berlin and Rome against Moscow. This judgment was
perhaps a little premature, but by no means in conflict with the natural
development of events.

However one may judge the advantages of disadvantages of the
Franco-Soviet pact, still, no serious revolutionary statesman would deny
the right of the Soviet state to seek supplementary supports for its
inviolability in temporary agreements with this or that imperialism. It
is only necessary clearly and openly to show the masses the place of
these partial and tactical agreements in the general system of historic
forces. In order to make use particularly of the antagonism between
France and Germany, there is not the slightest need of idealizing the
bourgeois ally, or that combination of imperialists which temporarily
hides behind the screen of the League of Nations. Not only Soviet
diplomacy, however, but in its steps the Communist International
systematically paints up the episodical allies of Moscow as “friends of
peace”, deceives the workers with slogans like “collective security” and
“disarmament”, and thus becomes in reality a political agent of the
imperialists among the working classes.

The notorious interview given by Stalin to the president of the
Scripps-Howard newspapers, Roy Howard, on March 1, 1936, is a precious
document for the characterization of bureaucratic blindness upon the
great questions of world politics, and of that false relation which has
been established between the leaders of the Soviet Union and the world
workers’ movement. To the question, Is war inevitable?, Stalin answers:

“I think that the position of the friends of peace is growing stronger;
the friends of peace can work openly, they rely upon the strength of
public opinion, they have at their disposal such instruments, for
instance, as the League of Nations.”

In these words, there is not a glimmer of realism. The bourgeois states
do not divide themselves into “friends” and “enemies” of peace –
especially since “peace” as such does not exist. Each imperialist
country is interested in preserving _its_ peace, and the more sharply
interested, the more unbearable this peace may be for its enemies. The
formula common to Stalin, Baldwin, Leon Blum, and others, “peace would
be really guaranteed if all states united in the League for its
defence”, means merely that peace would be guaranteed if there existed
no causes for its violation. The thought is correct, if you please, but
not exactly weighty. The great powers who are nonmembers of the League,
like the United States, obviously value a free hand above the
abstraction of “peace.” For just what purpose they need these free hands
they will show in due time. Those states which withdraw from the League,
like Japan and Germany, or temporarily take a “leave of absence” from
it, like Italy, also have sufficiently material reasons for what they
do. Their break with the League merely changes the diplomatic form of
existent antagonisms, but not their nature and not the nature of the
League. Those virtuous nation which swear eternal loyalty to the League
compel themselves the more resolutely to employ it in support of _their_
peace. But even so, there is no agreement. England is quite ready to
extend the period of peace – at the expense of France’s interests in
Europe or in Africa. France, in her turn, is ready to sacrifice the
safety of the British naval routes – for the support of Italy. But for
the defence of their own interests, they are both ready to resort to war
– to the most just, it goes without saying of all wars. And, finally,
the small states, which for the lack of anything better seek shelter in
the shadow of the League, will show up in the long run not on the side
of “peace”, but on the side of the strongest combination in the war.

The League in its defence of the _status quo_ is not an organisation of
“peace”, but an organisation of the violence of the imperialist minority
over the overwhelming majority of mankind. This “order” can be
maintained only with the help of continual wars, little and big – today
in the colonies, tomorrow between the great powers. Imperialist loyalty
to the _status quo_ has always a conditional, temporary, and limited
character. Italy was yesterday defending the _status quo_ of Europe, but
not in Africa. What will be her policy in Europe tomorrow, nobody knows.
But already the change of boundaries in Africa finds its reflection in
Europe. Hitler made bold to lead his troops into the Rhineland only
because Mussolini invaded Abyssinia. It would be hard to number Italy
among the “friends” of peace. However, France values her friendship with
Italy incomparably more than her friendship with the Soviet Union.
England on her side seeks a friendship with Germany. The groupings
change; the appetites remain. The task of the so-called partisans of the
_status quo_ is in essence to find in the League the most auspicious
combination of forces, and the most advantageous cover for the
preparation of a future war. Who will begin it and how, depends upon
circumstances of secondary importance. Somebody will have to begin it,
because the _status quo_ is a cellarful of explosives.

A program of “disarmament”, while imperialist antagonisms survive, is
the most pernicious of fictions. Even if it were realised by way of
general agreement – an obviously fantastic assumption! – that would by
no means prevent a new war. The imperialists do not make war because
there are armaments; on the contrary, they forge arms when they need to
fight. The possibilities of a new, and, moreover, very speedy, arming
lie in contemporary technique. Under no matter what agreements,
limitations and “disarmaments”, the arsenals, the military factories,
the laboratories, the capitalist industries as a whole, preserve their
force. Thus Germany, disarmed by her conquerors under the most careful
control (which, by the way, is the only real form of “disarmament”!) is
again, thanks to her powerful industries, becoming the citadel of
European militariam. She intends, in her turn, to “disarm” certain of
her neighbors. The idea of a so-called “progressive disarmament” means
only an attempt to cut down excessive military expenses in time of
peace. But that task, too, remains unrealized. In consequence of
differences of geographic position, economic power and colonial
saturation, any standards of disarmament would inevitably change the
correlation of forces to the advantage of some and to the disadvantage
of others. Hence the fruitlessness of the attempts made in Geneva.
Almost 20 years of negotiations and conversations about disarmament have
led only to a new wave of armaments, which is leaving far behind
everything that was ever seen before. To build the revolutionary policy
of the proletariat on a program of disarmament means to build it not on
sand, but on the smoke screen of militarism.

The strangulation of the class struggle in the cause of an unhindered
progress of imperialist slaughter can be ensured only with the mediation
of the leaders of the mass workers’ organisations. The slogans under
which this task was fulfilled in 1914: “The last war”, “War against
Prussian militarism”, “War for democracy”, are too well discredited by
the history of the last two decades. “Collective security” and “general
disarmament” are their substitutes. Under the guise of supporting the
League of Nations, the leaders of the workers’ organisations of Europe
are preparing a new edition of the “sacred union”, a thing no less
necessary for war than tanks, aeroplanes, and the “forbidden” poison
gases.

The Third International was born of an indignant protest against social
patriotism. But the revolutionary charge placed in it by the October
revolution is long ago expended. The Communist International now stands
under the banner of the League of Nations, as does the Second
International, only with a fresher store of cynicism. When the British
Socialist, Sir Stafford Cripps, called the League of Nations an
international union of brigands, which was more impolite than unjust,
the London TIMES ironically asked: “In that case, how explain the
adherence of the Soviet Union to the League of Nations?” It is not easy
to answer. Thus the Moscow bureaucracy brings its powerful support to
that social patriotism, to which the October revolution dealt a crushing
blow.

Roy Howard tried to get a little illumination on this point also. What
is the state of affairs – he asked Stalin – as to plans and intentions
in regard to world revolution?

“We never had any such plans or intentions.” But, well ... “This is the
result of a misunderstanding.”

_Howard:_ “A tragic misunderstanding?”

_Stalin:_ “No, comic, or, if you please, tragi-comic.” The quotation is
verbatim. “What danger,” Stalin continued, “can the surrounding states
see in the ideas of the Soviet people if these states really sit firmly
in the saddle?”

Yes, but suppose – the interviewer might ask – they do not sit so firm?
Stalin adduced one more quieting argument:

“The idea of exporting a revolution is nonsense. Every country if it
wants one will produce its own revolution, and if it doesn’t, there will
be no revolution. Thus, for instance, our country wanted to make a
revolution and made it ...”

Again, we have quoted verbatim. From the theory of socialism in a single
country, it is a natural transition to that of revolution in a single
country. For what purpose, then, does the International exist? – the
interviewer might have asked. But he evidently knew the limits of
legitimate curiosity. The reassuring explanations of Stalin, which are
read not only by capitalists but by workers, are full of holes. Before
“our country” desired to make a revolution, we imported the idea of
Marxism for other countries, and made use of foreign revolutionary
experience. For decades we had our émigrés abroad who guided the
struggle in Russia. We received moral and material aid from the workers’
organisations of Europe and America. After our victory we organized, in
1919, the Communist International. We more than once announced the duty
of the proletariat of countries in which the revolution had conquered to
come to the aid of oppressed and insurrectionary classes, and that not
only with ideas but if possible with arms. Nor did we limit ourselves to
announcements. We in our own time aided the workers of Finland, Latvia,
Estonia, and Georgia with armed force. We made an attempt to bring aid
to the revolting Polish proletariat by the campaign of the Red Army
against Warsaw. We sent organizers and commanders to the help of the
Chinese in revolution. In 1926, we collected millions of rubles for the
aid of the British strikers. At present, this all seems to have been a
misunderstanding. A tragic one? No, it is comic. No wonder Stalin has
declared that to live, in the Soviet Union, has become “gay.” Even the
Communist International has changed from a serious to a comic personage.

Stalin would have made a more convincing impression upon his interviewer
if, instead of slandering the past, he had openly contrasted the policy
of Thermidor to the policy of October.

“In the eyes of Lenin,” he might have said, “the League of Nations was a
machine for the preparation of a new imperialist war. We see in it an
instrument of peace. Lenin spoke of the inevitability of revolutionary
wars. We consider the idea of exporting revolution nonsense. Lenin
denounced the union of the proletariat with the imperialist bourgeoisie
as treason. We with all our power impel the international proletariat
along this road. Lenin slashed the slogan of disarmament under
capitalism as a deceit of the workers. We build our whole policy upon
this slogan. Your tragi-comic misunderstand” – Stalin might have
concluded – “lies in your taking us for the continuers of Bolshevism,
when we are in fact its gravediggers.”
 

3. The Red Army and Its Doctrines

The old Russian soldier, brought up in the patriarchal conditions of the
rural commune, was distinguished above all by a blind herd instinct.
Suvorov, the _generalissimo_ of Catherine II and Paul, was the
unexcelled master of an army of feudal slaves. The great French
revolution shelved forever the military act of the old Europe and of
tzarist Russia. The empire, to be sure, still continued to add gigantic
territorial conquests, but it won no further victories over the armies
of civilized nations. A series of external defeats and inward
disturbances was needed in order to transmute the national character in
their fires. The Red Army could only have been formed on a new social
and psychological basis. That long-suffering herd instinct and
submissiveness to nature were replaced in the younger generations by a
spirit of daring and the cult of technique. Together with the awakening
of individuality went a swift rise of the cultural level. Illiterate
recruits became fewer and fewer. The Red Army does not let anybody leave
its ranks who cannot read and write. All sorts of athletic sports
developed tumultuously in the Army and around it. Among the workers,
officials and students in the badge of distinction for marksmanship
enjoyed great popularity. In the winter months, skis gave the regiments
a hitherto unknown mobility. Startling successes were achieved in the
sphere of parachute-jumping, gliding, and aviation. The arctic flights
into the stratosphere are know to everybody. These high points speak for
a whole mountain chain of achievements.

It is unnecessary to idealize the standard of the Red Army in
organisation or operation during the years of the civil war. For the
young commanding staff, however, those were years of a great baptism.
Rank-and-file soldiers of the tzar’s army, underofficers and corporals,
disclosed the talents of organizers and military leaders, and tempered
their wills in a struggle of immense scope. These self-made men were
more than once beaten, but in the long run they conquered. The better
among them studied assiduously. Among the present higher chiefs, who
went clear through the school of the civil war, the overwhelming
majority have also graduated from academies or special courses. Among
the senior officers, about half received a higher military education;
the rest a cadet course. Military theory gave them the necessary
discipline of thought, but did not destroy the audacity awakened by the
dramatic operations of the civil war. This generation is now about 40 to
50 years old, the age of equilibrium of physical and spiritual forces,
when a bold initiative relies upon experience and is not yet quenched by
it.

The party, the Communist Youth, the trade unions – even regardless of
how they fulfill their socialist mission – the administration of the
nationalized industries, the co-operatives, the collective farms, the
Soviet farms – even regardless of how they fulfill their economic tasks
– are training innumerable cadres of young administrators, accustomed to
operate with human and commodity masses, and to identify themselves with
the state. They are the natural reservoir of the commanding staff. The
high pre-service preparation of the student creates another independent
reservoir. The students are grouped in special training battalions,
which in case of mobilization can successfully develop into emergency
schools of the commanding staff. To measure the scope of this source, it
is sufficient to point out that the number of those graduated from the
higher educational institutions has now reached 800,000 a year, the
number of college and university students exceeds half-a-million, and
that the general number of students in all the scholastic institutions
is approaching 28,000,000.

In the sphere of economics, and especially industry, the social
revolution has provided the enterprise of national defence with
advantages of which the old Russia could not dream. Planning methods
mean, in the essence of the matter, a continual mobilization of industry
in the hands of the government, and make it possible to focus on the
interests of defence even in building and equipping new factories. The
correlation between the living and mechanical forces of the Red Army may
be considered, by and large, as on a level with the best armies of the
West. In the sphere of artillery re-equipment, decisive successes were
obtained already in the course of the first five-year plan. Immense sums
are being expended in the production of trucks and armored cars, tanks,
and aeroplanes. There are at present about half-a-million tractors in
this country. In 1936, 160,000 are to be put out, with a total
horsepower of 8.5 million. The building of tanks is progressing at a
parallel rate. The mobilization plans of the Red Army call for 30 to 45
tanks per kilometre of the active front. As a result of the Great War,
the navy was reduced from 548,000 tons in 1917 to 82,000 in 1928. Here
we had to begin almost from the beginning. In January 1936, Tukhachevsky
announced at a session of the Central Executive Committee: “We are
creating a powerful navy. We are concentrating our forces primarily upon
the development of a submarine fleet.” The Japanese naval staff is
well-informed, we may assume, as to the achievements in this sphere. No
less attention is now being given to the Baltic. Still, in the coming
years, the navy can pretend only to an auxiliary role in the defence of
the coastal front.

But the air fleet has advanced mightily. Over two years ago, a
delegation of French aviation engineers was, in the words of the press,
“astonished and delighted by the achievements in this sphere.” They had
an opportunity in particular to convince themselves that the Red Army is
producing in increasing numbers heavy bombing planes for action on a
radius of 1,200 to 1,500 kilometres. In case of a war in the Far East,
the political and military centres of Japan would be subject to attack
from the Soviet coast. According to data appearing in the press, the
five-year plan of the Red Army for 1935 contemplated 62 air regiments
capable of bringing simultaneously 5,000 aeroplanes into the line of
fire. There is hardly a doubt that the plan was fulfilled, and probably
more than fulfilled.

Aviation is closely bound up with a branch of industry, almost
nonexistent in tzarist Russia, but lately advancing by leaps and bounds
– chemistry. It is no secret that the Soviet government – and,
incidentally, the other governments of the world – does not believe for
a second in the oft-repeated “prohibitions” of the use of poison gas.
The work of the Italian civilizers in Abyssinia has again plainly shown
what these humanitarian limitations of international brigandage are good
for. We may assume that against any catastrophic surprises whatever in
the sphere of military chemistry or military bacteriology, these most
mysterious and sinister enterprises, the Red Army is as well-equipped as
the armies of the West.

As to the quality of the articles of military manufacture, there may be
a legitimate doubt. We have noted, however, that instruments of
production are better manufactured in the Soviet Union than objects of
general use. Where the purchasers are influential groups of the ruling
bureaucracy, the quantity of the product rises considerably above the
average level, which is still very low. The most influential client is
the war department. It is no surprise if the machinery of destruction is
of better quality, not only than the objects of consumption, but also
than the instruments of production. Military industry remains, however,
a part of the whole industry and, although to a lesser degree, reflects
its inadequacies. Voroshilov and Tukhachevsky lose no opportunity
publicly to remind the industrialists: “We are not always fully
satisfied with the quality of the products which you supply to the Red
Army.” In private sessions, the military leaders express themselves, we
may assume, more categorically. The commissary supplies are, as a
general rule, of lower quality than the munitions. The shoe is poorer
than the machine gun. But also the aeroplane motor, notwithstanding
indubitable progress, still considerably lags behind the best Western
types. In the matter of military equipment as a whole, the old task is
still there: to catch up as soon as possible to the standard of the
future enemy.

It stands worse with agriculture. In Moscow, they often say that since
the income from industry has already exceeded that from agriculture, the
Soviet Union has _ipso facto_ changed from an agrarian-industrial to an
industrial-agrarian country. In reality, the new correlation of incomes
is determined not so much by the growth of industry, significant as that
is, as by the extraordinarily low level of agriculture. The unusual
lenience of Soviet diplomacy for some years toward Japan was caused,
among other things, by serious food-supply difficulties. The last three
years, however, have brought considerable relief, and permitted in
particular the creation of serious military food-supply bases in the Far
East.

The sorest spot in the army, paradoxical as it may seem, is the horse.
In the full blast of complete collectivization, about 55 per cent of the
country’s horses were killed. Moreover, in spite of motorization, a
present-day army needs, as during the time of Napoleon, one horse every
three soldiers. During the last year, however, things have taken a
favourable turn in this matter: the number of horses in the country is
again on the increase. In any case, even if war broke out in the coming
months, a state with 170 million population will always be able to
mobilize the necessary food resources and horses for the front – to be
sure, at the expense of the rest of the population. But the popular
masses of all countries in the case of war can, in general, hope for
nothing but hunger, poison gas, and epidemics.

* * *

The great French Revolution created its army by amalgamating the new
formations with the royal battalions of the line. The October revolution
dissolved the tzar’s army wholly and without leaving a trace. The Red
Army was built anew from the first brick. A twin of the Soviet regime,
it shared its fate in great things and small. It owed its incomparable
superiority over the tzar’s army wholly to the great social revolution.
It has not stood aside, however, from the processes of degeneration of
the Soviet regime. On the contrary, these have found their most finished
expression in the army. Before attempting to describe the possible role
of the Red Army in a future military cataclysm, it is necessary to dwell
a moment upon the evolution of its guiding ideas and structures.

The decree of the Soviet of People’s Commissars of January 12, 1918,
which laid the foundation for the regular armed forces, defined their
objective in the following words:

“With the transfer of power to the toiling and exploited classes, there
has arisen the necessity to create a new army which shall be the bulwark
of the Soviet power ... and will serve as a support for the coming
socialist revolutions in Europe.”

In repeating on the 1st of May the _Socialist Oath_ – still retained
since 1918 – the young Red Army soldier binds himself

“before the eyes of the toiling classes of Russia and the whole world”
in the struggle “for the cause of Socialism and the brotherhood of
nations, not to spare his strength nor even his life itself.”

When Stalin now describes the international character of the revolution
as a “comic misunderstanding” and “nonsense”, he displays, besides all
the rest, an inadequate respect for basic decrees of the Soviet power
that are not annulled even to this day.

The army naturally was nourished by the same ideas as the party and the
state. Its printed laws, journalism, oral agitation, were alike inspired
by the international revolution as a practical task. Within the walls of
the War Department, the program of revolutionary internationalism not
infrequently assumed an exaggerated character. The late S. Gussev, once
head of the political administration in the army and subsequently a
close ally of Stalin, wrote in 1921, in the official military journal:

“We are preparing the class army of the proletariat ... not only for
defence against the bourgeois-landed counter-revolution, but also for
revolutionary wars (both defensive and offensive) against the
imperialist powers.”

Moreover, Gussev directly blamed the then head of the War Department for
inadequately preparing the Red Army for its international tasks. The
author of these lines, answering Gussev in the press, called his
attention to the fact that foreign military powers fulfill in a
revolutionary process, not a fundamental, but an auxiliary role. Only in
favourable circumstances can they hasten the denouement and facilitate
the victory.

“Military intervention is like the forceps of the physician. Applied in
season, it can lighten the birth pains; brought into operation
prematurely, it can only cause a miscarriage.” (December 5, 1921.)

We cannot, unfortunately, expound here with sufficient completeness the
history of this not unimportant problem. We remark, however, that the
present marshal, Tukhachevsky, addressed to the Communist International
in 1921 a letter proposing to create under his presidency an
“international general staff.” That interesting letter was then
published by Tukhachevsky in a volume of his articles under the
expressive title: _The War of the Classes_. The talented, but somewhat
too impetuous, commander ought to have known from printed explanations
that

“an international general staff could arise only on the basis of the
national staff of _several_ proletarian states; so long as that is
impossible, an international staff would inevitably turn into a
caricature.”

If not Stalin himself – who in general avoids taking a definite position
upon questions of principle, especially new ones – at least many of his
future close associates stood in those years to the “left” of the
leadership of the party and the army. There was no small amount of naive
exaggeration, or, if you prefer, “comic misunderstanding”, in their
ideas. Is a great revolution possible without such things? We were
waging a struggle against these left “caricatures” of internationalism
long before it became necessary to turn our weapons against the no less
extreme caricature involved in the theory of “socialism in a single
country.”

Contrary to the retrospective representations of it, the intellectual
life of Bolshevism at the very heaviest period of the civil war was
boiling like a spring. In all the corridors of the party and the state
apparatus, including the army, discussion was raging about everything,
and especially about military problems. The policy of the leaders
underwent a free, and frequently a fierce, criticism. On the question of
certain excessive military censorships, the then head of the War
Department wrote in the leading military journal:

“I willingly acknowledge that the censorship has made a mountain of
errors, and I consider it very necessary to show that respected
personage a more modest place. The censorship ought to defend military
secrets ... and it has no business interfering with anything else.”
(February 23, 1919.)

The question of an international general staff was only a small episode
in an intellectual struggle which, while kept within bounds of the
discipline of action, led even to the formation of something in the
nature of an oppositional faction within the army, at least within its
upper strata. A school of “proletarian military doctrine” to which
belonged or adhered Frunze, Tukhachevsky, Gussev, Voroshilov, and
others, started from the _a priori_ conviction that, not only in its
political aims but in its structure, strategy and tactic, the Red Army
could have nothing in common with the national armies of the capitalist
countries. The new ruling class must have in all respects a distinct
military system; it remained only to create it. During the civil war,
the thing was limited, of course, chiefly to protests in principle
against the bringing into service of the “generals” – former officers,
that is, of the tzar’s army – and back-kicking against the high command
in its struggle with local improvisations and particular violations of
discipline. The extreme apostles of the new word tried in the name of
strategic principles, of “maneuverism” and “offensivism” pushed to that
absolute, to reject even the centralized organisation of the army, as
inhibiting revolutionary initiative on future international fields of
battle. In its essence, this was an attempt to extend the guerilla
methods of the first period of the civil war into a permanent and
universal system. A good many of the revolutionary commanders came out
the more willingly for the new doctrine, since they did not want to
study the old. The principal centre of these moods was Tzaritzyn (now
Stalingrad), where Budenny, Voroshilov, and afterward Stalin, began
their military work.

Only after the war ended was a more systematic attempt made to erect
these innovations into a finished doctrine. The initiator was one of the
outstanding commanders of the civil war, the late Frunze, a former
political hard-labor prisoner, and he was supported by Voroshilov, and
to some extent by Tukhachevsky. In essence, the proletarian military
doctrine was wholly analogous to the doctrine of “proletarian culture”,
completely sharing its metaphysical schematism. In certain works left by
the advocates of this tendency, this or that practical prescription,
usually far from new, was arrived at deductively from the standard
characteristics of the proletariat as an international and aggressive
class – that is, from motionless psychological abstraction, and not from
real conditions of time and place. Marxism, although acclaimed in every
line, was in reality replaced by pure idealism. Notwithstanding the
sincerity of these thought wanderings, it is not difficult to see in
them the germ of the swiftly developing self-complacence of a
bureaucracy which wanted to believe, and make others believe, that it
was able in all spheres without special preparation and even without the
material prerequisites to accomplish historic miracles.

The then-head of the War Department answered Frunze in the press:

“I also do not doubt that if a country with _a developed socialist
economy_ found itself compelled to wage war with a bourgeois country,
the picture of the strategy of the socialist country would be wholly
different. But this gives no basis for an attempt _today_ to suck a
’proletarian strategy’ out of our fingers ... By developing socialist,
raising the cultural level of the masses ... we will undoubtedly enrich
the military art with new methods.”

But for this it is necessary assiduously to learn from the advanced
capitalist countries, and not to try to

“infer a new strategy by speculative methods from the revolutionary
nature of the proletariat.” (April 1, 1922.)

Archimedes promised to move the Earth if they would give him a point of
support. That was not badly said. However, if they offered him the
needed point of support, it would have turned out that he had neither
the lever nor the power to bring it into action. The victorious
revolution gave us a new point of support, but in order to move the
Earth it is still necessary to build the levers.

“The proletarian military doctrine” was rejected by the party, like its
elder sister, “the doctrine of proletarian culture.” However, in sequel,
at least so it appears, their destinies diverged. The banner of
“proletarian culture” was raised by Stalin and Bukharin, to be sure
without visible results, in the course of the seven-year period between
the proclamation of “socialism in one country” and of the abolition of
all classes (1924-31). The “proletarian military doctrine”, on the
contrary, notwithstanding that its former advocates soon stood at the
helm of state, never had any resurrection. The external difference in
the fates of these two so-closely-related doctrines is of profound
significance in the evolution of Soviet society. “Proletarian culture”
had to do with imponderable matters, and the bureaucracy was the more
magnanimous about granting this moral compensation to the proletariat,
the more rudely it pushed the proletariat from the seats of power.
Military doctrine, on the contrary, goes to the quick, not only of the
interests of defence, but of the interests of the ruling stratum. Here
there was no place for ideological pamperings. The former opponents of
the enlistment of the “generals” had themselves meantime become
“generals.” The prophets of an international general staff had quieted
down under the canopy of the general staff of a “single country.” The
“war of the classes” was replaced by the doctrine of “collective
security.” The perspective of world revolution gave place to the
deification of the _status quo_. In order to inspire confidence in
possible allies, and not overirritate the enemies, the demand now was to
differ as little as possible, no matter what the cost, from capitalist
armies. Behind these changes of doctrine and repaintings of facade,
social processes of historic import were taking place. The year 1935 was
for the army a kind of two-fold state revolution – a revolution in
relation to the militia system and to the commanding staff.
 

4. The Abolition of the Militia and the Restoration of Officers’ Ranks

In what degree do the Soviet armed forces, at the end of the second
decade of their existence, correspond to the type which the Bolshevik
party inscribed upon its banner?

The army of the proletarian dictatorship ought to have, according to the
program,

“an overtly class character – that is, to be composed exclusively of the
proletariat and the semi-proletariat layers of the peasantry close to
it. Only in connection with the abolition of classes will such a class
army convert itself into a national socialist militia.”

Although postponing to a coming period the _all-national_ character of
the army, the party by no means rejected the _militia_ system. On the
contrary, according to a resolution of the 8th Congress (March 1919):
“We are shifting the militia to a class basis and converting it into a
Soviet militia.” The aim of the military work was defined as the gradual
creation of an army “as far as possible by extra-barrackroom methods –
that is, in a set-up close to the labour conditions of the working
class.”

In the long run, all the divisions of the army were to coincide
territorially with the factories, mines, villages, agricultural
communes, and other organic groupings, “with a local commanding staff,
with local stores of arms, and of all supplies.” A regional, scholastic,
industrial, and athletic union of the youth was to more than replace the
corporative spirit instilled by the barracks, and inculcate conscious
discipline without the elevation above the army of a professional
officers’ corps.

A militia, however, no matter how well corresponding to the nature of
the socialist society, requires a high economic basis. Special
circumstances are built up for a regular army. A territorial army,
therefore, much more directly reflects the real condition of the
country. The lower the level of culture and the sharper the distinction
between village and city, the more imperfect and heterogeneous the
militia. A lack of railroads, highways, and water routes, together with
an absence of autoroads and a scarcity of automobiles, condemns the
territorial army in the first critical weeks and months of war to
extreme slowness of movement. In order to ensure a defence of the
boundaries during mobilization, strategic transfers and concentrations,
it is necessary, along with the territorial detachments, to have regular
troops. The Red Army was created from the very beginning as a necessary
compromise between the two systems, with the emphasis on the regular
troops.

In 1924, the then-head of the War Department wrote:

“We must always have before our eyes two circumstances: If the very
possibility of going over to the militia system was first created by the
establishment of a Soviet structure, still the tempo of the change is
determined by the general conditions of the culture of the country –
technique, means of communications, literacy, etc. The political
premises for a militia are firmly established with us, whereas the
economic and cultural are extremely backward.”

Granted the necessary material conditions, the territorial army would
not only not stand second to the regular army, but far exceed it. The
Soviet Union must pay dear for its defence, because it is not
sufficiently rich for the cheaper militia system. There is nothing here
to wonder at. It is exactly because of its poverty that the Soviet
society has hung around its neck the very costly bureaucracy.

One and the same problem, the disproportion between economic base and
social superstructure, comes up with remarkable regularity in absolutely
all the spheres of social life, in the factory, the collective farm, the
family, the school, in literature, and in the army. The basis of all
relations is the contrast between a low level of productive forces, low
even from a capitalist standpoint, and forms of property that are
socialist in principle. The new social relations are raising up the
culture. But the inadequate culture is dragging the social forms down.
Soviet reality is an equilibrium between these two tendencies. In the
army, thanks to the extreme definiteness of its structure, the resultant
is measurable in sufficiently exact figures. The correlation between
regular troops and militia can serve as a fair indication of the actual
movement toward socialism.

Nature and history have provided the Soviet state with open frontiers
10,000 kilometres apart, with a sparse population, and bad roads. On the
15th of October, 1924, the old military leadership, then in its last
month, once more urged that this not be forgotten:

“In the next few years, the creation of a militia must of necessity have
a preparatory character. Each successive step must follow from the
carefully verified success of the preceding steps.”

But with 1925 a new era began. The advocates of the former proletarian
military doctrine came to power. In its essence, the territorial army
was deeply contradictory to that ideal of “offensivism” and
“maneuverism” with which this school had opened its career. But they had
now begun to forget about the world revolution. The new leaders hoped to
avoid wars by “neutralizing” the bourgeoisie. In the course of the next
few years, 74 per cent of the army was reorganized on a militia basis!

So long as Germany remained disarmed, and moreover “friendly”, the
calculations of the Moscow general staff in the matter of western
boundaries were based on the military forces of the immediate neighbors:
Rumania, Poland, Lithuania, Latvia, Esthonia, Finland, with the probably
material support of the most powerful of the enemies, chiefly France. In
that far-off epoch (which ended in 1933), France was not considered a
providential “friend of peace.” The surrounding states could put in the
field together about 120 divisions of infantry, approximately 3,500,000
men. The mobilization plans of the Red Army tried to insure on the
western boundary an army of the first class amounting to the same
number. In the Far East, under all conditions in the theatre of war, it
could be a question only of hundreds of thousands, and not millions.
Each hundred fighters demands, in the course of a year, approximately 75
men to replace losses. Two years of war would withdraw from the country,
leaving aside those who return from hospitals to active service, about
10 to 12 million men. The Red Army up to 1935 numbered in all 562,000
men – with the troops of the GPU, 620,000 – with 40,000 officers.
Moreover, at the beginning of 1935, 74 per cent, as we have already
said, were in the territorial divisions, and only 26 per cent in the
regular army. Could you ask a better proof that the socialist militia
had conquered – if not by 100 per cent, at least by 74 per cent, and in
any case “finally and irrevocably”?

However, all the above calculations, conditional enough in themselves,
were left hanging in the air after Hitler came to power. Germany began
feverishly to arm, and primarily against the Soviet Union. The prospect
of a peaceful cohabitation with capitalism faded at once. The swift
approach of military danger impelled the Soviet government, besides
bringing up the numbers of the armed forces to 1,300,000, to change
radically the structure of the Red Army. At the present time, it
contains 77 per cent of regular, or so-called “_kadrovy_” divisions, and
only 23 per cent of territorials! This shattering of the territorial
divisions looks too much like a renunciation of the militia system –
unless you forgot that an army is needed not for times of peace, but
exactly for the moments of military danger. Thus, historic experience,
starting from that sphere which is least of all tolerant of jokes, has
ruthlessly revealed that only so much has been gained “finally and
irrevocably” as is guaranteed by the productive foundation of society.

Nevertheless, the slide from 74 per cent to 23 per cent seems excessive.
It was not brought to pass, we may assume, without a “friendly” pressure
from the French general staff. It is still more likely that the
bureaucracy seized upon a favourable pretext for this step, which was
dictated to a considerable degree by political considerations. The
divisions of a militia through their very character come into direct
dependence upon the population. This is the chief advantage of the
system from a socialist point of view. But this also is its danger from
the point of view of the Kremlin. It is exactly because of this
undesirable closeness of the army to the people that the military
authorities of the advanced capitalist countries, where technically it
would be easy to realize, reject the militia. The keen discontent in the
Red Army during the first five-year plan undoubtedly supplied a serious
motive for the subsequent abolition of the territorial divisions.

Our proposition would be unanswerably confirmed by an accurate diagram
of the Red Army previous to and after the counterreform. We have not
such data, however, and if we had we should consider it impossible to
use them publicly. But there is a fact, accessible to all, which permits
of no two interpretations: at the same time that the Soviet government
reduced the relative weight of the militia in the army to 51 per cent,
it restored the cossack troops, the sole militia formation in the tzar’s
army! Cavalry is always the privileged and most conservative part of an
army. The cossacks were always the most conservative part of the
cavalry. During the war and the revolution, they served as a police
force – first for the tzar, and then for Kerensky. Under the Soviet
power, they remained perpetually Vendean. Collectivization – introduced
among the cossacks, moreover, with special measures of violence – has
not yet, of course, changed their traditions and temper. Moreover, as an
exceptional law, the cossacks have been restored the right to possess
their own horse. There is no lack, of course, of other indulgences. Is
it possible to doubt that these riders of the steppes are again on the
side of the privileged against the oppressed? Upon a background of
unceasing repressions against oppositional tendencies among the workers’
youth, the restoration of the cossack stripe and forelock is undoubtedly
one of the clearest expressions of the Thermidor!

* * *

A still more deadly blow to the principles of the October revolution was
struck by the decree restoring the officers’ corps in all its bourgeois
magnificence. The commanding staff of the Red Army, with its
inadequacies, but also with its inestimable merits, grew out of the
revolution and the civil war. The youth, to whom independent political
activity is closed, undoubtedly supply no small number of able
representatives to the Red Army. On the other hand, the progressive
degeneration of the state apparatus could not fail in its turn to
reflect itself in the broad circles of the commanding staff. In one of
the public conferences, Voroshilov, developing truisms in regard to the
duty of commanders to be models to their men, thought it necessary just
in that connection to make this confession: “Unfortunately, I cannot
especially boast”; the lower ranks are growing while “often the
commanding cadres lag behind.” “Frequently the commanders are unable to
answer in a suitable manner” new questions, etc.

A bitter confession from the most responsible – at least formally –
leader of the army, a confession capable of evoking alarm but not
surprise. What Voroshilov says about the commanders is true of all
bureaucrats. Of course the orator himself does not entertain the thought
that the ruling upper circles might be numbered among those who “lag
behind.” No wonder they are always and everywhere shouting at everybody,
and angrily stamping their feet, and giving order to be “at your best.”
In simple fact, it is that uncontrolled corporation of “leaders” to whom
Voroshilov himself belongs which is the chief cause of backwardness and
routine, and of much else.

The army is a copy of society and suffers from all its diseases, usually
at a higher temperature. The trade of war is too austere to get along
with fictions and imitations. The army needs the fresh air of criticism.
The commanding staff needs democratic control. The organizers of the Red
Army were aware of this from the beginning, and considered it necessary
to prepare for such a measure as the election of the commanding staff.

“The growth of internal solidarity of the detachments, the development
in the soldier of a critical attitude to himself and his commanders ...”
says the basic decision of the party on military questions, “will create
favourable conditions in which the principle of electivity of the
commanding personnel can receive wider and wider application.”

Fifteen years after this decision was adopted – a span of time long
enough, it would seem, for the maturing of inner solidarity and
self-criticism – the ruling circles have taken the exactly opposite
turn.

In September 1935, civilized humanity, friends and enemies alike,
learned with surprise that the Red Army would now be crowned with an
officers’ hierarchy, beginning with lieutenant and ending with marshal.
According to Tukhachevsky, the actual head of the War Department,

“the introduction by the government of military titles will create a
more stable basis for the development of commanding and technical
cadres.”

The explanation is consciously equivocal. The commanding cadres are
reinforced above all by the confidence of the soldiers. For that very
reason, the Red Army began by liquidating the officers’ corp. The
resurrection of hierarchical caste is not in the least demanded by the
interests of military affairs. It is the commanding position, and not
the rank, of the commander that is important. Engineers and physicians
have no rank, but society finds the means of putting each in his needful
place. The right to a commanding position is guaranteed by study,
endowment, character, experience, which need continual and moreover
individual appraisal. The rank of major adds nothing to the commander of
a battalion. The elevation of the five senior commanders of the Red Army
to the title of marshal, gives them neither new talents nor
supplementary powers. It is not the army that really thus receives a
“stable basis”, but the officers’ corps, and that at the price of
aloofness from the army. The reform pursues a purely political aim: to
give a new social weight to the officers. Molotov thus in essence
defined the meaning of the decree: “to elevate the importance of the
guiding cadres of our Army.” The thing is not limited, either, to a mere
introduction of titles. It is accompanied with an accelerated
construction of quarters for the commanding staff. In 1936, 47,000 rooms
are to be constructed, and 57 per cent more money is to be issued for
salaries than during the preceding year. “To elevate the importance of
the guiding cadres” means, at a cost of weakening the moral bonds of the
army, to bind the officers closer together with the ruling circles.

It is worthy of note that the reformers did not consider it necessary to
invent fresh titles for the resurrected ranks. On the contrary, they
obviously wanted to keep step with the West. At the same time, they
revealed their Achilles’ heel in not daring to resurrect the title of
general, which among the Russian people has too ironical a sound. In
announcing the elevation to marshals of the five military dignitaries –
choice of the five was made, to be it remarked, rather out of regard for
personal loyalty to Stalin than for talents or services – the Soviet
press did not forget to remind its readers of the tzar’s army, its
“caste and rank worship and obsequiousness.” Why then such a slavish
imitation of it? In creating new privileges, the bureaucracy employs at
every step the arguments which once served for the destruction of the
old privileges. Insolence takes turns with cowardice, nd is supplemented
with increasing doses of hypocrisy.

However surprising at first glance the official resurrections of “caste
and rank worship and obsequiousness”, we must confess that the
government had little freedom of choice left. The promotion of
commanders on a basis of personal qualification can be realised only
under conditions of free initiative and criticism in the army itself,
and control over the army by the public opinion of the country. Severe
discipline can get along excellently with a broad democracy and even
directly rely upon it. No army, however, can be more democratic than the
regime which nourishes it. The source of bureaucratism, with its routine
and swank, is not the special needs of military affairs, but the
political needs of the ruling stratum. In the army, these needs only
receive their most finished expression. The restoration of officers’
castes 18 years after their revolutionary abolition testifies equally to
the gulf which already separated the rules from the ruled, to the loss
by the Soviet army of the chief qualities which gave it the name of
“Red”, and to the cynicism with which the bureaucracy erects these
consequences of degeneration into law.

The bourgeois press has appraised this counterreform as it deserves. The
French official paper, LE TEMPS, wrote on September 25, 1935:

“This external transformation is one of the signs of a deep change which
is now taking place through the Soviet Union. The regime, now definitely
consolidated, is gradually becoming stabilized. Revolutionary habits and
customs are giving place within the Soviet family and Soviet society to
the feelings and customs which continue to prevail within the so-called
capitalist countries. The Soviets are becoming bourgeoized.”

There is hardly a word to add to that judgment.
 

5. The Soviet Union in a War

Military danger is only one expression of the dependence of the Soviet
Union upon the rest of the world, and consequently one argument against
the utopian idea of an isolated socialist society. But it is only now
that this ominous “argument” is brought forward.

To enumerate in advance all the factors of the coming dogfight of the
nations would be a hopeless task. If such an _a priori_ calculation were
possible, conflicts of interest would always end in a peaceful
bookkeeper’s bargain. In the bloody equation of war, there are too many
unknown quantities. In any case, there are on the side of the Soviet
Union immense favourable factors, both inherited from the past and
created by the new regime. The experience of intervention during the
civil war proved once more that Russia’s greatest advantage has been and
remains her vast spaces. Foreign imperialism overthrew Soviet Hungary,
though not, to be sure, without help from the lamentable government of
Bela Kun, in a few days. Soviet Russia, cut off from the surrounding
countries at the very start, struggled against intervention for three
years. At certain moments, the territory of the revolution was reduced
almost to that of the old Moscow principality. But even that proved
sufficient to enable her to hold out, and in the long run triumph.

Russia’s second greatest advantage is her human reservoir. Having grown
almost 3,000,000 per year, the population of the Soviet Union has
apparently now passed 170,000,000. A single recruiting class comprises
about 1,300,000 men. The strictest sorting, both physical and political,
would throw out not more than 400,000. The reserves, therefore, which
may be theoretically estimated at 18 to 20 million, are practically
unlimited.

But nature and man are only the raw materials of war. To so-called
military “potential” depends primarily upon the economic strength of the
state. In this sphere, the advantages of the Soviet Union by comparison
with the old Russia are enormous. The planned economy has up to this
time, as we have said, given its greatest advantages from the military
point of view. The industrialization of the outlying regions, especially
Siberia, has given a wholly new value to the steppe and forest spaces.
Nevertheless, the Soviet Union still remains a backward country. The low
productivity of labour, the inadequate quality of the products, the
weakness of the means of transport, are only to a certain degree
compensated by space and natural riches and the numbers of the
population. In times of peace, the measuring of economic might between
the two hostile social systems can be postponed – for a long time,
although by no means forever – with the help of political devices, above
all the monopoly of foreign trade. During a war the test is made
directly upon the field of battle. Hence the danger.

Military defeats,although they customarily entail great political
changes, do not always of themselves lead to a disturbance of the
economic foundations of society. A social regime which guarantees a
higher development of riches and culture, cannot be overthrown by
bayonets. On the contrary, the victors take over the institutions and
customs of the conquered, if these are beyond them in evolution. Forms
of property can be overthrown by military force only when they are
sharply out of accord with the economic basis of the country. A defeat
of Germany in a war against the Soviet Union would inevitably result in
the crushing, not only of Hitler, but of the capitalist system. On the
other hand, it is hardly to be doubted that a military defeat would also
prove fatal, not only for the Soviet ruling stratum, but also for the
social bases of the Soviet Union. The instability of the present
structure in Germany is conditioned by the fact that its productive
forces have long ago outgrown the forms of capitalist property. The
instability of the Soviet regime, on the contrary, is due to the fact
that its productive forces have far from grown up to the forms of
socialist property. A military defeat threatens the social basis of the
Soviet Union for the same reason that these bases require in peaceful
times a bureaucracy and a monopoly of foreign trade – that is, because
of their weakness.

Can we, however, expect that the Soviet Union will come out of the
coming great war without defeat? To this frankly posed question, we will
answer as frankly: If the war should remain only a war, the defeat of
the Soviet Union would be inevitable. In a technical, economic, and
military sense, imperialism in incomparably more strong. If it is not
paralyzed by revolution in the West, imperialism will sweep away the
regime which issued from the October revolution.

It may be answered that “imperialism” is an abstraction, for it too is
torn by contradictions. That is quite true, and were it not for those
contradictions, the Soviet Union would long ago have disappeared from
the scene. The diplomatic and military agreements of the Soviet Union
are based in part upon them. However, it would be a fatal mistake not to
see the limits beyond which those contradictions must subside. Just as
the struggle of the bourgeois and petty bourgeois parties, from the most
reactionary to the Social Democratic, subsides before the immediate
threat of a proletarian revolution, so imperialist antagonisms will
always find a compromise in order to block the military victory of the
Soviet Union.

Diplomatic agreements, as a certain chancellor with some reason once
remarked, are only “scraps of paper.” It is nowhere written that they
must survive even up to the outbreak of war. Not one of the treaties
with the Soviet Union would survive the immediate threat of a social
revolution in any part of Europe. Let the political crisis in Spain, to
say nothing of France, enter a revolutionary phase, and the hope
propounded by Lloyd George in savior-Hitler would irresistibly take
possession of all bourgeois governments. On the other hand, if the
unstable situation in Spain, France, Belgium, etc., should end in a
triumph of the reaction, there would again remain not a trace of the
Soviet pacts. And, finally, if the “scraps of paper” should preserve
their validity during the first period of military operations, there is
not a doubt that groupings of forces in the decisive phase of the war
would be determined by factors of incomparably more powerful
significance than the oaths of diplomats, perjurers as they are by
profession.

The situation would be radically different, of course, if the bourgeois
allies received material guarantees that the Moscow government stands on
the same side with them, not only of the war trenches, but of the class
trenches, too. Availing themselves of the difficulties of the Soviet
Union, which will be placed between two fires, the capitalist “friends
of peace" will, of course, take all measures to drive a breach into the
monopoly of foreign trade and the Soviet laws on property. The growing
“defensist” movement among the Russian white émigrés in France and
Czechoslovakia feeds wholly upon such calculations. And if you assume
that the world struggle will be played out only on a military level, the
Allies have a good chance of achieving their goal. Without the
interference of revolution, the social bases of the Soviet Union must be
crushed, not only in the case of defeat, but also in the case of
victory.

More than two years ago, a program announcement, _The Fourth
International and War_, outlined this perspective in the following
words:

“Under the influence of the critical need of the state for articles of
prime necessity, the individualistic tendencies of the peasant economy
will receive a considerable reinforcement, and the centrifugal forces
within the collective farms will increase with every month ... In the
heated atmosphere of war, we may expect ... the attracting of foreign
allied capital, a breach in the monopoly of foreign trade, a weakening
of state control of the trusts, a sharpening of competition between the
trusts, conflicts between the trusts and the workers, etc. ... In other
words, in the case of a long war, if the world proletariat is passive,
the inner social contradictions of the Soviet Union not only might, but
must, lead to a bourgeois Bonapartist counterrevolution.”

The events of the last two years have redoubled the force of this
prognosis.

The preceding considerations, however, by no means lead to so-called
“pessimistic” conclusions. If we do not want to shut our eyes to the
immense material preponderance of the capitalist world, nor the
inevitable treachery of the imperialist “allies”, nor the inner
contradictions of the Soviet regime, we are, on the one hand, in no
degree inclined to overestimate the stability of the capitalist system,
either in hostile or allied countries. Long before a war to exhaustion
can measure the correlation of economic forces to the bottom, it will
put to the test the relative stability of the regimes. All serious
theoreticians of future slaughters of the people take into consideration
the probability, and even the inevitability, of revolution among its
results. The idea, again and again advanced in certain circles, of small
“professional” armies, although little more real than the idea of
individual heroes in the manner of David and Goliath, reveals in its
very fantasticness the reality of the dread of an armed people. Hitler
never misses a chance to reinforce his “love of peace” with a reference
to the inevitability of a new Bolshevik storm in case of a war in the
West. The power which is restraining for the time being the fury of war
is not the League of Nations, not mutual security pacts, not pacifist
referendums, but solely and only the self-protective fear of the ruling
classes before the revolution.

Social regimes like all other phenomena must be estimated comparatively.
Notwithstanding all its contradictions, the Soviet regime in the matter
of stability still has immense advantages over the regimes of its
probable enemies. The very possibility of a rule of the Nazis over the
German people was created by the unbearable tenseness of social
antagonisms in Germany. These antagonisms have not been removed, and not
even weakened, but only suppressed, by the lid of fascism. A war will
bring them to the surface. Hitler has far less chances than had Wilhelm
II of carrying a war to victory. Only a timely revolution, by saving
Germany from war, could save her from a new defeat.

The world press portrayed the recent bloody attack of Japanese officers
upon the ministers of the government as the imprudent manifestation of a
too flaming patriotism. In reality, these attacks, notwithstanding the
difference of ideology, belong to the same historic type as the bombs of
the Russian Nihilists against the tzarist bureaucracy. The population of
Japan is suffocated under the combined yoke of Asiatic agrarianism and
ultramodern capitalism. Korea, Manchukuo, China, at the first weakening
of the military pincers, will rise against the Japanese tyranny. A war
will bring the empire of the Mikado the greatest of social catastrophes.

The situation of Poland is but little better. The regime of Pilsudski,
least fruitful of all regimes, proved incapable even of weakening the
land slavery of the peasants. The western Ukraine (Galacia) is living
under a heavy national oppression. The workers are shaking the country
with continual strikes and rebellions. Trying to insure itself by a
union with France and a friendship with Germany, the Polish bourgeoisie
is incapable of accomplishing anything with its maneuvers except to
hasten the war and find in it a more certain death.

The danger of war and a defeat of the Soviet Union is a reality, but the
revolution is also a reality. If the revolution does not prevent war,
then war will help the revolution. Second births are commonly easier
than first. In the new war, it will not be necessary to wait a whole two
years and a half for the first insurrection. Once it is begun, moreover,
the revolution will not this time stop half way. The fate of the Soviet
Union will be decided in the long run not on the maps of the general
staffs, but on the map of the class struggle. Only the European
proletariat, implacably opposing its bourgeoisie, and in the same camp
with them the “friends of peace”, can protect the Soviet Union from
destruction, or from an “allied” stab in the back. Even a military
defeat of the Soviet Union would be only a short episode, in case of a
victory of the proletariat in other countries. And on the other hand, no
military victory can save the inheritance of the October revolution, if
imperialism holds out in the rest of the world.

The henchmen of the Soviet bureaucracy say that we “underestimate” the
inner forces of the Soviet Union, the Red Army, etc., just as they have
said that we “deny” the possibility of socialist construction in a
single state. These arguments stand on such a low level that they do not
even permit a fruitful exchange of opinions. Without the Red Army, the
Soviet Union would be crushed and dismembered like China. Only her
stubborn and heroic resistance to the future capitalist enemy can create
favourable conditions for the development of the class struggle in the
imperialist camp. The Red Army is thus a factor of immense significance.
But this does not mean that it is the sole historic factor. Sufficient
that it can give a mighty impulse to the revolution. Only the revolution
can fulfill the chief task; to that the Red Army alone is unequal.

Nobody demands of the Soviet government international adventures,
unreasonable acts, attempts to force by violence the course of world
events. On the contrary, insofar as such attempts have been made by the
bureaucracy in the past (Bulgaria, Esthonia, Canton, etc.), they have
only played into the hands of the reaction, and they have met a timely
condemnation from the Left Opposition. It is a question of the general
direction of the Soviet state. The contradiction between its foreign
policy and the interests of the world proletariat and the colonial
peoples, finds its most ruinous expression in the subjection of the
Communist International to the conservative bureaucracy with its new
religion of inaction.

It is not under the banner of the _status quo_ that the European worker
and the colonial peoples can rise against imperialism, and against that
war which must break out and overthrow the _status quo_ almost as
inevitably as a developed infant destroys the _status quo_ of pregnancy.
The toilers have not the slightest interest in defending existing
boundaries, especially in Europe – either under the command of their
bourgeoisies, or, still less, in a revolutionary insurrection against
them. The decline of Europe is caused by the very fact that it is
economically split up among almost 40 quasi-national states which, with
their customs, passports, money systems, and monstrous armies in defence
of national particularism, have become a gigantic obstacle on the road
of the economic and cultural development of mankind.

The task of the European proletariat is not the perpetuation of
boundaries but, on the contrary, their revolutionary abolition, not the
_status quo_, but a socialist United States of Europe!

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 9 SOCIAL RELATIONS IN THE SOVIET UNION


------------------------------------------------------------------------

Not Yet Decided by History 

IN THE INDUSTRIES state ownership of the means of production prevails
almost universally. In agriculture it prevails absolutely only in the
Soviet farms, which comprise no more than 10 per cent of the tilled
land. In the collective farms, co-operative or group ownership is
combined in various proportions with state and private ownership. The
land, although legally belonging to the state, has been transferred to
the collectives for “perpetual” use, which differs little from group
ownership. The tractors and elaborate machinery belong to the state; the
smaller equipment belongs to the collectives. Each collective farmer
moreover carries on individual agriculture. Finally, more than 10 per
cent of the peasants remain individual farmers.

According to the census of 1934, 28.1 per cent of the population were
workers and employees of state enterprises and institutions. Industrial
and building-trades workers, not including their families, amounted in
1935 to 7.5 millions. The collective farms and co-operative crafts
comprised, at the time of the census, 45.9 per cent of the population.
Students, soldiers of the Red Army, pensioners, and other elements
directly dependent upon the state, made up 3.4 per cent. Altogether, 74
per cent of the population belonged to the “socialist sector”, and 95.8
per cent of the basic capital of the country fell to the share of this
74 per cent. Individual peasants and craftsmen still comprised, in 1934,
22.5 per cent, but they had possession of only a little more than 4 per
cent of the national capital!

Since 1934 there has been no census; the next one will be in 1937.
Undoubtedly, however, during the last two years the private enterprise
sector has shrunk still more in favor of the “socialist.” Individual
peasants and craftsmen, according to the calculations of official
economists, now constitute about 10 per cent of the population – that
is, about 17 million people. Their economic importance has fallen very
much lower than their numbers. The Secretary of the Central Committee,
Andreyev, announced in April 1936: “The relative weight of socialist
production in our country in 1936 ought to reach 98.5 per cent. That is
to say, something like an insignificant 1.5 per cent still belongs to
the non-socialist sector.” These optimistic figures seem at first glance
an unanswerable proof of the “final and irrevocable” victory of
socialism. But woe to him who cannot see social reality behind
arithmetic!

The figures themselves are arrived at with some stretching: it is
sufficient to point out that the private allotments alongside the
collective farms are entered under the “socialist” sector. However, that
is not the crux of the question. The enormous and wholly indubitable
statistical superiority of the state and collective forms of economy,
important though it is for the future, does not remove another and no
less important question: that of the strength of bourgeois tendencies
within the “socialist” sector itself, and this not only in agriculture
but in industry. The material level already attained is high enough to
awaken increased demands in all, but wholly insufficient to satisfy
them. Therefore, the very dynamic of economic progress involves an
awakening of petty bourgeois appetites, not only among the peasants and
representatives of “intellectual” labour, but also among the upper
circles of the proletariat. A bare antithesis between individual
proprietors and collective farmers, between private craftsmen and state
industries, does not give the slightest idea of the explosive power of
these appetites, which imbue the whole economy of the country, and
express themselves, generally speaking, in the desire of each and every
one to give as little as possible to society and receive as much as
possible from it.

No less energy and ingenuity is being spent in solving money-grubbers’
and consumers’ problems than upon socialist construction in the proper
sense of the word. Hence derives, in part, the extremely low
productivity of social labour. While the state finds itself in continual
struggle with the molecular action of these centrifugal forces, the
ruling group itself forms the chief reservoir of legal and illegal
personal accumulations. Masked as they are with new juridical norms, the
petty bourgeois tendencies cannot, of course, be easily determined
statistically. But their actual predominance in economic life is proven
primarily by the “socialist” bureaucracy itself, that flagrant
_contradictio in adjecto_, that monstrous and continually growing social
distortion, which in turn becomes the source of malignant growths in
society.

The new constitution – wholly founded, as we shall see, upon an
identification of the bureaucracy with the state, and the state with the
people – says: “... the state property – that is, the possessions of the
whole people.” This identification is the fundamental sophism of the
official doctrine. It is perfectly true that Marxists, beginning with
Marx himself, have employed in relation to the workers’ state the terms
_state_, _national_ and _socialist_ property as simple synonyms. On a
large historic scale, such a mode of speech involves no special
inconveniences. But it becomes the source of crude mistakes, and of
downright deceit, when applied to the first and still unassured stages
of the development of a new society, and one moreover isolated and
economically lagging behind the capitalist countries.

In order to become social, private property must as inevitably pass
through the state stage as the caterpillar in order to become a
butterfly must pass through the pupal stage. But the pupa is not a
butterfly. Myriads of pupae perish without ever becoming butterflies.
State property becomes the property of “the whole people” only to the
degree that social privilege and differentiation disappear, and
therewith the necessity of the state. In other words: state property is
converted into socialist property in proportion as it ceases to be state
property. And the contrary is true: the higher the Soviet state rises
above the people, and the more fiercely it opposes itself as the
guardian of property to the people as its squanderer, the more obviously
does it testify against the socialist character of this state property.

“We are still far from the _complete_ abolition of classes,” confesses
the official press, referring to the still existing differentiation of
city and country, intellectual and physical labour. This purely academic
acknowledgment has the advantage that it permits a concealment of the
income of the bureaucracy under the honorable title of “intellectual”
labour. The “friends” – to whom Plato is much dearer than the truth –
also confine themselves to an academic admission of survivals of the old
inequality. In reality, these much put-upon “survivals” are completely
inadequate to explain the Soviet reality. If the differences between
city and country have been mitigated in certain respects, in others they
have been considerably deepened, thanks to the extraordinarily swift
growth of cities and city culture – that is, of comforts for an urban
minority. The social distance between physical and intellectual labour,
notwithstanding the filling out of the scientific cadres by newcomers
from below, has increased, not decreased, during recent years. The
thousand-year-old caste barriers defining the life of every man on all
sides – the polished urbanite and the uncouth _muzhik_, the wizard of
science and the day laborer – have not just been preserved from the past
in a more or less softened form, but have to a considerable degree been
born anew, and are assuming a more and more defiant character.

The notorious slogan: “The cadres decide everything”, characterizes the
nature of Soviet society far more frankly than Stalin himself would
wish. The cadres are in their very essence the organs of domination and
command. A cult of “cadres” means above all a cult of bureaucracy, of
officialdom, an aristocracy of technique. In the matter of playing up
and developing cadres, as in other matters, the soviet regime still
finds itself compelled to solve problems which the advanced bourgeoisie
solved long ago in its own countries. But since the soviet cadres come
forward under a socialist banner, they demand an almost divine
veneration and a continually rising salary. The development of
“socialist” cadres is thus accompanied by a rebirth of bourgeois
inequality.

From the point of view of property in the means of production, the
differences between a marshal and a servant girl, the head of a trust
and a day laborer, the son of a people’s commissar and a homeless child,
seem not to exist at all. Nevertheless, the former occupy lordly
apartments, enjoy several summer homes in various parts of the country,
have the best automobiles at their disposal, and have long ago forgotten
how to shine their own shoes. The latter live in wooden barracks often
without partitions, lead a half-hungry existence, and do not shine their
own shoes only because they go barefoot. To the bureaucrat this
difference does not seem worthy of attention. To the day laborer,
however, it seems, not without reason, very essential.

Superficial “theoreticians” can comfort themselves, of course, that the
distribution of wealth is a factor secondary to its production. The
dialectic of interaction, however, retains here all its force. The
destiny of the state-appropriated means of production will be decided in
the long run according as these differences in personal existence evolve
in one direction or the other. If a ship is declared collective
property, but the passengers continue to be divided into first, second
and third class, it is clear that, for the third-class passengers,
differences in the conditions of life will have infinitely more
importance than that juridical change in proprietorship. The first-class
passengers, on the other hand, will propound, together with their coffee
and cigars, the thought that collective ownership is everything and a
comfortable cabin nothing at all. Antagonisms growing out of this may
well explode the unstable collective.

The Soviet press relates with satisfaction how a little boy in the
Moscow zoo, receiving to his question, “Whose is that elephant?” the
answer: “The state’s”, made the immediate inference: “That means it’s a
little bit mine too.” However, if the elephant were actually divided,
the precious tusks would fall to the chosen, a few would regale
themselves with elephantine hams, and the majority would get along with
hooves and guts. The boys who are done out of their share hardly
identify the state property with their own. The homeless consider
“theirs” only that which they steal from the state. The little
“socialist” in the zoological garden was probably the son of some
eminent official accustomed to draw inferences from the formula:
“_L’etat – c’est moi._”

If we translate socialist relations, for illustration, into the language
of the market, we may represent the citizen as a stockholder in a
company which owns the wealth of the country. If the property belonged
to all the people, that would presume an equal distribution of “shares”,
and consequently a right to the same dividend for all “shareholders.”
The citizens participate in the national enterprise, however, not only
as “shareholders”, but also as producers. On the lower stage of
communism, which we have agreed to call socialism, payments for labour
are still made according to bourgeois norms – that is, in dependence
upon skill, intensity, etc. The theoretical income of each citizen is
thus composed of two parts, _a_ + _b_ – that is, dividend + wages. The
higher the technique and the more complete the organisation of industry,
the greater is the place occupied by _a_ as against _b_, and the less is
the influence of individual differences of labour upon standard of
living. From the fact that wage differences in the Soviet Union are not
less, but greater than in capitalist countries, it must be inferred that
the shares of the Soviet citizen are not equally distributed, and that
in his income the dividend as well as the wage payment is unequal.
Whereas the unskilled laborer receives only _b_, the minimum payment
which under similar conditions he would receive in a capitalist
enterprise, the Stakhanovist or bureaucrat receives 2_a_ + _b_, or
3_a_ + _b_, etc., while _b_ also in its turn may become 2_b_, 3_b_, etc.
The differences in income are determined, in other words, not only by
differences of individual productiveness, but also by a masked
appropriation of the products of the labour of others. The privileged
minority of shareholders is living at the expense of the deprived
majority.

If you assume that the Soviet unskilled worker receives more than he
would under a similar level of technique and culture in a capitalist
enterprise – that is to say, that he is still a small shareholder – it
is necessary to consider his wages as equal to _a_ + _b_. The wages of
the higher categories would be expressed with the formula: 3_a_ + 2_b_,
10_a_ + 15_b_, etc. This means that the unskilled worker has one share,
the Stakhanovist three, the specialist ten. Moreover, their wages in the
proper sense are related as 1:2:15. Hymns to the sacred socialist
property sound under these conditions a good deal more convincing to the
manager or the Stakhanovist, than to the rank-and-file worker or
collective peasant. The rank-and-file workers, however, are the
overwhelming majority of society. It was they, and not the new
aristocracy, that socialism had in mind.

“The worker in our country is not a wage slave and is not the seller of
a commodity called labour power. He is a free workman.” (PRAVDA) For the
present period this unctuous formula is unpermissible bragging. The
transfer of the factories to the state changed the situation of the
worker only juridically. In reality, he is compelled to live in want and
work a definite number of hours for a definite wage. Those hopes which
the worker formerly had placed in the party and the trade unions, he
transferred after the revolution to the state created by him. But the
useful functioning of this implement turned out to be limited by the
level of technique and culture. In order to raise this level, the new
state resorted to the old methods of pressure upon the muscles and
nerves of the worker. There grew up a corps of slave drivers. The
management of industry became superbureaucratic. The workers lost all
influence whatever upon the management of the factory. With piecework
payment, hard conditions of material existence, lack of free movement,
with terrible police repression penetrating the life of every factory,
it is hard indeed for the worker to feel himself a “free workman.’’ In
the bureaucracy he sees the manager, in the state, the employer. Free
labour is incompatible with the existence of a bureaucratic state.

With the necessary changes, what has been said above relates also to the
country. According to the official theory, collective farm property is a
special form of socialist property. PRAVDA writes that the collective
farms “are in essence already of the same type as the state enterprises
and are consequently socialistic,” but immediately adds that the
guarantee of the socialist development of agriculture lies in the
circumstance that “the Bolshevik Party administers the collective
farms.” PRAVDA refers us, that is, from economics to politics. This
means in essence that socialist relations are not as yet embodied in the
real relations among men, but dwell in the benevolent heart of the
authorities. The workers will do very well if they keep a watchful eye
on that heart. In reality the collective farms stand halfway between
individual and state economy, and the petty bourgeois tendencies within
them are admirably helped along by the swiftly growing private
allotments or personal economies conducted by their members.

Notwithstanding the fact that individual tilled land amounts to only
four million hectares, as against one hundred and eight million
collective hectares – that is, less than 4 per cent – thanks to the
intensive and especially the truck-garden cultivation of this land, it
furnishes the peasant family with the most important objects of
consumption. The main body of horned cattle, sheep and pigs is the
property of the collective farmers, and not of the collectives. The
peasants often convert their subsidiary farms into the essential ones,
letting the unprofitable collectives take second place. On the other
hand, those collectives which pay highly for the working day are rising
to a higher social level and creating a category of well-to-do farmers.
The centrifugal tendencies are not yet dying, but on the contrary are
growing stronger. In any case, the collectives have succeeded so far in
transforming only the juridical forms of economic relations in the
country – in particular the methods of distributing income but they have
left almost without change the old hut and vegetable garden, the
barnyard chores, the whole rhythm of heavy _muzhik_ labour. To a
considerable degree they have left also the old attitude to the state.
The state no longer, to be sure, serves the landlords or the
bourgeoisie, but it takes away too much from the villages for the
benefit of the cities, and it retains too many greedy bureaucrats.

For the census to be taken on January 6, 1937, the following list of
social categories has been drawn up: worker; clerical worker; collective
farmer; individual farmer; individual craftsman; member of the liberal
professions; minister of religion; other non-laboring elements.
According to the official commentary, this census list fails to include
any other social characteristics only because there are no classes in
the Soviet Union. In reality the list is constructed with the direct
intention of concealing the privileged upper strata, and the more
deprived lower depths. The real divisions of Soviet society, which
should and might easily be revealed with the help of an honest census,
are as follows: heads of the bureaucracy, specialists, etc., living in
bourgeois conditions; medium and lower strata, on the level of the petty
bourgeoisie; worker and collective farm aristocracy – approximately on
the same level; medium working mass; medium, stratum of collective
farmers; individual peasants and craftsmen; lower worker and peasant
strata passing over into the _lumpenproletariat_; homeless children,
prostitutes, etc.

When the new constitution announces that in the Soviet Union “abolition
of the exploitation of man by man” has been attained, it is not telling
the truth. The new social differentiation has created conditions for the
revival of the exploitation of man in its most barbarous form – that of
buying him into slavery for personal service. In the lists for the new
census personal servants are not mentioned at all. They are, evidently,
to be dissolved in the general group of “workers.” There are, however,
plenty of questions about this: Does the socialist citizen have
servants, and just how many (maid, cook, nurse, governess, chauffeur)?
Does he have an automobile at his personal disposal? How many rooms does
he occupy? etc. Not a word in these lists about the scale of earnings!
If the rule were revived that exploitation of the labour of others
deprives one of political rights, it would turn out, somewhat
unexpectedly, that the cream of the ruling group are outside the bounds
of the Soviet constitution. Fortunately, they have established a
complete equality of rights ... for servant and master! Two opposite
tendencies are growing up out of the depth of the Soviet regime. To the
extent that, in contrast to a decaying capitalism, it develops the
productive forces, it is preparing the economic basis of socialism. To
the extent that, for the benefit of an upper stratum, it carries to more
and more extreme expression bourgeois norms of distribution, it is
preparing a capitalist restoration. This contrast between forms of
property and norms of distribution cannot grow indefinitely. Either the
bourgeois norm must in one form or another spread to the means of
production, or the norms of distribution must be brought into
correspondence with the socialist property system.

The bureaucracy dreads the exposure of this alternative. Everywhere and
all the time in the press, in speeches, in statistics, in the novels of
its litterateurs, in the verses of its poets, and, finally, in the text
of the new constitution – it painstakingly conceals the real relations
both in town and country with abstractions from the socialist
dictionary. That is why the official ideology is all so lifeless,
talentless and false.
 

1. State Capitalism

We often seek salvation from unfamiliar phenomena in familiar terms. An
attempt has been made to conceal the enigma of the Soviet regime by
calling it “state capitalism.” This term has the advantage that nobody
knows exactly what it means. The term “state capitalism” originally
arose to designate all the phenomena which arise when a bourgeois state
takes direct charge of the means of transport or of industrial
enterprises. The very necessity of such measures is one of the signs
that the productive forces have outgrown capitalism and are bringing it
to a partial self-negation in practice. But the outworn system, along
with its elements of self-negation, continues to exist as a capitalist
system.

Theoretically, to be sure, it is possible to conceive a situation in
which the bourgeoisie as a whole constitutes itself a stock company
which, by means of its state, administers the whole national economy.
The economic laws of such a regime would present no mysteries. A single
capitalist, as is well known, receives in the form of profit, not that
part of the surplus value which is directly created by the workers of
his own enterprise, but a share of the combined surplus value created
throughout the country proportionate to the amount of his own capital.
Under an integral “state capitalism”, this law of the equal rate of
profit would be realised, not by devious routes – that is, competition
among different capitals – but immediately and directly through state
bookkeeping. Such a regime never existed, however, and, because of
profound contradictions among the proprietors themselves, never will
exist – the more so since, in its quality of universal repository of
capitalist property, the state would be too tempting an object for
social revolution.

During the war, and especially during the experiments in fascist
economy, the term “state capitalism” has oftenest been understood to
mean a system of state interference and regulation. The French employ a
much more suitable term for this _etatism_. There are undoubtedly points
of contact between state capitalism and “state-ism”, but taken as
systems they are opposite rather than identical. State capitalism means
the substitution of state property for private property, and for that
very reason remains partial in character. State-ism, no matter where in
Italy, Mussolini, in Germany, Hitler, in America, Roosevelt, or in
France, Leon Blum – means state intervention on the basis of private
property, and with the goal of preserving it. Whatever be the programs
of the government, stateism inevitably leads to a transfer of the
damages of the decaying system from strong shoulders to weak. It
“rescues” the small proprietor from complete ruin only to the extent
that his existence is necessary for the preservation of big property.
The planned measures of stateism are dictated not by the demands of a
development of the productive forces, but by a concern for the
preservation of private property at the expense of the productive
forces, which are in revolt against it. State-ism means applying brakes
to the development of technique, supporting unviable enterprises,
perpetuating parasitic social strata. In a word, state-ism is completely
reactionary in character.

The words of Mussolini: “Three-fourths of Italian economy, industrial
and agricultural, is in the hands of the state” (May 26, 1934), are not
to be taken literally. The fascist state is not an owner of enterprises,
but only an intermediary between their owners. These two things are not
identical. POPOLO D’ITALIA says on this subject: “The corporative state
directs and integrates the economy, but does not run it (‘_dirige e
porta alla unita l’economia, ma non fa l’economia, non gestisce_’),
which, with a monopoly of production, would be nothing but
collectivism.” (June 11, 1936) Toward the peasants and small proprietors
in general, the fascist bureaucracy takes the attitude of a threatening
lord and master. Toward the capitalist magnates, that of a first
plenipotentiury. “The corporative state,” correctly writes the Italian
Marxist, Feroci, “is nothing but the sales clerk of monopoly capital ...
Mussolini takes upon the state the whole risk of the enterprises,
leaving to the industrialists the profits of exploitation.” And Hitler
in this respect follows in the steps of Mussolini. The limits of the
planning principle, as well as its real content, are determined by the
class dependence of the fascist state. It is not a question of
increasing the power of man over nature in the interests of society, but
of exploiting society in the interests of the few. “If I desired,”
boasts Mussolini, “to establish in Italy – which really has not happened
– state capitalism or state socialism, I should possess today all the
necessary and adequate objective conditions.” All except one: _the
expropriation of the class of capitalists_. In order to realize this
condition, fascism would have to go over to the other side of the
barricades – “which really has not happened” to quote the hasty
assurance of Mussolini, and, of course, will not happen. To expropriate
the capitalists would require other forces, other cadres and other
leaders.

The first concentration of the means of production in the hands of the
state to occur in history was achieved by the proletariat with the
method of social revolution, and not by capitalists with the method of
state trustification. Our brief analysis is sufficient to show how
absurd are the attempts to identify capitalist state-ism with the Soviet
system. The former is reactionary, the latter progressive.
 

2. Is the Bureaucracy a Ruling Class?

Classes are characterized by their position in the social system of
economy, and primarily by their relation to the means of production. In
civilized societies, property relations are validated by laws. The
nationalization of the land, the means of industrial production,
transport and exchange, together with the monopoly of foreign trade,
constitute the basis of the Soviet social structure. Through these
relations, established by the proletarian revolution, the nature of the
Soviet Union as a proletarian state is for us basically defined.

In its intermediary and regulating function, its concern to maintain
social ranks, and its exploitation of the state apparatus for personal
goals, the Soviet bureaucracy is similar to every other bureaucracy,
especially the fascist. But it is also in a vast way different. In no
other regime has a bureaucracy ever achieved such a degree of
independence from the dominating class. In bourgeois society, the
bureaucracy represents the interests of a possessing and educated class,
which has at its disposal innumerable means of everyday control over its
administration of affairs. The Soviet bureaucracy has risen above a
class which is hardly emerging from destitution and darkness, and has no
tradition of dominion or command. Whereas the fascists, when they find
themselves in power, are united with the big bourgeoisie by bonds of
common interest, friendship, marriage, etc., the Soviet bureaucracy
takes on bourgeois customs without having beside it a national
bourgeoisie. In this sense we cannot deny that it is something more than
a bureaucracy. It is in the full sense of the word the sole privileged
and commanding stratum in the Soviet society.

Another difference is no less important. The Soviet bureaucracy has
expropriated the proletariat politically in order by methods of its own
to defend the social conquests. But the very fact of its appropriation
of political power in a country where the principal means of production
are in the hands of the state, creates a new and hitherto unknown
relation between the bureaucracy and the riches of the nation. The means
of production belong to the state. But the state, so to speak, “belongs”
to the bureaucracy. If these as yet wholly new relations should
solidify, become the norm and be legalized, whether with or without
resistance from the workers, they would, in the long run, lead to a
complete liquidation of the social conquests of the proletarian
revolution. But to speak of that now is at least premature. The
proletariat has not yet said its last word. The bureaucracy has not yet
created social supports for its dominion in the form of special types of
property. It is compelled to defend state property as the source of its
power and its income. In this aspect of its activity it still remains a
weapon of proletarian dictatorship.

The attempt to represent the Soviet bureaucracy as a class of “state
capitalists” will obviously not withstand criticism. The bureaucracy has
neither stocks nor bonds. It is recruited, supplemented and renewed in
the manner of an administrative hierarchy, independently of any special
property relations of its own. The individual bureaucrat cannot transmit
to his heirs his rights in the exploitation of the state apparatus. The
bureaucracy enjoys its privileges under the form of an abuse of power It
conceals its income; it pretends that as a special social group it does
not even exist. Its appropriation of a vast share of the national income
has the character of social parasitism. All this makes the position of
the commanding Soviet stratum in the highest degree contradictory,
equivocal and undignified, notwithstanding the completeness of its power
and the smoke screen of flattery that conceals it.

Bourgeois society has in the course of its history displaced many
political regimes and bureaucratic castes, without changing its social
foundations. It has preserved itself against the restoration of feudal
and guild relations by the superiority of its productive methods. The
state power has been able either to co-operate with capitalist
development, or put brakes on it. But in general the productive forces,
upon a basis of private property and competition, have been working out
their own destiny. In contrast to this, the property relations which
issued from the socialist revolution are indivisibly bound up with the
new state as their repository. The predominance of socialist over petty
bourgeois tendencies is guaranteed, not by the automatism of the economy
– we are still far from that – but by political measures taken by the
dictatorship. The character of the economy as a whole thus depends upon
the character of the state power.

A collapse of the Soviet regime would lead inevitably to the collapse of
the planned economy, and thus to the abolition of state property. The
bond of compulsion between the trusts and the factories within them
would fall away. The more successful enterprises would succeed in coming
out on the road of independence. They might convert or they might find
some themselves into stock companies, other transitional form of
property – one, for example, in which the workers should participate in
the profits. The collective farms would disintegrate at the same time,
and far more easily. The fall of the present bureaucratic dictatorship,
if it were not replaced by a new socialist power, would thus mean a
return to capitalist relations with a catastrophic decline of industry
and culture.

But if a socialist government is still absolutely necessary for the
preservation and development of the planned economy, the question is all
the more important, upon whom the present Soviet government relies, and
in what measure the socialist character of its policy is guaranteed. At
the 11th Party Congress in March 1922, Lenin, in practically bidding
farewell to the party, addressed these words to the commanding group:
“History knows transformations of all sorts. To rely upon conviction,
devotion and other excellent spiritual qualities – that is not to be
taken seriously in politics.” Being determines consciousness. During the
last fifteen years, the government has changed its social composition
even more deeply than its ideas. Since of all the strata of Soviet
society the bureaucracy has best solved its own social problem, and is
fully content with the existing situation, it has ceased to offer any
subjective guarantee whatever of the socialist direction of its policy.
It continues to preserve state property only to the extent that it fears
the proletariat. This saving fear is nourished and supported by the
illegal party of Bolshevik-Leninists, which is the most conscious
expression of the socialist tendencies opposing that bourgeois reaction
with which the Thermidorian bureaucracy is completely saturated. As a
conscious political force the bureaucracy has betrayed the revolution.
But a victorious revolution is fortunately not only a program and a
banner, not only political institutions, but also a system of social
relations. To betray it is not enough. You have to overthrow it. The
October revolution has been betrayed by the ruling stratum, but not yet
overthrown. It has a great power of resistance, coinciding with the
established property relations, with the living force of the
proletariat, the consciousness of its best elements, the impasse of
world capitalism, and the inevitability of world revolution.
 

3. The Question of the Character of the Soviet Union Not Yet Decided by History

In order better to understand the character of the present Soviet Union,
let us make two different hypotheses about its future. Let us assume
first that the Soviet bureaucracy is overthrown by a revolutionary party
having all the attributes of the old Bolshevism, enriched moreover by
the world experience of the recent period. Such a party would begin with
the restoration of democracy in the trade unions and the Soviets. It
would be able to, and would have to, restore freedom of Soviet parties.
Together with the masses, and at their head, it would carry out a
ruthless purgation of the state apparatus. It would abolish ranks and
decorations, all kinds of privileges, and would limit inequality in the
payment of labour to the life necessities of the economy and the state
apparatus. It would give the youth free opportunity to think
independently, learn, criticize and grow. It would introduce profound
changes in the distribution of the national income in correspondence
with the interests and will of the worker and peasant masses. But so far
as concerns property relations, the new power would not have to resort
to revolutionary measures. It would retain and further develop the
experiment of planned economy. After the political revolution – that is,
the deposing of the bureaucracy – the proletariat would have to
introduce in the economy a series of very important reforms, but not
another social revolution.

If – to adopt a second hypothesis – a bourgeois party were to overthrow
the ruling Soviet caste, it would find no small number of ready servants
among the present bureaucrats, administrators, technicians, directors,
party secretaries and privileged upper circles in general. A purgation
of the state apparatus would, of course, be necessary in this case too.
But a bourgeois restoration would probably have to clean out fewer
people than a revolutionary party. The chief task of the new power would
be to restore private property in the means of production. First of all,
it would be necessary to create conditions for the development of strong
farmers from the weak collective farms, and for converting the strong
collectives into producers’ cooperatives of the bourgeois type into
agricultural stock companies. In the sphere of industry,
denationalization would begin with the light industries and those
producing food. The planning principle would be converted for the
transitional period into a series of compromises between state power and
individual “corporations” – potential proprietors, that is, among the
Soviet captains of industry, the émigré former proprietors and foreign
capitalists. Notwithstanding that the Soviet bureaucracy has gone far
toward preparing a bourgeois restoration, the new regime would have to
introduce in the matter of forms of property and methods of industry not
a reform, but a social revolution.

Let us assume to take a third variant – that neither a revolutionary nor
a counterrevolutionary party seizes power. The bureaucracy continues at
the head of the state. Even under these conditions social relations will
not jell. We cannot count upon the bureaucracy’s peacefully and
voluntarily renouncing itself in behalf of socialist equality. If at the
present time, notwithstanding the too obvious inconveniences of such an
operation, it has considered it possible to introduce ranks and
decorations, it must inevitably in future stages seek supports for
itself in property relations. One may argue that the big bureaucrat
cares little what are the prevailing forms of property, provided only
they guarantee him the necessary income. This argument ignores not only
the instability of the bureaucrat’s own rights, but also the question of
his descendants. The new cult of the family has not fallen out of the
clouds. Privileges have only half their worth, if they cannot be
transmitted to one’s children. But the right of testament is inseparable
from the right of property. It is not enough to be the director of a
trust; it is necessary to be a stockholder. The victory of the
bureaucracy in this decisive sphere would mean its conversion into a new
possessing class. On the other hand, the victory of the proletariat over
the bureaucracy would insure a revival of the socialist revolution. The
third variant consequently brings us back to the two first, with which,
in the interests of clarity and simplicity, we set out.

* * *

To define the Soviet regime as transitional, or intermediate, means to
abandon such finished social categories as _capitalism_ (and therewith
“state capitalism”) and also _socialism._ But besides being completely
inadequate in itself, such a definition is capable of producing the
mistaken idea that from the present Soviet regime only a transition to
socialism is possible. In reality a backslide to capitalism is wholly
possible. A more complete definition will of necessity be complicated
and ponderous.

The Soviet Union is a contradictory society halfway between capitalism
and socialism, in which: (a) the productive forces are still far from
adequate to give the state property a socialist character; (b) the
tendency toward primitive accumulation created by want breaks out
through innumerable pores of the planned economy; (c) norms of
distribution preserving a bourgeois character lie at the basis of a new
differentiation of society; (d) the economic growth, while slowly
bettering the situation of the toilers, promotes a swift formation of
privileged strata; (e) exploiting the social antagonisms, a bureaucracy
has converted itself into an uncontrolled caste alien to socialism; (f)
the social revolution, betrayed by the ruling party, still exists in
property relations and in the consciousness of the toiling masses; (g) a
further development of the accumulating contradictions can as well lead
to socialism as back to capitalism; (h) on the road to capitalism the
counterrevolution would have to break the resistance of the workers; (i)
on the road to socialism the workers would have to overthrow the
bureaucracy. In the last analysis, the question will be decided by a
struggle of living social forces, both on the national and the world
arena.

Doctrinaires will doubtless not be satisfied with this hypothetical
definition. They would like categorical formulae: yes – yes, and no –
no. Sociological problems would certainly be simpler, if social
phenomena had always a finished character. There is nothing more
dangerous, however, than to throw out of reality, for the sake of
logical completeness, elements which today violate your scheme and
tomorrow may wholly overturn it. In our analysis, we have above all
avoided doing violence to dynamic social formations which have had no
precedent and have no analogies. The scientific task, as well as the
political, is not to give a finished definition to an unfinished
process, but to follow all its stages, separate its progressive from its
reactionary tendencies, expose their mutual relations, foresee possible
variants of development, and find in this foresight a basis for action.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 10 THE SOVIET UNION IN THE MIRROR OF THE NEW CONSTITUTION


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Work “according to ability” and personal property

On the 11th of June, 1936, the Central Executive Committee approved the
draft of a new Soviet Constitution which, according to Stalin’s
declaration, repeated daily by the whole press, will be “the most
democratic in the world.” To be sure, the manner in which the
constitution was drawn up is enough to cause doubts as to this. Neither
in the press nor at any meetings was a word ever spoken about this great
reform. Moreover, as early as March 1, 1936, Stalin declared to the
American interviewer, Roy Howard: “We will doubtless adopt our new
constitution at the end of this year.” Thus Stalin knew with complete
accuracy just when this new constitution, about which the people at that
moment knew nothing at all, would be adopted. It is impossible not to
conclude that “the most democratic constitution in the world” was worked
out and introduced in a not quite perfectly democratic manner. To be
sure, in June the draft was submitted to the “consideration” of the
people of the Soviet Union. It would be vain, however, to seek in this
whole sixth part of the globe one Communist who would dare to criticize
a creation of the Central Committee, or one non-party citizen who would
reject a proposal from the ruling party. The discussion reduced itself
to sending resolutions of gratitude to Stalin for the “happy life.” The
content and style of these greetings had been thoroughly worked out
under the old constitution.

The first section, entitled _Social Structure_, concludes with these
words: “In the Soviet Union, the principle of socialism is realised:
_From each according to his abilities to each according to his work._”
This inwardly contradictory, not to say nonsensical, formula has
entered, believe it or not, from speeches and journalistic articles into
the carefully deliberated text of the fundamental state law. It bears
witness not only to a complete lowering of theoretical level in the
lawgivers, but also to the lie with which, as a mirror of the ruling
stratum, the new constitution is imbued. It is not difficult to guess
the origin of the new “principle.” To characterize the Communist
society, Marx employed the famous formula: “From each according to his
abilities, to each according to his needs.” The two parts of this
formula are inseparable. “From each according to his abilities,” in the
Communist, not the capitalist, sense, means: Work has now ceased to be
an obligation, and has become an individual need; society has no further
use for any compulsion. Only sick and abnormal persons will refuse to
work. Working “according to their ability” – that is, in accord with
their physical and psychic powers, without any violence to themselves –
the members of the commune will, thanks to a high technique,
sufficiently fill up the stores of society so that society can
generously endow each and all “according to their needs,” without
humiliating control. This two-sided but indivisible formula of communism
thus assumes abundance, equality, an all-sided development of
personality, and a high cultural discipline.

The Soviet state in all its relations is far closer to a backward
capitalism than to communism. It cannot yet even think of endowing each
“according to his needs.” But for this very reason it cannot permit its
citizens to work “according to their abilities.” It finds itself obliged
to keep in force the system of piecework payment, the principle of which
may be expressed thus: “Get out of everybody as much as you can, and
give him in exchange as little as possible.” To be sure, nobody in the
Soviet Union works above his “abilities” in the absolute sense of the
word – that is, above his physical and psychic potential. But this is
true also of capitalism. The most brutal as well as the most refined
methods of exploitation run into limits set by nature. Even a mule under
the whip works “according to his ability,” but from that it does not
follow that the whip is a social principle for mules. Wage labour does
not cease even under the Soviet regime to wear the humiliating label of
slavery. Payment “according to work” – in reality, payment to the
advantage of “intellectual” at the expense of physical, and especially
unskilled, work – is a source of injustice, oppression and compulsions
for the majority, privileges and a “happy life” for the few.

Instead of frankly acknowledging that bourgeois norms of labour and
distribution still prevail in the Soviet Union, the authors of the
constitution have cut this integral Communist principle in two halves,
postponed the second half to an indefinite future, declared the first
half already realised, mechanically hitched on to it the capitalist norm
of piecework payment, named the whole thing “principle of Socialism,”
and upon this falsification erected the structure of their constitution!

Of greatest practical significance in the economic sphere is undoubtedly
Article X, which in contrast to most of the articles has quite clearly
the task of guaranteeing, against invasion from the bureaucracy itself,
the personal property of the citizens in their articles of domestic
economy, consumption, comfort and daily life. With the exception of
“domestic economy”, property of this kind, purged of the psychology of
greed and envy which clings to it, will not only be preserved under
communism but will receive an unheard of development. It is subject to
doubt, to be sure, whether a man of high culture would want to burden
himself with a rubbish of luxuries. But he would not renounce any one of
the conquests of comfort. The first task of communism is to guarantee
the comforts of life to all. In the Soviet Union, however, the question
of personal property still wears a petty bourgeois and not a communist
aspect. The personal property of the peasants and the not well-off city
people is the target of outrageous arbitrary acts on the part of the
bureaucracy, which on its lower steps frequently assures by such means
its own relative comfort. A growth of the prosperity of the country now
makes it possible to renounce these seizures of personal property, and
even impels the government to protect personal accumulations as a
stimulus to increase the productivity of labour. At the same time – and
this is of no small importance a protection by law of the hut, cow and
home-furnishings of the peasant, worker or clerical worker, also
legalizes the town house of the bureaucrat, his summer home, his
automobile and all the other “objects of personal consumption and
comfort,” appropriated by him on the basis of the “socialist” principle:
“From each according to his abilities, to each according to his work.”
The bureaucrat’s automobile will certainly be protected by the new
fundamental law more effectively than the peasant’s wagon.
 

2. The Soviets and Democracy

In the political sphere, the distinction of the new constitution from
the old is its return from the Soviet system of election according to
class and industrial groups, to the system of bourgeois democracy based
upon the so-called “universal, equal and direct” vote of an atomized
population. This is a matter, to put it briefly, of juridically
liquidating the dictatorship of the proletariat. Where there are no
capitalists, there is also no proletariat – say the creators of the new
constitution – and consequently the state itself from being proletarian
becomes national. This argument, with all its superficial lure, is
either nineteen years late or many years in advance of its time. In
expropriating the capitalists, the proletariat did actually enter upon
its own liquidation as a class. But from liquidation in principle to
actual dissolution in society is a road more prolonged, the longer the
new state is compelled to carry out the rudimentary work of capitalism.
The Soviet proletariat still exists as n class deeply distinct from the
peasantry, the technical intelligentsia and the bureaucracy – and
moreover as the sole class interested right up to the end in the victory
of socialism. The new constitution wants to dissolve this class in “the
nation” politically, long before it is economically dissolved in
society.

To be sure, the reformers decided after some waverings to call the
state, as formerly, _Soviet_. But that is only a crude political ruse
dictated by the same considerations out of regard for which Napoleon’s
empire continued to be called a republic. Soviets in their essence arc
organs of class rule, and cannot be anything else. The democratically
elected institutions of local self-administration are municipalities,
_dumas_, _zemstvos_, anything you will, but not soviets. A general state
Legislative Assembly on the basis of democratic formulas is a belated
parliament (or rather its caricature), but by no means the highest organ
of the Soviets. In trying to cover themselves with the historic
authority of the Soviet system, the reformers merely show that the
fundamentally new administration which they are giving to the state life
dare not as yet come out under its own name.

Of itself, an equalization of the political rights of workers and
peasants might not destroy the social nature of the state, if the
influence of the proletariat upon the country were sufficiently
guaranteed by the general state of economy and culture. The development
of socialism certainly ought to proceed in that direction. But if the
proletariat, while remaining a minority of the population, is really
ceasing to need political ascendancy in order to guarantee a socialist
course of social life, that means that the very need of state compulsion
is reducing itself to nothing, giving place to cultural discipline.

The abolition of elective inequalities ought in that case to be preceded
by a distinct and evident weakening of the compulsive functions of the
state. Of this, however, there is not a word said either in the new
constitution or, what is more important, in life.

To be sure, the new charter “guarantees” to the citizens the so-called
“freedoms” of speech, press, assemblage and street processions. But each
of these guarantees has the form either of a heavy muzzle or of shackles
upon the hands and feet. Freedom of the press means a continuation of
the fierce advance-censorship whose chains are held by the Secretariat
of a Central Committee whom nobody has elected. Freedom of Byzantine
flattery is thus, of course, fully “guaranteed.” Meanwhile, the
innumerable articles, speeches, and letters of Lenin, ending in his
“testament”, will continue under the new constitution to be locked up
merely because they rub the new leaders the wrong way. That being the
case with Lenin, it is unnecessary to speak about other authors. The
crude and ignorant command of science, literature and art will be wholly
preserved. “Freedom of assemblage” will mean, as formerly, the
obligation of certain groups of the population to appear at meetings
summoned by the authorities for the adoption of resolutions prepared in
advance. Under the new constitution as under the old, hundreds of
foreign communists, trusting in the Soviet “right of asylum,” will
remain in prisons and concentration camps for crimes against the dogma
of infallibility. In the matter of “freedom”, everything will remain as
of old. Even the Soviet press does not try to sow any illusions about
that. On the contrary, the chief goal of the new constitutional reform
is declared to be a “further reinforcement of the dictatorship.” Whose
dictatorship, and over whom?

As we have already heard, the ground for political equality was prepared
by the abolition of class contradictions. It is no longer to be a class
but a “people’s” dictatorship. But when the bearer of dictatorship
becomes the people, freed from class contradictions, that can only mean
the dissolution of the dictatorship in a socialist society – and, above
all, the liquidation of the bureaucracy. Thus teaches the Marxian
doctrine. Perhaps it has been mistaken? But the very authors of the
constitution refer, although very cautiously, to the program of the
party written by Lenin. Here is what the program really says: “...
Deprivation of political rights, and all other limitations of freedom
whatsoever, are necessary exclusively in the form of temporary measures
... In proportion as the objective possibility of the exploitation of
man by man disappears, the necessity of these temporary measures will
also disappear.” Abandonment of the “deprivation of political rights” is
thus inseparably bound up with the abolition of “all limitations of
freedom whatsoever.” The arrival at a socialist society is characterized
not only by the fact that the peasants are put on an equality with the
workers, and that political rights are restored to the small percentage
of citizens of bourgeois origin, but above all by the fact that real
freedom is established for the whole 100 per cent of the population.
With the liquidation of classes, not only the bureaucracy dies away, and
not only the dictatorship, but the state itself. Let some imprudent
person, however, try to utter even a hint in this direction: the GPU
will find adequate grounds in the new constitution to send him to one of
the innumerable concentration camps. Classes are abolished. Of Soviets
there remains only the name. But the bureaucracy is still there. The
equality of the rights of workers and peasants means, in reality, an
equal lack of rights before the bureaucracy.

No less significant is the introduction of the secret ballot. If you
take it on faith that the new political equality corresponds to an
achieved social equality, then there remains a puzzling question: In
that case why must voting henceforth be protected by secrecy? Whom
exactly does the population of a socialist country fear, and from whose
attempts must it be defended? The old Soviet constitution saw in open
voting, as in the limitation of elective rights, a weapon of the
revolutionary class against bourgeois and petty bourgeois enemies. We
cannot assume that now the secret ballot is being introduced for the
convenience of a counterrevolutionary minority. It is a question,
evidently, of defending the rights of the people. But who is feared by a
socialist people which has recently thrown off a tzar, a nobility and a
bourgeoisie? The sycophants do not even give a thought to this question.
Yet there is more in it than in all the writings of the Barbusses, the
Louis Fischers, the Durantys, the Webbs, and the like of them.

In a capitalist society, the secret ballot is meant to defend the
exploited from the terror of the exploiters. If the bourgeoisie finally
adopted such a reform, obviously under pressure from the masses, it was
only because it became interested in protecting its state at least
partially from the demoralization introduced by itself. But in a
socialist society there can be, it would seem, no terror of the
exploiters. From whom is it necessary to defend the Soviet citizens? The
answer is clear: from the bureaucracy. Stalin was frank enough to
recognize this. To the question: Why are secret elections necessary? he
answered verbatim: “Because _we_ intend to give the Soviet people full
freedom to vote for those whom they want to elect.” Thus humanity learns
from an authoritative source that today the “Soviet people” cannot yet
vote for those whom they want to elect. It would be hasty to conclude
from this that the new constitution will really tender them this
opportunity in the future. Just now, however, we are occupied with
another side of this problem. Who, exactly, is this “we” who can give or
not give the people a free ballot? It is that same bureaucracy in whose
name Stalin speaks and acts. This exposure of his applies to the ruling
party exactly as it does to the state, for Stalin himself occupies the
post of General Secretary of the Party with the help of a system which
does not permit the members to elect those whom they want. The words
“_we_ intend to give the Soviet people” freedom of voting are
incomparably more important than the old and new constitution taken
together, for in this incautious phrase lies the actual constitution of
the Soviet Union as it has been drawn up, not upon paper, but in the
struggle of living forces.
 

3. Democracy and the Party

The promise to give the Soviet people freedom to vote “for those whom
they want to elect” is rather a poetic figure than a political formula.
The Soviet people will have the right to choose their “representatives”
only from among candidates whom the central and local leaders present to
them under the flag of the party. To be sure, during the first period of
the Soviet era the Bolshevik party also exercised a monopoly. But to
identify these two phenomena would be to take appearance for reality.
The prohibition of opposition parties was a temporary measure dictated
by conditions of civil war, blockade, intervention and famine. The
ruling party, representing in that period a genuine organisation of the
proletarian vanguard, was living a full-blooded inner life. A struggle
of groups and factions to a certain degree replaced the struggle of
parties. At present, when socialism has conquered “finally and
irrevocably,” the formation of factions is punished with concentration
camp or firing squad. The prohibition of other parties, from being a
temporary evil, has been erected into a principle. The right to occupy
themselves with political questions has even been withdrawn from the
Communist Youth, and that at the very moment of publication of the new
constitution. Moreover, the citizens and citizenesses enjoy the
franchise from the age of 18, but the age limit for Communist Youth
existing until 1986 (23 years) is now wholly abolished. Politics is thus
once for all declared the monopoly of an uncontrolled bureaucracy.

To a question from an American interviewer as to the role of the party
in the new constitution, Stalin answered: “Once there are no classes,
once the barriers between classes are disappearing [‘there are no
classes, the barriers between classes – which are not! – are
disappearing’ – _L.T._], there remains only something in the nature of a
not at all fundamental difference between various little strata of the
socialist society. There can be no nourishing soil for the creation of
parties struggling among themselves. Where there are not several
classes, there cannot be several parties, for a party is part of a
class.” Every word is a mistake and some of them two! It appears from
this that classes are homogeneous; that the boundaries of classes are
outlined sharply and once for all; that the consciousness of a class
strictly corresponds to its place in society. The Marxist teaching of
the class nature of the party is thus turned into a caricature. The
dynamic of political consciousness is excluded from the historical
process in the interests of administrative order. In reality classes are
heterogeneous; they are torn by inner antagonisms, and arrive at the
solution of common problems no otherwise than through an inner struggle
of tendencies, groups and parties. It is possible, with certain
qualifications, to concede that “a party is part of a class.” But since
a class has many “parts” – some look forward and some back – one and the
same class may create several parties. For the same reason one party may
rest upon parts of different classes. An example of only one party
corresponding to one class is not to be found in the whole course of
political history – provided, of course, you do not take the police
appearance for the reality.

In its social structure, the proletariat is the least heterogeneous
class of capitalist society. Nevertheless, the presence of such “little
strata” as the workers’ aristocracy and the workers’ bureaucracy is
sufficient to give rise to opportunistic parties, which are converted by
the course of things into one of the weapons of bourgeois domination.
Whether from the standpoint of Stalinist sociology, the difference
between the workers’ aristocracy and the proletarian mass is
“fundamental” or only “something in the nature of” matters not at all.
It is from this difference that the necessity arose in its time for
breaking with the Social Democracy and creating the Third International.

Even if in the Soviet society “there are no classes,” nevertheless this
society is at least incomparably more heterogeneous and complicated than
the proletariat of capitalist countries, and consequently can furnish
adequate nourishing soil for several parties. In making this imprudent
excursion into the field of theory, Stalin proved a good deal more than
he wanted to. From his reasonings it follows not only that there can be
no _different_ parties in the Soviet Union, but that there cannot even
be _one_ party. For where there are no classes, there is in general no
place for politics. Nevertheless, from this law Stalin draws a
“sociological” conclusion in favor of the party of which he is the
General Secretary.

Bukharin tries to approach the problem from another side. In the Soviet
Union, he says, the question where to go – whether back to capitalism or
forward to socialism – is no longer subject to discussion. Therefore,
“partisans of the hostile liquidated classes organized in parties cannot
be permitted.” To say nothing of the fact that in a country of
triumphant socialism partisans of capitalism would be merely ludicrous
Don Quixotes incapable of creating a party, the existing political
differences are far from comprised in the alternative: to socialism or
to capitalism. There are other questions: How go toward socialism, with
what tempo, etc. The choice of the road is no less important than the
choice of the goal. Who is going to choose the road? If the nourishing
soil for political parties has really disappeared, then there is no
reason to forbid them. On the contrary, it is time, in accordance with
the party program, to abolish “all limitations of freedom whatsoever.”

In trying to dispel the natural doubts of his American interviewer,
Stalin advanced a new consideration: “Lists of nominees will be
presented not only by the Communist Party, but also by all kinds of
non-party social organisations. And we have hundreds of them ... Each
one of the little strata [of Soviet society] can have its special
interests and reflect [express?] them through the existing innumerable
social organisations.” This sophism is no better than the others. The
Soviet “social” organisations – trade union, co-operative, cultural,
etc. do not in the least represent the interests of different “little
strata”, for they all have one and the same hierarchical structure. Even
in those cases where they apparently represent mass organisations, as in
the trade unions and co-operatives, the active role in them is played
exclusively by representatives of the upper privileged groups, and the
last word remains with the “party” – that is, the bureaucracy. The
constitution merely refers the elector from Pontius to Pilate.

The mechanics of this are expressed with complete precision in the very
text of the fundamental law. Article 126, which is the axis of the
constitution as a political system, “guarantees the right” to all male
and female citizens to group themselves in trade unions, co-operatives,
youth, sport, defensive, cultural, technical and scientific
organisations. As to the party – that is, the concentration of power –
there it is not a question of the right of all, but of the privilege of
the minority. “... The most active and conscious [so considered, that
is, from above – _L.T._] citizens from the ranks of the working class
and other strata of the toiling masses, are united in the Communist
Party ... _which constitutes the guiding nucleus of all organisations,
both social and governmental_.” This astoundingly candid formula,
introduced into the text of the constitution itself, reveals the whole
fictitiousness of the political role of those “social organisations” –
subordinate branches of the bureaucratic firm.

But if there is not to be a struggle of parties, perhaps the different
factions within the one party can reveal themselves at these democratic
elections? To the question of a French journalist as to the groupings of
the ruling party, Molotov answered: “In the party ... attempts have been
made to create special factions ... but it is already several years
since the situation in this matter has fundamentally changed, and the
Communist Party is actually a unit.” This is proven best of all by the
continuous purgations and the concentration camps. After the commentary
of Molotov, the mechanics of democracy are completely clear. “What
remains of the October Revolution,” asks Victor Serge, “if every worker
who permits himself to make a demand, or express a critical judgment, is
subject to imprisonment? Oh, after that you can establish as many secret
ballots as you please!” It is true: even Hitler did not infringe upon
the secret ballot.

The reformers have dragged in theoretical arguments about the mutual
relations of classes and parties by the hair. It is not a question of
sociology, but of material interests. The ruling party which enjoys a
monopoly in the Soviet Union is the political machine of the
bureaucracy, which in reality has something to lose and nothing more to
gain. It wishes to preserve the “nourishing soil” for itself alone.

* * *

In a country where the lava of revolution has not yet cooled, privileges
burn those who possess them as a stolen gold watch burns an amateur
thief. The ruling Soviet stratum has learned to fear the masses with a
perfectly bourgeois fear. Stalin gives the growing special privileges of
the upper circles a “theoretical” justification with the help of the
Communist International, and defends the Soviet aristocracy from popular
discontent with the help of concentration camps. In order that this
mechanism should keep on working, Stalin is compelled from time to time
to take the side of “the people” against the bureaucracy – of course,
with its tacit consent. He finds it useful to resort to the secret
ballot in order at least partially to purge the state apparatus of the
corruptions which are devouring it.

As early as 1928, Rakovsky wrote, discussing a number of cases of
bureaucratic gangsterism which were coming to the surface: “The most
characteristic and most dangerous thing in this spreading wave of
scandals is the passiveness of the masses, the Communist masses even
more than the nonparty ... Owing to fear of those in power, or simply
owing to political indifference, they have passed these things by
without protest, or have limited themselves to mere grumbling.” During
the eight years which have passed since that time, the situation has
become incomparably worse. The decay of the political machine, exposing
itself at every step, has begun to threaten the very existence of the
state no longer now as an instrument for the socialist transformation of
society, but as a source of power, income and privileges to the ruling
stratum. Stalin was compelled to give a glimpse of this motive to the
reform. “We have not a few institutions,” he told Roy Howard, “which
work badly ... The secret ballot in the Soviet Union will be a whip in
the hands of the population against badly working organs of power.” A
remarkable confession! After the bureaucracy has created a socialist
society with its own hands, it feels the need ... of a whip! That is one
of the motives of the constitutional reform. There is another no less
important.

In abolishing the soviets, the new constitution dissolves the workers in
the general mass of the population. Politically the soviets, to be sure,
long ago lost their significance. But with the growth of new social
antagonisms and the awakening of a new generation, they might again come
to life. Most of all, of course, are to be feared the city soviets with
the increasing participation of fresh and demanding communist youth. In
the cities the contrast between luxury and want is too clear to the
eyes. The first concern of the Soviet aristocracy is to get rid of
worker and Red Army soviets. With the discontent of the scattered rural
population it is much easier to deal. The collectivised peasants can
even with some success be used against the city workers. This is not the
first time that a bureaucratic reaction has relied upon the country in
its struggle against the city.

Whatever in the new constitution is principled and significant, and
really elevates it high above the most democratic constitutions of
bourgeois countries, is merely a watered-down paraphrase of the
fundamental documents of the October revolution. Whatever has to do with
estimating the economic conquests, distorts reality with false
perspective and braggadocio. And finally whatever concerns freedom and
democracy is saturated through and through with the spirit of usurpation
and cynicism.

Representing, as it does, an immense step back from socialist to
bourgeois principles, the new constitution, cut and sewed to the measure
of the ruling group, follows the same historic course as the abandonment
of world revolution in favor of the League of Nations, the restoration
of the bourgeois family, the substitution of the standing army for the
militia, the resurrection of ranks and decorations, and the growth of
inequality. By juridically reinforcing the absolutism of an
“extra-class” bureaucracy, the new constitution creates the political
premises for the birth of a. new possessing class.

The Revolution Betrayed



CHAPTER 11 WHITHER THE SOVIET UNION?


------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Bonapartism as a regime of crisis

The question we previously raised in the name of the reader: “How could
the ruling clique, with its innumerable mistakes, concentrate unlimited
power in its hands?” – or, in other words: “How explain the
contradiction between the intellectual poverty of the Thermidorians and
their material might?” – now permits a more concrete and categorical
answer. The Soviet society is not harmonious. What is a sin for one
class or stratum is a virtue for another. From the point of view of
socialist forms of society, the policy of the bureaucracy is striking in
its contradictions and inconsistencies. But the same policy appears very
consistent from the standpoint of strengthening the power of the new
commanding stratum.

The state support of the _kulak_ (1923-28) contained a mortal danger for
the socialist future. But then, with the help of the petty bourgeoisie
the bureaucracy succeeded in binding the proletarian vanguard hand and
foot, and suppressing the Bolshevik Opposition. This “mistake” from the
point of view of socialism was a pure gain from the point of view of the
bureaucracy. When the _kulak_ began directly to threaten the bureaucracy
itself, it turned its weapons against the _kulak_. The panic of
aggression against the _kulak_, spreading also to the middle peasant,
was no less costly to the economy than a foreign invasion. But the
bureaucracy had defended its positions. Having barely succeeded in
exterminating its former ally, it began with all its power to develop a
new aristocracy. Thus undermining socialism? Of course but at the same
time strengthening the commanding caste. The Soviet bureaucracy is like
all ruling classes in that it is ready to shut its eyes to the crudest
mistakes of its leaders in the sphere of general politics, provided in
return they show an unconditional fidelity in the defence of its
privileges. The more alarmed becomes the mood of the new lords of the
situation, the higher the value they set upon ruthlessness against the
least threat to their so justly earned rights. It is from this point of
view that the caste of parvenus selects its leaders. Therein lies the
secret of Stalin’s success.

The growth of power and independence in a bureaucracy, however, is not
unlimited. There are historical factors stronger than marshals, and even
than general secretaries. A rationalization of economy is unthinkable
without accurate accounts. Accounts are irreconcilable with the caprices
of a bureaucracy. Concern for the restoration of a stable ruble, which
means a ruble independent of the “leaders”, is imposed upon the
bureaucracy by the fact that their autocratic rule is coming into
greater and greater contradiction with the development of the productive
forces of the country – just as absolute monarchy became in its time
irreconcilable with the development of the bourgeois market. Money
accounting, however, cannot fail to give a more open character to the
struggle of the different strata for the distribution of the national
income. The question of the wage-scale, almost a matter of indifference
during the epoch of the food-card system, is now decisive for the
workers, and with it the question of the trade unions. The designation
of trade union officials from above is destined to meet more and more
resistance. More than that, under piecework payment the worker is
directly interested in a correct ordering of the factory management. The
Stakhanovists are complaining more and more loudly of the faults of
organisation in production. Bureaucratic nepotism in the matter of
appointing directors, engineers, etc., is becoming more and more
intolerable. The co-operatives and the state trade are coming much more
than formerly into dependence upon the buyer. The collective farms and
the individual collective farmers are learning to translate their
dealings with the state into the language of figures. They are growing
unwilling to endure submissively the naming from above of leaders whose
sole merit is frequently their closeness to the local bureaucratic
clique. And, finally, the ruble promises to cast a light into that most
mysterious region: the legal and illegal incomes of the bureaucracy.
Thus, in a politically strangled country, money circulation becomes an
important lever for the mobilization of oppositional forces, and
foretells the beginning of the end of “enlightened” absolutism.

While the growth of industry and the bringing of agriculture into the
sphere of state planning vastly complicates the tasks of leadership,
bringing to the front the problem of quality, bureaucratism destroys the
creative initiative and the feeling of responsibility without which
there is not, and cannot be, qualitative progress. The ulcers of
bureaucratism are perhaps not so obvious in the big industries, but they
are devouring, together with the co-operatives’ the light and
food-producing industries, the collective farms, the small local
industries – that is, all those branches of economy which stand nearest
to the people.

The progressive role of the Soviet bureaucracy coincides with the period
devoted to introducing into the Soviet Union the most important elements
of capitalist technique.

The rough work of borrowing, imitating, transplanting and grafting, was
accomplished on the bases laid down by the revolution. There was, thus
far, no question of any new word in the sphere of technique, science or
art. It is possible to build gigantic factories according to a
ready-made Western pattern by bureaucratic command – although, to be
sure, at triple the normal cost. But the farther you go, the more the
economy runs into the problem of quality, which slips out of the hands
of a bureaucracy like a shadow. The Soviet products are as though
branded with the gray label of indifference. Under a nationalized
economy, _quality_ demands a democracy of producers and consumers,
freedom of criticism and initiative – conditions incompatible with a
totalitarian regime of fear, lies and flattery.

Behind the question of quality stands a more complicated and grandiose
problem which may be comprised in the concept of _independent_,
_technical_ and _cultural creation_. The ancient philosopher said that
strife is the father of all things. No new values can be created where a
free conflict of ideas is impossible. To be sure, a revolutionary
dictatorship means by its very essence strict limitations of freedom.
But for that very reason epochs of revolution have never been directly
favourable to cultural creation: they have only cleared the arena for
it. The dictatorship of the proletariat opens a wider scope to human
genius the more it ceases to be a dictatorship. The socialist culture
will flourish only in proportion to the dying away of the state. In that
simple and unshakable historic law is contained the death sentence of
the present political regime in the Soviet Union. Soviet democracy is
not the demand of an abstract policy, still less an abstract moral. It
has become a life-and-death need of the country.

If the new state had no other interests than the interests of society,
the dying away of the function of compulsion would gradually acquire a
painless character. But the state is not pure spirit. Specific functions
have created specific organs. The bureaucracy taken as a whole is
concerned not so much with its function as with the tribute which this
function brings in. The commanding caste tries to strengthen and
perpetuate the organs of compulsion. To make sure of its power and
income, it spares nothing and nobody. The more the course of development
goes against it, the more ruthless it becomes toward the advanced
elements of the population. Like the Catholic Church it has put forward
the dogma of infallibility in the period of its decline, but it has
raised it to a height of which the Roman pope never dreamed.

The increasingly insistent deification of Stalin is, with all its
elements of caricature, a necessary element of the regime. The
bureaucracy has need of an inviolable superarbiter, a first consul if
not an emperor, and it raises upon its shoulders him who best responds
to its claim for lordship. That “strength of character” of the leader
which so enraptures the literary dilettantes of the West, is in reality
the sum total of the collective pressure of a caste which will stop at
nothing in defence of its position. Each one of them at his post is
thinking: _l’etat c’est moi._ In Stalin each one easily finds himself.
But Stalin also finds in each one a small part of his own spirit. Stalin
is the personification of the bureaucracy. That is the substance of his
political personality.

Caesarism, or its bourgeois form, Bonapartism, enters the scene in those
moments of history when the sharp struggle of two camps raises the state
power, so to speak, above the nation, and guarantees it, in appearance,
a complete independence of classes in reality, only the freedom
necessary for a defence of the privileged. The Stalin regime, rising
above a politically atomized society, resting upon a police and
officers’ corps, and allowing of no control whatever, is obviously a
variation of Bonapartism – a Bonapartism of a new type not before seen
in history.

Caesarism arose upon the basis of a slave society shaken by inward
strife. Bonapartism is one of the political weapons of the capitalist
regime in its critical period. Stalinism is a variety of the same
system, but upon the basis of a workers’ state torn by the antagonism
between an organized and armed Soviet aristocracy and the unarmed
toiling masses.

As history testifies, Bonapartism gets along admirably with a universal,
and even a secret, ballot. The democratic ritual of Bonapartism is the
_plebiscite_. From time to time, the question is presented to the
citizens: _for_ or _against_ the leader? And the voter feels the barrel
of a revolver between his shoulders. Since the time of Napoleon III, who
now seems a provincial dilettante, this technique has received an
extraordinary development. The new Soviet constitution which establishes
_Bonapartism on a plebiscite basis_ is the veritable crown of the
system.

In the last analysis, Soviet Bonapartism owes its birth to the
belatedness of the world revolution. But in the capitalist countries the
same cause gave rise to fascism. We thus arrive at the conclusion,
unexpected at first glance, but in reality inevitable, that the crushing
of Soviet democracy by an all-powerful bureaucracy and the extermination
of bourgeois democracy by fascism were produced by one and the same
cause: the dilatoriness of the world proletariat in solving the problems
set for it by history. Stalinism and fascism, in spite of a deep
difference in social foundations, are symmetrical phenomena. In many of
their features they show a deadly similarity. A victorious revolutionary
movement in Europe would immediately shake not only fascism, but Soviet
Bonapartism. In turning its back to the international revolution, the
Stalinist bureaucracy was, from its own point of view, right. It was
merely obeying the voice of self-preservation.
 

2. The Struggle of the Bureaucracy with “the Class Enemy”

From the first days of the Soviet regime the counterweight to
bureaucratism was the party. If the bureaucracy managed the state, still
the party controlled the bureaucracy. Keenly vigilant lest inequality
transcend the limits of what was necessary, the party was always in a
state of open or disguised struggle with the bureaucracy. The historic
role of Stalin’s faction was to destroy this duplication, subjecting the
party to its own officialdom and merging the latter in the officialdom
of the state. Thus was created the present totalitarian regime. It was
his doing the bureaucracy this not unimportant service that guaranteed
Stalin’s victory.

During the first ten years of its struggle, the Left Opposition did not
abandon the program of ideological conquest of the party for that of
conquest of power against the party. Its slogan was: reform, not
revolution. The bureaucracy, however, even in those times, was ready for
any revolution in order to defend itself against a democratic reform. In
1927, when the struggle reached an especially bitter stage, Stalin
declared at a session of the Central Committee, addressing himself to
the Opposition: “Those cadres can be removed only by civil war!” What
was a threat in Stalin’s words became, thanks to a series of defeats of
the European proletariat, a historic fact. The road of reform was turned
into a road of revolution.

The continual purgations of the party and the Soviet organisations have
the object of preventing the discontent of the masses from finding a
coherent political expression. But repressions do not kill thought; they
merely drive it underground. Wide circles of communists as well as
nonparty citizens, keep up two systems of thought, one official and one
secret. Spying and talebearing are corroding social relations
throughout. The bureaucracy unfailingly represents its enemies as the
enemies of socialism. With the help of judicial forgeries, which have
become the normal thing, it imputes to them any crime it finds
convenient. Under threat of the firing squad, it extracts confessions
dictated by itself from the weak, and then makes these confessions the
basis for accusations against the more sturdy.

“It would be unpardonably stupid and criminal,” teaches PRAVDA of June
5, 1936, – commenting upon the “most democratic constitution in the
world,” – notwithstanding the abolition of classes to assume that “class
forces hostile to socialism are reconciled to their defeat ... The
struggle goes on.” Who are these “hostile class forces”? PRAVDA answers:
“Relics of counter-revolutionary groups, White Guards of all colors,
_especially_ the Trotskyist-Zinovievist.” After the inevitable reference
to “spy work, conspiracies and terrorist activity” (by
Trotskyist-Zinovievists!), the organ of Stalin gives this promise: “We
will in the future too beat down and exterminate with a firm hand the
enemies of the people, the Trotskyist reptiles and furies, no matter how
skillfully they disguise themselves.” Such threats, daily repeated in
the Soviet press, are but accompaniments to the work of the GPU. A
certain Petrov, member of the party since 1918, participant in the civil
war, subsequently a Soviet agricultural expert and member of the Right
Opposition, who escaped from exile in 1936, writing in a liberal émigré
paper, now characterizes the so-called Trotskyists as follows: “The
lefts? Psychologically, the last revolutionists, genuine and fervent. No
gray bargaining, no compromises. Most admirable people. But idiotic
ideas ... a world conflagration and such like raving.” We will leave
aside the question of their “ideas.” This moral and political appraisal
of the left from their enemy on the right, speaks for itself. It is
these “last revolutionists, genuine, fervent,” that the colonels and
generals of the GPU are arraigning for ... counterrevolutionary activity
in the interests of imperialism.

The hysteria of the bureaucratic hatred against the Bolshevik Opposition
acquires an especially sharp political meaning in connection with the
removal of limitations upon people of bourgeois origin. The conciliatory
decrees in relation to their employment, work and education are based
upon the consideration that the resistance of the former ruling classes
dies away in proportion as the stability of the new order becomes clear.
“There is now no need of these limitations,” explained Molotov at a
session of the Central Executive Committee in January, 1936. At the same
moment, however, it was revealed that the most malicious “class enemies”
are recruited from among those who struggled throughout their whole
lives for socialism, starting with the closest co-workers of Lenin, such
as Zinoviev and Kamenev. In distinction from the bourgeoisie, the
“Trotskyists”, according to PRAVDA, become more desperate, “the more
clearly the features of a non-class socialist society are drawn.” The
delirious character of this philosophy, arising from the necessity of
covering up new relations with old formulas, cannot, of course, conceal
a real shift in the social antagonisms. On the one hand, the creation of
a caste of “gentry” opens broad opportunities for careers to the more
ambitious offspring of the bourgeoisie: there is no risk in giving them
equal rights. On the other hand, the same phenomenon produces a sharp
and extremely dangerous discontent in the masses, and especially the
worker youths. Hence, the exterminating campaign against “furies and
reptiles.” The sword of the dictatorship, which used to fell those who
wanted to restore the privileges of the bourgeoisie, is now directed
against those who revolt against the privileges of the bureaucracy. The
blows fall not upon the class enemies of the proletariat, but upon the
proletarian vanguard. Corresponding to this basic change in its
functions, the political police, formerly recruited from especially
devoted and self-sacrificing Bolsheviks, is now composed of the most
demoralized part of the bureaucracy.

In their persecution of revolutionists, the Thermidorians pour out all
their hatred upon those who remind them of the past, and make them dread
the future. The prisons, the remote corners of Siberia and Central Asia,
the fast multiplying concentration camps, contain the flower of the
Bolshevik Party, the most sturdy and true. Even in the solitary
confinement prisons of Siberia the Oppositionists are still persecuted
with searches, postal blockades and hunger. In exile wives are forcibly
separated from their husbands, with one sole purpose: to break their
resistance and extract a recantation. But even those who recant are not
saved. At the first suspicion or hint from some informer against them,
they are subjected to redoubled punishment. Help given to exiles even by
their relatives is prosecuted as a crime. Mutual aid is punished as a
conspiracy.

The sole means of self-defense in these conditions is the hunger strike.
The GPU answers this with forcible feeding or with an offer of freedom
to die. During these years hundreds of Oppositionists, both Russian and
foreign, have been shot, or have died of hunger strikes, or have
resorted to suicide. Within the last twelve years, the authorities have
scores of times announced to the world the final rooting out of the
opposition. But during the “purgations” in the last month of 1935 and
the first half of 1936, hundreds of thousands of members of the party
were again expelled, among them several tens of thousands of
“Trotskyists.” The most active were immediately arrested and thrown into
prisons and concentration camps. As to the rest, Stalin, through PRAVDA,
openly advised the local organs not to give them work. In a country
where the sole employer is the state, this means death by slow
starvation. The old principle: who does not work shall not eat, has been
replaced with a new one: who does not obey shall not eat. Exactly how
many Bolsheviks have been expelled, arrested, exiled, exterminated,
since 1923, when the era of Bonapartism opened, we shall find out when
we go through the archives of Stalin’s political police. How many of
them remain in the underground will become known when the shipwreck of
the bureaucracy begins.

How much significance can twenty or thirty thousand Oppositionists have
for a party of two million? On such a question a mere juxtaposition of
figures means nothing. Ten revolutionists in a regiment is enough to
bring it over, in a red-hot political atmosphere, to the side of the
people. Not for nothing does the staff mortally fear tiny underground
circles, or even single individuals. This reactionary general-staff
fear, which imbues the Stalinist bureaucracy throughout, explains the
mad character of its persecutions and its poisonous slanders.

Victor Serge, who lived through all the stages of the repression in the
Soviet Union, has brought startling news to western Europe from those
who are undergoing torture for their loyalty to the revolution and
hostility to its gravediggers.

“I exaggerate nothing,” he writes. “I weigh every word. I can back up
every one of my statements with tragic proof and with names. Among this
mass of martyrs and protestants, for the most part silent, one heroic
minority is nearer to me than all the others, precious for its energy,
its penetration, its stoicism, its devotion to the Bolshevism of the
great epoch. Thousands of these Communists of the first hour, comrades
of Lenin and Trotsky, builders of the Soviet Republic when Soviets still
existed, are opposing the principles of socialism to the inner
degeneration of the regime, are defending as best they can (and all they
can is to agree to all possible sacrifices) the rights of the working
class ... I bring you news of those who are locked up there. They will
hold out, whatever be necessary, to the end. Even if they do not live to
see a new revolutionary dawn ... the revolutionists of the West can
count upon them. The flame will be kept burning, even if only in
prisons. In the same way they are counting upon you. You must – we must
– defend them in order to defend workers’ democracy in the world, in
order to revive the liberating image of the dictatorship of the
proletariat, and some day restore to the Soviet Union its moral
greatness and the confidence of the workers.”
 

3. The Inevitability of a New Revolution

Discussing the dying away of the state, Lenin wrote that the custom of
observing the rules of social life can lose all need of compulsion _if_
there is nothing which provokes indignation, protest and revolt, and
thus creates the necessity for repression.” The essence of the matter
lies in that _if_. The present regime in the Soviet Union provokes
protest at every step, a protest the more burning in that it is
repressed. The bureaucracy is not only a machine of compulsion but also
a constant source of provocation. The very existence of a greedy, lying
and cynical caste of rulers inevitably creates a hidden indignation. The
improvement of the material situation of the workers does not reconcile
them with the authorities; on the contrary, by increasing their
self-respect and freeing their thought for general problems of politics,
it prepares the way for an open conflict with the bureaucracy.

The unremovable “leaders” love to issue statements about the necessity
of “studying”, of “acquiring technique”, “cultural self-education”, and
other admirable things. But the ruling layer itself is ignorant and
little cultured; it studies nothing seriously, is disloyal and rude in
social contacts. Its pretension to patronize all spheres of social life,
to take command not only of co-operative shops but of musical
compositions, is the more intolerable for that. The Soviet population
cannot rise to a higher level of culture without freeing itself from
this humiliating subjection to a caste of usurpers.

Will the bureaucrat devour the workers’ state, or will the working class
clean up the bureaucrat? Thus stands the question upon whose decision
hangs the fate of the Soviet Union. The vast majority of the Soviet
workers are even now hostile to the bureaucracy. The peasant masses hate
them with their healthy plebian hatred. If in contrast to the peasants
the workers have almost never come out on the road of open struggle,
thus condemning the protesting villages to confusion and impotence, this
is not only because of the repressions. The workers fear lest, in
throwing out the bureaucracy, they will open the way for a capitalist
restoration. The mutual relations between state and class are much more
complicated than they are represented by the vulgar “democrats.” Without
a planned economy the Soviet Union would be thrown back for decades. In
that sense the bureaucracy continues to fulfill a necessary function.
But it fulfills it in such a way as to prepare an explosion of the whole
system which may completely sweep out the results of the revolution. The
workers are realists. Without deceiving themselves with regard to the
ruling caste at least with regard to its lower tiers which stand near to
them – they see in it the watchman for the time being of a certain part
of their own conquests. They will inevitably drive out the dishonest,
impudent and unreliable watchman as soon as they see another
possibility. For this it is necessary that in the West or the East
another revolutionary dawn arise.

The cessation of visible political struggle is portrayed by the friends
and agents of the Kremlin as a “stabilization” of the regime. In reality
it signalizes only a temporary stabilization of the bureaucracy. With
popular discontent driven deep, the younger generation feels with
special pain the yoke of this “enlightened absolutism” in which there is
so much more absolutism than enlightenment. The increasingly ominous
vigilance of the bureaucracy against any ray of living thought, and the
unbearable tensity of the hymns of praise addressed to a blessed
providence in the person of the “leader”, testify alike to a growing
separation between the state and society. They testify to a steady
intensifying of inner contradictions, a pressure against the walls of
the state which seeks a way out and must inevitably find one.

In a true appraisal of the situation, the not infrequent terrorist acts
against representatives of power have a very high significance. The most
notorious of these was the murder of Kirov, a clever and unscrupulous
Leningrad dictator, a typical representative of his corporation. In
themselves, terrorist acts are least of all capable of overthrowing a
Bonapartist oligarchy. Although the individual bureaucrat dreads the
revolver. the bureaucracy as a whole is able to exploit an act of terror
for the justification of its own violences, and incidentally to
implicate in the murder its own political enemies (the affair of
Zinoviev, Kamenev and the others). [1] Individual terror is a weapon of
impatient or despairing individuals, belonging most frequently to the
younger generation of the bureaucracy itself. But, as was the case in
tzarist times, political murders are unmistakable symptoms of a stormy
atmosphere, and foretell the beginning of an open political crisis.

In introducing the new constitution, the bureaucracy shows that it feels
this danger and is taking preventive measures. However, it has happened
more than once that a bureaucratic dictatorship, seeking salvation in
“liberal” reforms, has only weakened itself. While exposing Bonapartism,
the new constitution creates at the same time a semi-legal cover for the
struggle against it. The rivalry of bureaucratic cliques at the
elections may become the beginning of a broader political struggle. The
whip against “badly working organs of power” may be turned into a whip
against Bonapartism. All indications agree that the further course of
development must inevitably lead to a clash between the culturally
developed forces of the people and the bureaucratic oligarchy. There is
no peaceful outcome for this crisis. No devil ever yet voluntarily cut
off his own claws. The Soviet bureaucracy will not give up its positions
without a fight. The development leads obviously to the road of
revolution.

With energetic pressure from the popular mass, and the disintegration
inevitable in such circumstances of the government apparatus, the
resistance of those in power may prove much weaker than now appears. But
as to this only hypotheses are possible. In any case, the bureaucracy
can be removed only by a revolutionary force. And, as always, there will
be fewer victims the more bold and decisive is the attack. To prepare
this and stand at the head of the masses in a favourable historic
situation – that is the task of the Soviet section of the Fourth
International. Today it is still weak and driven underground. But the
illegal existence of a party is not nonexistence. It is only a difficult
form of existence. Repressions can prove fully effective against a class
that is disappearing from the scene this was fully proven by the
revolutionary dictatorship of 1917 to 1923 – but violences against a
revolutionary vanguard cannot save a caste which, if the Soviet Union is
destined in general to further development, has outlived itself.

The revolution which the bureaucracy is preparing against itself will
not be social, like the October revolution of 1917. It is not a question
this time of changing the economic foundations of society, of replacing
certain forms of property with other forms. History has known elsewhere
not only social revolutions which substituted the bourgeois for the
feudal regime, but also political revolutions which, without destroying
the economic foundations of society, swept out an old ruling upper crust
(1830 and 1848 in France, February 1917 in Russia, etc.). The overthrow
of the Bonapartist caste will, of course, have deep social consequences,
but in itself it will be confined within the limits of political
revolution.

This is the first time in history that a state resulting from a workers’
revolution has existed. The stages through which it must go are nowhere
written down. It is true that the theoreticians and creators of the
Soviet Union hoped that the completely transparent and flexible Soviet
system would permit the state peacefully to transform itself, dissolve,
and die away, in correspondence with the stages of the economic and
cultural evolution of society. Here again, however, life proved more
complicated than theory anticipated. The proletariat of a backward
country was fated to accomplish the first socialist revolution. For this
historic privilege, it must, according to all evidences, pay with a
second supplementary revolution – against bureaucratic absolutism. The
program of the new revolution depends to a great extent upon the moment
when it breaks out, upon the level which the country has then attained,
and to a great degree upon the international situation. The fundamental
elements of the program are already clear, and have been given
throughout the course of this book as an objective inference from an
analysis of the contradictions of the Soviet regime.

It is not a question of substituting one ruling clique for another, but
of changing the very methods of administering the economy and guiding
the culture of the country. Bureaucratic autocracy must give place to
Soviet democracy. A restoration of the right of criticism, and a genuine
freedom of elections, are necessary conditions for the further
development of the country. This assumes a revival of freedom of Soviet
parties, beginning with the party of Bolsheviks, and a resurrection of
the trade unions. The bringing of democracy into industry means a
radical revision of plans in the interests of the toilers. Free
discussion of economic problems will decrease the overhead expense of
bureaucratic mistakes and zigzags. Expensive playthings palaces of the
Soviets, new theaters, show-off subways – will be crowded out in favor
of workers’ dwellings. “Bourgeois norms of distribution” will be
confined within the limits of strict necessity, and, in step with the
growth of social wealth, will give way to socialist equality. Ranks will
be immediately abolished. The tinsel of decorations will go into the
melting pot. The youth will receive the opportunity to breathe freely,
criticize, make mistakes, and grow up. Science and art will be freed of
their chains. And, finally, foreign policy will return to the traditions
of revolutionary internationalism.

More than ever the fate of the October revolution is bound up now with
the fate of Europe and of the whole world. The problems of the Soviet
Union are now being decided on the Spanish peninsula, in France, in
Belgium. At the moment when this book appears the situation will be
incomparably more clear than today, when civil war is in progress under
the walls of Madrid. If the Soviet bureaucracy succeeds, with its
treacherous policy of “people’s fronts”, in insuring the victory of
reaction in Spain and France – and the Communist International is doing
all it can in that direction – the Soviet Union will find itself on the
edge of ruin. A bourgeois counterrevolution rather than an insurrection
of the workers against the bureaucracy will be on the order of the day.
If, in spite of the united sabotage of reformists and “Communist”
leaders, the proletariat of western Europe finds the road to power, a
new chapter will open in the history of the Soviet Union. The first
victory of a revolution in Europe would pass like an electric shock
through the Soviet masses, straighten them up, raise their spirit of
independence, awaken the traditions of 1905 and 1917, undermine the
position of the Bonapartist bureaucracy, and acquire for the Fourth
International no less significance than the October revolution possessed
for the Third. Only in that way can the first Workers’ State be saved
for the socialist future.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Translator’s Note:_ The reference here is to the January 1935 trial
and not the August 1936 trial, the lines having been written prior to
the latter.

The Revolution Betrayed



APPENDIX “SOCIALISM IN ONE COUNTRY”


------------------------------------------------------------------------

The reactionary tendencies of autarchy are a defence reflex of senile
capitalism to the task with which history confronts it, that of freeing
its economy from the fetters of private property and the national state,
and organizing it in a planned manner throughout the Earth.

In Lenin’s _Declaration of the Rights of the Toiling and Exploited
People_ – presented by the Soviet of People’s Commissars for the
approval of the Constituent Assembly during its brief hours of life –
the “fundamental task” of the new regime was thus defined: “The
establishment of a socialist organisation of society and the victory of
socialism in all countries.” The international character of the
revolution was thus written into the basic document of the new regime.
No one at that time would have dared present the problem otherwise! In
April 1924, three months after the death of Lenin, Stalin wrote, his
brochure of compilations called THE FOUNDATIONS OF LENINISM:

“For the overthrow of the bourgeoisie, the efforts of one country are
enough – to this the history of our own revolution testifies. For the
final victory of socialism, for the organisation of socialist
production, the efforts of one country, especially a peasant country
like ours, are not enough – for this we must have the efforts of the
proletarians of several advanced countries.”

These lines need no comment. The edition in which they were printed,
however, has been been withdrawn from circulation.

The large-scale defeats of the European proletariat, and the first very
modest economic successes of the Soviet Union, suggested to Stalin, in
the autumn of 1924, the idea that the historic mission of the Soviet
bureaucracy was to build socialism in a single country. Around this
question there developed a discussion which to many superficial minds
seemed academic or scholastic, but which in reality reflected the
incipient degeneration of the Third International and prepared the way
for the Fourth.

Petrov, the former communist, now a White émigré, whom we have already
quoted [in previous chapters of the book], tells from his own memories
how fiercely the younger generation of administrators opposed the
doctrine of the dependence of the Soviet Union upon the international
revolution. “How is it possible that we in our own country can not
contrive to build a happy life?” If Marx has it otherwise, that means
that “we are no Marxists, we are Russian Bolsheviks – that’s what!” To
these recollections of disputes in the middle of the twenties, Petrov
adds: “Today I can not but think that the theory of building socialism
in one country was not a mere Stalinist invention.” Completely true! It
expressed unmistakably the mood of the bureaucracy. When speaking of the
victory of socialism, they meant their own victory.

In justifying his break with the Marxist tradition of internationalism,
Stalin was incautious enough to remark that Marx and Engels were not
unacquainted with the law of uneven development of capitalism supposedly
discovered by Lenin. In a catalogue of intellectual curiosities, that
remark ought really to occupy a foremost place. Unevenness of
development permeates the whole history of mankind, and especially the
history of capitalism. A young Russian historian and economist, Solntez,
a man of exceptional gifts and moral qualities tortured to death in the
prisons of the Soviet bureaucracy for membership in the Left Opposition,
offered in 1926 a superlative theoretical study of the law of uneven
development in Marx. It could not, of course, be printed in the Soviet
Union. Also under the ban, although for reasons of an opposite nature,
is the work of the long dead and forgotten German Social-Democrat,
Vollmar, who as early as 1878 developed the perspective of an “isolated
socialist state” – not for Russia, but for Germany – containing
references to this “law” of uneven development which is supposed to have
been unknown until Lenin.

“Socialism unconditionally assumes economically developed relations,”
wrote Georg Vollmar, “and if the question were limited to them alone,
socialism ought to be strongest where the economic development is
highest. But the thing does not stand that way at all. England is
undoubtedly the most developed country economically, yet we see that
socialism plays there a very secondary role, while in economically less
developed Germany socialism has already such power that the entire old
society no longer feels stable.”

Referring to the multitude of historic factors which determine the
course of events, Vollmar continued:

“It is clear that with an interrelation of such innumerable forces the
development of any general human movement could not, and can not, be
identical in the matter of time and form even in two countries, to say
nothing of all ... Socialism obeys the same law ... The assumption of a
simultaneous victory of socialism in all cultured countries is
absolutely ruled out, as is also, and for the same reasons, the
assumption that all the rest of the civilized states will immediately
and inevitably imitate the example of a socialistically organized state
...”

Thus – Vollmar concludes – “we arrive at the isolated socialist state,
concerning which I trust I have proven that it is, although not the only
possibility, nevertheless the greatest possibility.”

In this work, written when Lenin was eight years old, the law of uneven
development receives a far more correct interpretation that that to be
found among the Soviet epigones, beginning with the autumn of 1924. We
must remark, incidentally, that in this part of his investigation
Vollmar, a very second-rate theoretician, is only paraphrasing the
thoughts of Engels – to whom, we are told, the law of unevenness of
capitalist development remained “unknown.”

“The isolated socialist state” has long ceased to be a hypothesis, and
became a fact – in Russia to be sure, not in Germany. But this very fact
of isolation is also a precise expression of the relative strength of
world capitalism, the relative weakness of socialism. From an isolated
“socialist” state to a socialist society once for all done with the
state remains a long historic road, and this road exactly coincides with
the road of international revolution.

Beatrice and Sidney Webb on their part assure us that Marx and Engels
did not believe in the possibility of building an isolated socialist
society only because neither of them “had ever dreamt” of such a
powerful weapon as the monopoly of foreign trade. One can hardly read
these lines from the aged authors without embarrassment. The taking over
by the state of commercial banks and companies, railroads, mercantile
marine, is as necessary a measure of the socialist revolution as the
nationalization of the means of production, including the means employed
in the export branches of industry. The monopoly of foreign trade is
nothing but a concentration in the hands of the state of the material
instruments of export and import. To say that Marx and Engels “never
dreamt” of the monopoly of foreign trade is to say that they never
dreamt of the socialist revolution. To complete the picture, we may note
that in the work of the above-quoted Vollmar, the monopoly of foreign
trade is presented, quite correctly, as one of the most important
instruments of the “isolated socialist state.” Marx and Engels must then
have learned about this secret from Vollmar, had he himself not learned
it earlier from them.

The “theory” of socialism in one country – a “theory” never expounded,
by the way, or given any foundation, by Stalin himself – comes down to
the sufficiently sterile and unhistoric notion that, thanks to the
natural riches of the country, a socialist society can be built within
the geographic confines of the Soviet Union. With the same success you
might affirm that socialism could triumph if the population of the earth
were a twelfth of what it is. In reality, however, the purpose of this
new theory was to introduce into the social consciousness a far more
concrete system of ideas, namely: the revolution is wholly completed;
social contradictions will steadily soften; the _kulak_ will gradually
grow into socialism; the development as a whole, regardless of events in
the external world, will preserve a peaceful and planned character.
Bukharin, in attempting to give some foundation to the theory, declared
it unshakably proven that

“we shall not perish owing to class differences within our country and
our technical backwardness, that we can build socialism even on this
pauper technical basis, that this growth of socialism will be many times
slower, that we will crawl with a tortoise tempo, and that nevertheless
we are building this socialism, and we will build it.”

We remark the formula: “Build socialism even on a pauper technical
basis,” and we recall once more the genial intuition of the young Marx:
with a low technical basis “only want will be generalized, and with want
the struggle for necessities begins again, and all the old crap must
revive.”

In April 1926, at a Plenum of the Central Committee, the following
amendment to the theory of the tortoise tempo was introduced by the Left
Opposition:

“It would be a fundamental error to think that in a capitalist
environment we can go towards socialism at an arbitrary tempo. Our
further approach to socialism will be ensured only on condition that the
distance separating our industry from the advanced capitalist industry
shall not increase, but clearly and palpably decrease.”

Stalin with good reason declared this amendment a “masked” attack upon
the theory of socialism in one country, and categorically rejected the
very inclination to link up the tempo of domestic construction with the
conditions of international development. Here is what he said verbatim,
according to the stenographic report of the Plenum:

“Whoever drags in here an international factor does not understand the
very form of the question. He is either confused in the matter because
he does not understand it, or he is consciously trying to confuse the
question.”

The amendment of the Opposition was rejected.

But the illusion of a socialism to be built at a tortoise tempo, on a
pauper basis in an environment of powerful enemies, did not long
withstand the blows of criticism. In November of the same year the 15th
Party Conference, without a word of preparation in the press,
acknowledged that it would be necessary “in a relatively [?] minimal
historical period to catch up to and then surpass the level of
industrial development of the advanced capitalist countries.” The Left
Opposition at any rate was here “surpassed.” But in advancing this
slogan – catch up to and surpass the whole world “in a minimal period” –
yesterday’s theorists of the tortoise tempo had fallen captive to that
same international factor of which the Soviet bureaucracy had such a
superstitious fear. Thus in the course of eight months the first and
purest version of the Stalinist theory was liquidated.

Socialism must inevitably “surpass” capitalism in all spheres – wrote
the Left Opposition in a document illegally distributed in March 1927 –

“but at present the question is not of the relation of socialism to
capitalism in general, but of the economic development of the Soviet
Union in relation to Germany, England and the United States. What is to
be understood by the phrase ‘minimal historic period’? A whole series of
future five-year plans will leave us far from the level of the advanced
countries of the West. What will be happening in the capitalist world
during this time?”

[...]

If you admit the possibility of its flourishing anew for a period of
decades, then the talk of socialism in our backward country is pitiable
tripe. Then it will be necessary to say that we were mistaken in our
appraisal of the whole epoch as an epoch of capitalist decay. Then the
Soviet Republic will prove to have been the second experiment in
proletarian dictatorship since the Paris Commune, broader and more
fruitful, but only an experiment ... Is there, however, any serious
ground for such a decisive reconsideration of our whole epoch, and of
the meaning of the October revolution as a link in an international
revolution? No!

[...]

In finishing to a more or less complete extent their period of
reconstruction [after the war] ... the capitalist countries are
reviving, and reviving in an incomparably sharper form, all the old
pre-war contradictions, domestic and international. This is the basis of
the proletarian revolution. It is a fact that we are building socialism.
A greater fact, however, and not a less – since the whole in general is
greater that the part – is the preparation of a European and world
revolution. The part can conquer only together with the whole.

[...]

The European proletariat needs a far shorter period for its take-off to
the seizure of power than we need to catch up technically with Europe
and America ... We must, meanwhile, systematically narrow the distance
separating our productivity of labour from that of the rest of the
world. The more we advance, the less danger there is of possible
intervention by low prices, and consequently by armies ... The higher we
raise the standard of living of the workers and peasants, the more truly
shall we hasten the proletarian revolution in Europe, the sooner will
that revolution enrich us with world technique, and the more truly and
genuine will our socialist construction advance as a part of European
and world construction.”

This documents, like the others, remained without answer – unless you
consider expulsions from the party and arrests an answer to it.

After the abandonment of the idea of a tortoise tempo, it became
necessary to renounce the idea bound up with it of the _kulak_’s growing
into socialism. The administrative extermination of kulakism, however,
gave the theory of socialism in one country new nourishment. Once
classes are “fundamentally” abolished, this mean that socialism is
“fundamentally” achieved (1931). In essence, this formula restored the
conception of a socialist society built upon a “pauper basis.” It was in
those days, as we remember, that an official journalist explained that
the absence of milk for babies is due to a lack of cows and not the
shortcomings of the socialist system.

A concern for the productivity of labour, however, prevented any long
resting upon these sedative formulae of 1931, which had to serve as
moral compensation for the devastations effected by complete
collectivization.

“Some think,” Stalin unexpectedly announced in connection with the
Stakhanov movement, “that socialism can be strengthened by way of a
certain material equalization of people on the basis of a pauper life.
That is not true. [...] In reality, socialism can conquer only on the
basis of a high productivity of labour, higher than under capitalism.”

Completely correct!

However, at the very same time the new program of the Communist Youth –
adopted in April 1936 at the same congress which withdrew from the
Communist Youth its last remnant of political rights – defined the
socialist character of the Soviet Union in the following categoric
terms: “The whole national economy of the country has become socialist.”
Nobody bothers to reconcile these contradictory conceptions. Each one is
put into circulation in accord with the demands of the moment. It does
not matter, for no one dares to criticize.

The spokesman at the congress explained the very necessity of the new
program for the Communist Youth in the following words:“The old program
contains a deeply mistaken anti-Leninist assertion to the effect that
Russia ’can arrive at socialism only through a world proletarian
revolution’. This point of the program is basically wrong. It reflects
Trotskyist views.” – that same views that Stalin was still defending in
April 1924.

Aside from that, it remains unexplained how a program written in 1921 by
Bukharin, and carefully gone over by the Politburo with the
participation of Lenin, could turn out after fifteen years to be
“Trotskyist”, and have to be revised to an exactly opposite effect! But
logical arguments are powerless where it is a question of interests.
Having won their independence from the proletariat of their own country,
the bureaucracy cannot recognize the dependence of the Soviet Union upon
the world proletariat. The law of uneven development brought it about
that the contradiction between the technique and property relations of
capitalism shattered the weakest link in the world chain. Backward
Russian capitalism was the first to pay for the bankruptcy of world
capitalism. The law of uneven development is supplemented throughout the
whole course of history by the law of combined development. The collapse
of the bourgeoisie in Russia led to the proletarian dictatorship – that
is, to a backward country’s leaping ahead of the advanced countries.
However, the establishment of socialist forms of property in the
backward country came up against the inadequate level of technique and
culture. Itself born of the contradictions between his world productive
forces and capitalist forms of property, the October revolution produced
in its turn a contradiction between low national productive forces and
socialist forms of property.

To be sure, the isolation of the Soviet Union did not have those
immediate dangerous consequences which might have been feared. The
capitalist world was too disorganized and paralyzed to unfold to the
full extent its potential power. The “breathing spell” proved longer
than a critical optimism had dared to hope. However, isolation and the
impossibility of using the resources of world economy even upon
capitalistic bases (the amount of foreign trade has decreased from 1913
four to five times) entailed, along with enormous expenditures upon
military defence, an extremely disadvantageous allocation of productive
forces, and a slow raising of the standard of living of the masses. But
a more malign product of isolation and backwardness has been the octopus
of bureaucratism.

The juridical and political standards set up by the revolution exercised
a progressive action upon the backward economy, but upon the other hand
they themselves felt the lowering influence of that backwardness. The
longer the Soviet Union remains in a capitalist environment, the deeper
runs the degeneration of the social fabric. A prolonged isolation would
inevitably end not in national communism, but in a restoration of
capitalism.

If a bourgeoisie cannot peacefully grow into a socialist democracy, it
is likewise true that a socialist state cannot peacefully merge with a
world capitalist system. On the historic order of the day stands not the
peaceful socialist development of “one country”, but a long series of
world disturbances: wars and revolutions. Disturbances are inevitable
also in the domestic life of the Soviet Union. If the bureaucracy was
compelled in its struggle for a planned economy to dekulakize the
_kulak_, the working class will be compelled in its struggle for
socialism to debureaucratize the bureaucracy.

On the tomb of the latter will be inscribed the epitaph:

“Here lies the theory of socialism in one country.”

1. The “Friends” of the Soviet Union

For the first time a powerful government provides a stimulus abroad not
to the respectable right, but to the left and extreme left press. The
sympathies of the popular masses for the great revolution are being very
skillfully canalized and sluiced into the mill of the Soviet
bureaucracy. The “sympathizing” Western press is imperceptibly losing
the right to publish anything which might aggrieve the ruling stratum of
the Soviet Union. Books undesirable to the Kremlin are maliciously
unmentioned. Noisy and mediocre apologists are published in many
languages. We have avoided quoting throughout this work the specific
productions of of the official “friends”, preferring the crude originals
to the stylized foreign paraphrases. However, the literature of the
“friends”, including that of the Communist International, the most crass
and vulgar part of it, presents in cubic metres an impressive magnitude,
and plays not the last role in politics. We must devote a few concluding
pages to it.

At present the chief contribution to the treasury of thought is declared
to be the Webbs’ book, Soviet Communism. Instead of relating what has
been achieved and in what direction the achieved is developing, the
authors expound for twelve hundred pages what is contemplated, indicated
in the bureaus, or expounded in the laws. Their conclusion is: When the
projects, plans and laws are carried out, then communism will be
realised in the Soviet Union. Such is the content of this depressing
book, which rehashes the reports of Moscow bureaus and the anniversary
articles of the Moscow press.

Friendship for the Soviet bureaucracy is not friendship for the
proletarian revolution, but, on the contrary, insurance against it. The
Webbs are, to be sure, ready to acknowledge that the communist system
will sometime or other spread to to the rest of the world.

“But how, when, where, with what modifications, and whether through
violent revolution, or by peaceful penetration, or even by conscious
imitation, are questions we cannot answer.”

This diplomatic refusal to answer – or, in reality, this unequivocal
answer – is in the highest degree characteristic of the “friends”, and
tells the actual price of their friendship. If everybody had thus
answered the question of revolution before 1917, when it was infinitely
harder to answer, there would have been no Soviet state in the world,
and the British “friends” would have had to expand their fund of
friendly emotion upon other objects.

The Webbs speak as of something which goes without saying about the
vanity of hoping for a European revolution in the near future, and they
gather from that a comforting proof of the correctness of the theory of
socialism in one country. With the authority of people for whom the
October Revolution was a complete, and moreover an unpleasant, surprise,
they give us lessons in the necessity of building a socialist society
within the limits of the Soviet Union in the absence of other
perspectives. It is difficult to refrain from an impolite movement of
the shoulders! In reality, our dispute with the Webbs is not as to the
necessity of building factories in the SOviet Union and employing
mineral fertilizers on the collective farms, but as to whether it is
necessary to prepare a revolution in Great Britain and how it shall be
done. Upon that question the learned sociologues answer: “We do not
know.” They consider the very question, of course, in conflict with
“science.”

Lenin was passionately hostile to the conservative bourgeois who
imagines himself a socialist, and, in particular, to the British
Fabians. By the biographical glossary attached to his WORKS”, it is not
difficult to find out that his attitude to the Webbs throughout his
whole active life remained one of unaltered fierce hostility. In 1907 he
first wrote of the Webbs as “obtuse eulogists of English philistinism”,
who try to represent Chartism, the revolutionary epoch of the English
labour movement, as mere childishness.” Without Chartism, however, there
would have been no Paris Commune. Without both, there would have been no
October revolution. The Webbs found in the Soviet Union only an
administrative mechanism and a bureaucratic plan. They found neither
Chartism nor Communism nor the October revolution. A revolution remains
for them today, as before, an alien and hostile matter, if not indeed
“mere childishness.”

In his polemics against opportunists, Lenin did not trouble himself, as
is well known, with the manners of the salon. But his abusive epithets
(“lackeys of the bourgeoisie”, “traitors”, “boot-lick souls”) expressed
during many years a carefully weighed appraisal of the Webbs and the
evangels of Fabianism – that is, of traditional respectability and
worship for what exists. There can be no talk of any sudden change in
the views of the Webbs during recent years. These same people who during
the war support their bourgeoisie, and who accepted later at the hands
of the King the title of Lord Passfield, have renounced nothing, and
changed not at all, in adhering to Communism in a single, and moreover a
foreign, country. Sidney Webb was Colonial Minister – that is, chief
jailkeeper of British imperialism – in the very period of his life when
he was drawing near to the Soviet bureaucracy, receiving material from
its bureaus, and on that basis working upon this two-volume compilation.

As late as 1923, the Webbs saw no great difference between Bolshevism
and Tzarism (see, for example, THE DECAY OF CAPITALIST CIVILIZATION,
1923). Now, however, they have fully reorganized the “democracy” of the
Stalin regime. It is needless to seek any contradiction here. The
Fabians were indignant when the revolutionary proletariat withdrew
freedom of activity from “educated” society, but they think it quite in
the order of things when a bureaucracy withdraws freedom of activity
from the proletariat. Has not this always been the function of the
laborite’s workers’ bureaucracy? The Webbs swear, for example, that
criticism in the Soviet Union is completely free. A sense of humor is
not to be expected of these people. They refer with complete seriousness
to that notorious “self-criticism” which is enacted as a part of one’s
official duties, and the direction of which, as well as its limits, can
always be accurately foretold.

Naïveté? Neither Engels nor Lenin considered Sidney Webb naive.
Respectability rather. After all, it is a question of an established
regime and of hospitable hosts. The Webbs are extremely disapproving in
their attitude to a Marxian criticism of what exists. They consider
themselves called to preserve the heritage of the October revolution
from the Left Opposition. For the sake of completeness we observe that
in its day the Labor Government in which Lord Passfield (Sidney Webb)
held a portfolio refused the author of this work a visa to enter Great
Britain. Thus Sidney Webb, who in those very days was working on his
book upon the Soviet Union, is theoretically defending the Soviet Union
from being undermined, but practically he is defending the Empire of His
Majesty. In justice be it said that in both cases he remains true to
himself.

* * *

For many of the petty bourgeoisie who master neither pen nor brush, an
officially registered “friendship” for the Soviet Union is a kind of
certificate of higher spiritual interests. Membership in Freemason
lodges or pacifist clubs has much in common with membership in the
society of “Friends of the Soviet Union”, for it makes it possible to
live two lives at once: an everyday life in a circle of commonplace
interests, and a holiday life evaluating to the soul. From time to time
the “friends” visit Moscow. They note down in their memory tractors,
creches, Pioneers, parades, parachute girls – in a word, everything
except the new aristocracy. The best of them close their eyes to this
out of a feeling of hostility toward capitalist reaction. Andre Gide
frankly acknowledges this:

“The stupid and dishonest attack against the Soviet Union has brought it
about that we now defend it with a certain obstinacy.”

But the stupidity and dishonesty of one’s enemies is no justification
for one’s own blindness. The working masses, at any rate, have need of
clearsighted friends.

The epidemic sympathy of bourgeois radicals and socialist bourgeois for
the ruling stratum of the Soviet Union has causes that are not
unimportant. In the circle of professional politicians, notwithstanding
all differences of program, there is always a predominance of those
friendly to such “progress” as is already achieved or can easily be
achieved. There are incomparably more reformers in the world than
revolutionists, more accommodationists than irreconciables. Only in
exceptional historic periods, when the masses come into movement, do the
revolutionists emerge from their isolation, and the reformers become
more like fish out of water.

In the milieu of the present Soviet bureaucracy, there is not a person
who did not, prior to April 1917, and even considerably later, regard
the idea of a proletarian dictatorship in Russia as fantastic. (At that
time this “fantasy” was called ... Trotskyism.) The older generation of
the foreign “friends” for decades regarded as _Realpolitiker_ to Russian
Mensheviks, who stood for a “people’s front” with the liberals and
rejected the idea of dictatorship as arrant madness. To recognize a
dictatorship when it is already achieved and even bureaucratically
befouled – that is a different matter. That is a matter exactly to the
minds of these “friends.” They now not only pay their respects to the
Soviet state, but even defined it against its enemies – not so much, to
be sure, against those who yearn for the past, as against those who are
preparing the future. Where these “friends” are active preparing, as in
the case of the French, Belgian, English and other reformists, it is
convenient to them to conceal their solidarity with the bourgeoisie
under a concern for the defence of the Soviet Union. Where, on the other
hand, they have unwillingly become defeatists, as in the case of the
German and Austrian social patriots of yesterday, they hope that the
alliance of France with the Soviet Union may help them settle with
Hitler or Schussnigg. Leon Blum, who was an enemy of Bolshevism in its
heroic epoch, and opened the pages of LE POPULAIRE for the express
purpose of publicly baiting the October revolution, would now not print
a line exposing the real crimes of the Soviet bureaucracy. Just as the
Biblical Moses, thirsting to see the face of Jehovah, was permitted to
make his bow only to the rearward parts of the divine anatomy, so the
honorable reformists, worshipers of the accomplished fact, are capable
of knowing and acknowledging in a revolution only its meaty bureaucratic
posterior.

The present communist “leaders” belong in essence to the same type.
After a long series of monkey jumps and grimaces, they have suddenly
discovered the enormous advantages of opportunism, and have seized upon
it with the freshness proper to that ignorance which has always
distinguished them. Their slavish and not always disinterested kowtowing
to the upper circles in the Kremlin alone renders them absolutely
incapable of revolutionary initiative. They answer critical arguments no
otherwise than with snarling and barking; and, moreover, under the whip
of the boss they wag their tails. This most unattractive aggregation,
which in the hour of danger will scatter to the four winds, considers us
flagrant “counterrevolutionists.” What of it? History, in spite of its
austere character, cannot get along without an occassional farce.

The more honest or open-eyed of the “friends”, at least when speaking
tete-a-tete, concede that there is a spot on the Soviet sun. But
substituting a fatalistic for a dialectic analysis, they console
themselves with the thought that “a certain” bureaucratic degeneration
in the given conditions was historically inevitable. Even so! The
resistance to this degeneration also has not fallen from the sky. A
necessity has two ends: the reactionary and the progressive. History
teaches that persons and parties which drag at the opposite ends of a
necessity turn out in the long run on opposite sides of the barricade.

The final argument of the “friends” is that reactionaries will seize
upon any criticism of the Soviet regime. That is indubitable! We may
assume that they will try to get something for themselves out of the
present book. When was it ever otherwise? The COMMUNIST MANIFESTO spoke
scornfully of the fact that the feudal reaction tried to use against
liberalism the arrows of socialist criticism. That did not prevent
revolutionary socialism from following its road. It will not prevent us
either. The press of the Communist International, it is true, goes so
far as to assert that our criticism is preparing military intervention
against the Soviets. This obviously means that the capitalist
governments, learning from our works of the degeneration of the Soviet
bureaucracy, will immediately equip a punitive expedition to avenge the
trampled principles of October! The polemists of the Communist
International are not armed with rapiers but wagon tongues, or some
still less nimble instrument. In reality a Marxist criticism, which
calls things by their real names, can only increase the conservative
credit of the Soviet diplomacy in the eyes of the bourgeoisie.

It is otherwise with the working class and its sincere champions among
the intelligentsia. Here our work will cause doubts and evoke distrust –
not of revolutionaries, but of its usurpers. But that is the very goal
we have set ourselves. The motor force of progress is truth and not
lies.
